CHARCOAL SKETCHES;
OR,
SCENES IN A METROPOLIS.
OLYMPUS PUMP;
OR, THE POETIC TEMPERAMENT.
It
is said that poetry is on the decline, and that as man
surrounds himself with artificial comforts, and devotes
his energies to purposes of practical utility, the sphere of
imagination becomes circumscribed, and the worship of
the Muses is neglected. We are somewhat disposed to
assent to this conclusion; the more from having remarked
the fact that the true poetic temperament is not so
frequently
met with as it was a few years since, and that
the outward marks of genius daily become more rare.
Where the indications no longer exist, or where they
gradually disappear, it is but fair to conclude that the
thing itself is perishing. There are, it is true, many
delightful
versifiers at the present moment, but we fear that
though they display partial evidences of inspiration upon
paper, the scintillations are deceptive. Their conduct
seldom exhibits sufficient proof that they are touched
with the celestial fire, to justify the public in regarding
them as the genuine article. Judging from the rules
formerly considered absolute upon this point, it is
altogether
preposterous for your happy, well-behaved,
well-dressed
,
smoothly-shaved gentleman, who pays his debts,
and submits quietly to the laws framed for the
government
of the uninspired part of society, to arrogate to
himself a place in the first rank of the sons of genius,
whatever may be his merits with the gray goose quill.
There is something defective about him. The divine
afflatus
has been denied, and though he may flap his
wings, and soar as high as the house-tops, no one can
think him capable of cleaving the clouds, and of playing
hide and seek among the stars. Even if he were to do
so, the spectator would either believe that his eyes
deceived
him, or that the successful flight was accidental,
and owing rather to a temporary density of the
atmosphere
than to a strength of pinion.
The true poetic temperament of the old school is a gift
as fatal, as that of being able to sing a good song is to a
youth with whom the exercise of the vocal organ is not
a profession. It wasand to a certain extent isan
axiom, that an analogy almost perfect exists between the
poet and the dolphin. To exhibit their beautiful hues they
must both be on the broad road to destruction. We are
fully aware that it has been supposed by sceptical spirits
that there is some confusion of cause and effect in
arriving
at this conclusion,that there is no sufficient reason
that genius should be a bad citizen. The existence of
an irresistible impulse to break the shackles of
conventionalism
has been doubted by the heterodox. They
declare
that a disposition to do so is felt by most men, and
that aberrations are indulged in, partly from a principle
of imitation, because certain shining lights have thought
proper to render themselves as conspicuous for their
eccentricities
as for their genius, and chiefly from a belief
that society expects such wanderings, and regards them
with lenity. But analysis is not our forte, even if we
were disposed to cavil at such convenient things as
lumping generalities. Your inquiring philosophers are
troublesome fellows, and while we content ourselves
with the bare fact, let them seek
rerum cognoscere
causas
.
It is, however, a satisfaction to know that the
full-blooded
merino is not yet quite extinct. Olympus Pump
is the personification of the temperament of which we
speak. Had there been a little less of the divine essence
of poesy mingled with the clay of which he is composed,
it would have been better for him. The crockery of his
moral constitution would have been the more adapted to
the household uses of this kitchen world. But Pump
delights in being the pure porcelain, and would scorn the
admixture of that base alloy, which, while it might render
him more useful, would diminish his ornamental
qualities
.
He proudly feels that he was intended to be a
mantel embellishment to bear bouquets, not a mere
utensil for the scullery; and that he is not now fulfilling
his destiny, arises solely from the envy and
uncharitableness
of those gross and malignant spirits with which the
world abounds. Occupied continually in his mental
laboratory, fabricating articles which he finds unsaleable,
and sometimes stimulating his faculties with draughts
of Scheidam, the true Hippocrene, he slips from
station to station, like a child tumbling down stairs; and
now, having arrived at the lowest round of fortune's
ladder
,
he believes it was envy that tugged at his coat tails,
and caused his descent, and that the human race are a
vast band of conspirators. There are no Mcenases in
these modern times to help those who will not help
themselves
;
no, not even a Capel Lofft, to cheer the Pumps
of the nineteenth century. No kindly arm toils at the
handle: and if he flows, each Pump must pump for
himself. Such, at least, is the conclusion at which
Olympus
has arrived, and he has melancholy reasons for
believing
that in his instance he is correct. Thus, while
his mind is clothing its varied fancies in rich attire, and
his exulting spirit is gambolling and luxuriating in the
clover and timothy of imagination's wide domain, or
drinking fairy Champagne and eating canvass-back ducks
in air-drawn palaces, his outward man is too frequently
enduring the sad reverse of these unreal delights. He
may often be seen, when the weather is cold, leaning his
back against a post on the sunny side of the street; his
hands, for lack of coin, filling his roomy pockets; his
curious toes peeping out at crannies to see the world;
an indulgence extended to them by few but the Pump
family; and his elbows and knees following the example
of his lower extremities. Distress, deep thought, or
some other potent cause has transplanted the roses from
the garden of his cheek to that no longer sterile
promontory
his nose, while his chin shows just such a stubble
as would be invaluable for the polishing brush of a
boot-black
.
But luckily the poetic temperament has its
compensations
.
When not too much depressed, Olympus Pump has
a world of his own within his cranium; a world which
should be a model for that without,a world in which
there is nothing to do, and every thing to get for the
asking
.
If in his periods of intellectual abstraction, the
external atmosphere should nip his frame, the high price
of coal affects him not. In the palace of the mind, fuel
costs nothing, and he can there toast himself brown free
of expense. Does he desire a tea-party?the guests
are in his noddle at his call, willing to stay, or ready to
depart, at his command, without standing on the order
of their going; and the imagined tables groan with
viands which wealth might exhaust itself to procure.
Does he require sweet music?the poetic fancy can
perform an opera, or manufacture hosts of Frank
Johnsons
in the twinkling of an eye; and the celestial
creatures
,
who waltz and
galope
in the spacious
salons
of his
brain-pan, are endowed with loveliness which reality
can never parallel.
With such advantages, Pump, much as he grumbles,
would not exchange the coruscations of his genius, which
flicker and flare like the aurora borealis, for a whole
wilderness of comfort, if it were necessary that he should
entertain dull, plodding thoughts, and make himself
generally useful. Can he not, while he warms his
fingers at the fire of imagination, darm his stockings and
patch his clothes with the needle of his wit; wash his
linen and his countenance in the waters of Helicon; and,
sitting on the peak of Parnassus, devour imaginary fried
oysters with Apollo and the Muses?
But either wool gathering is not very profitable, or
else the envy of which Pump complains is stronger
than ever; for not long since, after much poetic idleness,
and a protracted frolic, he was seen, in the witching time
of night, sitting on a stall in the new market house, for
the very sufficient reason that he did not exactly know
where else lodging proportioned to the state of his fiscal
department could be found. He spoke:
How blue! how darkly, deeply, beautifully blue!
not me myself, but the expanse of ether. The stars
wink through the curtain of the air, like a fond mother
to her drowsy child, as much as to say hush-a-by-baby
to a wearied world. In the moon's mild rays even the
crags of care like sweet rock-candy shine. Night is a
Carthagenian Hannibal to sorrow, melting its Alpine
steeps, whilst buried hope pops up revived and cracks
its rosy shins. Day may serve to light sordid man to
his labours; it may be serviceable to let calabashes and
squashes see how to grow; but the poetic soul sparkles
beneath the stars. Genius never feels its oats until
after sunset; twilight applies the spanner to the fireplug
of fancy to give its bubbling fountains way; and
mid-night
lifts the sluices for the cataracts of the heart, and
cries, `Pass on the water!' Yes, and economically
considered
,
night is this world's Spanish cloak; for no
matter
how dilapidated or festooned one's apparel may be,
the loops and windows cannot be discovered, and we
look as elegant and as beautiful as get out. Ah!
continued
Pump, as he gracefully reclined upon the stall,
it's really astonishing how rich I am in the idea line
to-night. But it's no use. I've got no pencilnot even
a piece of chalk to write 'em on my hat for my next
poem. It's a great pity ideas are so much of the
soap-bubble
order, that you can't tie 'em up in a pocket
handkerchief
,
like a half peck of potatoes, or string 'em on a
stick like catfish. I often have the most beautiful notions
scampering through my head with the grace, but alas!
the swiftness too, of kittensespecially just before I get
asleepbut they're all lost for the want of a trap; an
intellectual figgery four. I wish we could find out the
way of sprinkling salt on their tails, and make 'em wait
till we want to use 'em. Why can't some of the meaner
souls invent an idea catcher for the use of genius? I'm
sure they'd find it profitable, for I wouldn't mind owing
a man twenty dollars for one myself. Oh, for an idea
catcher!
Owen Glendower failed in calling up spirits, but the
eloquence of Pump was more efficacious. In the heavy
shadow of a neighbouring pile of goods a dark mass
appeared
to detach itself, as if a portion of the gloom had
suddenly become animated. It stepped forth in the
2
likeness of a man, mysteriously wrapped up, whose eyes
glared fiercely, and with a sinister aspect, as he advanced
towards the poet. Pump stared in silencehe felt like
an idea, and as if the catcher were close at hand, ready to
pounce upon it. Catching the idea for once seemed a
disagreeable operation. The parties confronted each other
for a time without saying a word. A cloud hurrying
across the moon lent additional terror to the scene, and
the unknown, to Pump's astonished vision, appeared to
swell to a supernatural size. The stranger, at last,
waved his arm, hemmed thrice, and in the deep,
decisive
tones of one used to command, said:
It's not a new caseit's been decided frequent.
It's clearly agin the ordination made and provided, and
it's likewise agin the act
Ah me! what act? ejaculated the astonished
Pump.
To fetch yourself to anchor on the stalls. It isn't
what the law considers pooty behaviour, and no
gemman
would be cotched at it. To put the case, now,
would it be genteel for a man to set on the table at
dinner-time? Loafing on the stalls is jist as bad as
rolling among the dishes.
Oh, is that all? I'm immersed in poetic conceptions;
I'm holding sweet communion with my own desolate
affections. Leave me, leave me to the luxuriance of
imagination; suffer me, as it were, to stray through the
glittering realms of fancy.
What! on a mutton butcher's shambles? Bless you,
I can't think of it for a moment. My notions is rigid,
and if I was to find my own daddy here, I'd rouse him
out. You must tortle off, as fast as you kin. If your
tongue wasn't so thick, I'd say you must mosey; but
moseying is only to be done when a gemman's half shot;
when they're gone cases, we don't expect 'em to do
more nor tortle.
Excuse meI don't see that it makes much
difference
to you whether I am qualified to mosey, or am
only capable of the more dignified method of locomotion,
which you call to tortle. But don't disturb me. The
moon has resuscitated my fancy, and I feel as if I would
shortly compose an ode to Nox and Erebus.
Compose what's owed to Messrs. Nox and Erebus!
Yes, I thought you were one of that sort what makes
compositions when they owe any thing. Precious little
Nox and Erebus will get out of you. But come, hop
the twig! So saying, the relentless guardian of the
night seized the hapless Pump by the collar, and began to
remove him.
Now, don'tdon't be gross and muscular. I'm an
oppressed man, with no friend but my coat, and both
my coat and myself are remarkable for fragility of
constitution
.
We are free souls, vibrating on the breath of
the circumambient atmosphere, and by long
companionship
,
our sympathies are so perfect, that if you pull hard
you'll produce a pair of catastrophes; while you tear the
one, you'll discombobberate the nerves of the other.
Well, I'm be blamed! said the watch, recoiling,
did you ever hear the likes of that? Why, aunty, ain't
you a noncompusser?
I'm a poet, and it's my fate not to be understood
either by the world in general, or by Charleys in
particular
.
The one knocks us down, and the others
take us up. Between the two, we are knocked about
like a ball, until we become unravelled, and perish.
I don't want to play shinney with you, no how
why don't you go home?
The bottle is empty; the bill unpaid; landlords are
vulgar realitiesmere matters of factand very apt to
vituperate.
Well, it's easy enough to work, get money, fill the
bottle, and pay the gemman what you owes him.
I tell you again you can't understand the poetic soul.
It cannot endure the scorn and contumelies of the earthly.
It cannot submit to toil under a taskmaster, and when
weaving silver tissues of romance, be told to jump about
spry and 'tend the shop. Nor, when it meets congenial
spirits, can it leave the festive board, because the door is
to be locked at ten o'clock, and there isn't any dead latch
to it. The delicate excesses into which it leads us, to
repair the exhaustion of hard thought, compel us to
sojourn long in bed, and even that is registered by
fip-and-levy
boobies as a sin. At the present moment, I am
falling a victim to these manifold oppressions of the
unintellectual
.
Under the circumstances, then, what do you say to
being tuck up?
Is it optional?
I don't know; but it's fineable, and that's as good.
Then I decline the honour.
No, you don't. I only axed out of manners. You
must rise up, William Riley, and come along with me,
as the song says.
I suppose I must, whether I like the figure or not.
Alack, and alas for the poetic temperament! Must the
olian harp of genius be so rudely swept by a Charley
must that harp, as I may say, play mere banjo jigs, when
it should only respond in Lydian measures to the
southern
breezes of palpitating imagination? To what base
uses
Hurrah! Keep a toddlingpull foot and away!
Olympus obeyed; for who can control his fate?
'TIS ONLY MY HUSBAND.
[1]
[1]
It may not be amiss to state that the mere conclusion of the
above sketch, hastily thrown off by the same pen, appeared in one
of our periodicals a few years ago, and, much mutilated and
disfigured
,
has since been republished in the newspapers, with an
erroneous
credit, and under a different name.
Goodness
, Mrs. Pumpilion, it's a gentleman's voice,
and me such a figure! exclaimed Miss Amanda
Corntop
,
who had just arrived in town to visit her friend,
Mrs. Pumpilion, whom she had not seen since her
marriage
.
Don't disturb yourself, dear, said Mrs. Pumpilion,
quietly, it's nobody'tis only my husband. He'll
not come in; but if he does, 'tis only my husband.
So Miss Amanda Corntop was comforted, and her
agitated arrangements before the glass being more coolly
completed, she resumed her seat and the interrupted
conversation
.
Although, as a spinster, she had a laudable
and natural unwillingness to be seen by any of the
masculine
gender in that condition so graphically described
as such a figure, yet there are degrees in this
unwillingness
.
It is by no means so painful to be caught a
figure by a married man as it is to be surprised by a
youthful bachelor; and, if the former be of that peculiar
class known as only my husband, his unexpected
arrival is of very little consequence. He can never
more, like an eagle in a dove cote, flutter the Volsces.
2*
It is, therefore, evident that there exists a material
difference
between my husband and only my husband;
a difference not easily expressed, though perfectly
understood
;
and it was that understanding which restored
Miss Amanda Corntop to her pristine tranquillity.
Oh! said Miss Corntop, when she heard that the
voice in question was that of Mr. Pumpilion. Ah!
added Miss Corntop, intelligently and composedly, when
she understood that Pumpilion was only my
husband
.
She had not paid much attention to philology,
but she was perfectly aware of the value of that
diminutive
prefix only.
I told you he would not come in, for he knew there
was some one here, continued Mrs. Pumpilion, as the
spiritless footsteps of only my husband passed the
door, and slowly plodded up stairs. He neither came
in, nor did he hum, whistle, or bound three steps at a
time; only my husband never does. He is simply a
transportation line; he conveys himself from place to
place according to order, and indulges not in episodes
and embellishments.
Poor Pedrigo Pumpilion! Have all thy glories shrunk
to this little measure? Only my husband! Does that
appellation circumscribe him who once found three
chairs barely sufficient to accommodate his frame, and
who, in promenading, never skulked to the curb or
hugged the wall, but, like a man who justly appreciated
himself, took the very middle of the
trottoir
, and kept it?
The amiable, but now defunct, Mrs. Anguish was
never sure that she was perfectly well, until she had
shaken her pretty head to ascertain if some disorder were
not lying in ambush, and to discover whether a
headache
were not latent there, which, if not nipped in the
bud, might be suddenly and inconveniently brought into
action. It is not too much to infer that the same
reasoning
,
which applies to headaches and to the physical
constitution
,
may be of equal force in reference to the moral
organization. Headaches being latent, it is natural to
suppose that the disposition to be only my husband
may likewise be latent, even in him who is now as fierce
and as uncontrollable as a volcano; while the desire to be
head of the bureau may slumber in the mildest of the
fair. It is by circumstance alone that talent is developed;
the razor itself requires extraneous aid to bring it to an
edge; and the tact to give direction, as well as the
facility
to obey, wait to be elicited by events. Both
grey-mareism
and Jerry-Sneakery are sometimes latent, and
like the derangements of Mrs. Anguish's caput, only
want shaking to manifest themselves. If some are born
to command, others must certainly have a genius for
submission
we
term it a genius, submission being in many
cases rather a difficult thing.
That this division of qualities is full of wisdom, none
can deny. It requires both flint and steel to produce a
spark; both powder and ball to do execution; and,
though the Chinese contrive to gobble an infinity of rice
with chopsticks, yet the twofold operation of knife and
fork conduces much more to the comfort of a dinner.
Authority and obedience are the knife and fork of this
extensive banquet, the world; they are the true
divide
et impera;
that which is sliced off by the one is
harpooned
by the other.
In this distribution, however, nature, when the
latents
are made apparent, very frequently seems to act
with caprice. It is by no means rare to find in the form
of a man, a timid, retiring, feminine disposition, which,
in the rough encounters of existence, gives way at once,
as if, like woman, born to be controlled. The
proportions
of a Hercules, valenced with the whiskers of a tiger,
often cover a heart with no more of energy and boldness
in its pulsations than the little palpitating affair which
throbs in the bosom of a maiden of bashful fifteen;
while many a lady fair, before marriagethe latent
conditionall softness and graceful humility, bears
within her breast the fiery resolution and the
indomitable
will of an Alexander, a Hannibal, or a Doctor
Francia. The temperament which, had she been a
man, would, in an extended field, have made her a
conqueror
of nations, or, in a more contracted one, a
distinguished
thief-catching police officer, by being lodged
in a female frame renders her a Xantippea Napoleon
of the fireside, and pens her hapless mate, like a
conquered
king, a spiritless captive in his own chimney
corner.
But it is plain to be seen that this apparent confusion
lies only in the distribution. There are souls enough of
all kinds in the world, but they do not always seem
properly
fitted with bodies; and thus a corporal
construction
may run the course of life actuated by a spirit in
every respect opposed to its capabilities; as at the
breaking up of a crowded
soire
, a little head waggles
home with an immense castor, while a pumpkin pate
sallies forth surmounted by a thimble; which, we take
it, is the only philosophical theory which at all accounts
for the frequent acting out of character with which
society is replete.
Hence arises the situation of affairs with the
Pumpilions
.
Pedrigo Pumpilion has the soul which
legitimately
appertains to his beloved Seraphina Serena, while
Seraphina Serena Pumpilion has that which should
animate her Pedrigo. But, not being profound in their
researches, they are probably not aware of the fact, and
perhaps would not know their own souls if they were to
meet them in the street; although, in all likelihood, it
was a mysterious sympathya yearning of each
physical
individuality to be near so important a part of itself,
which brought this worthy pair together.
Be that, however, as it may, it is an incontrovertible
fact that, before they did come together, Pedrigo
Pumpilion
thought himself quite a model of humanity; and
piqued himself upon possessing much more of the
fortiter in re
than of the
suaviter in modo
a mistake,
the latter quality being latent, but abundant. He dreamed
that he was brimming with valour, and fit, not only to
lead squadrons to the field, but likewise to remain with
them when they were there. At the sound of drums and
trumpets, he perked up his chin, stuck out his breast,
straightened his vertebral column, and believed that he,
Pedrigo, was precisely the individual to storm a fortress
at the head of a forlorn hopea greater mistake. But
the greatest error of the whole troop of blunders was his
making a Pumpilion of Miss Seraphina Serena Dolce,
with the decided impression that he was, while sharing
his kingdom, to remain supreme in authority. Knowing
nothing of the theory already broached, he took her for
a feminine feminality, and yielded himself a victim to
sympathy and the general welfare. Now, in this,
strictly
considered, Pedrigo had none but himself to blame;
he had seen manifestations of her spirit; the latent energy
had peeped out more than once; he had entered
unexpectedly
,
before being installed as only my husband, and
found Miss Seraphina dancing the grand rigadoon on a
luckless bonnet which did not suit her fancy,a species
of exercise whereat he marvelled; and he had likewise
witnessed her performance of the remarkable feat of
whirling a cat, which had scratched her hand, across the
room by the tail, whereby the mirror was infinitesimally
divided into homopathic doses, and whereby pussy, the
patient, was most allopathically phlebotomised and
scarified
.
He likewise knew that her musical education
terminated
in an operatic crash, the lady having in a fit of
impatience demolished the guitar over the head of her
teacher; but, in this instance, the mitigating plea must
be allowed that it was done because the instrument
wouldn't play good, a perversity to which
instruments
,
like lessons which won't learn, are
lamentably
liable.
These little escapades, however, did not deter
Pumpilion
.
Confiding in his own talent for governing, he
liked his Seraphina none the less for her accidental
displays
of energy, and smiled to think how, under his
administration, his reproving frown would cast oil upon
the waves, and how, as he repressed her irritability, he
would develope her affections, results which would both
save the crockery and increase his comforts.
Of the Pumpilion
tactique
in courtship some idea may
be formed from the following conversation. Pedrigo
had an intimate associate, some years his senior,Mr.
Michael Mitts, a spare and emaciated bachelor, whose
hawk nose, crookedly set on, well represented the
eccentricity
of his conclusions, while the whistling pucker in
which he generally wore his mouth betokened acidity
of mind rendered sourer by indecision. Mitts was
addicted
to observation, and, engaged in the drawing of
inferences and in generalizing from individual instances,
he had, like many others, while trimming the safety
lamp of experience, suffered the time of action to pass
by unimproved. His cautiousness was so great as to
trammel up his motive power, and, though long
intending
to marry, the best part of his life had evaporated
in the unproductive employment of looking about.
His experience, therefore, had stored him with that
species of wisdom which one meets with in theoretical
wooers, and he had many learned saws at the
service
of those who were bolder than himself, and
were determined to enter the pale through which he
peeped.
As every one in love must have a confidant, Pedrigo
had selected Mitts for that office, knowing his peculiar
talent for giving advice, and laying down rules for others
to act upon.
Pedrigo, said Mitts, as he flexed his nose still further
from the right line of conformity to the usages of the
world, and slacked the drawing strings of his mouth to
get it out of pucker; Pedrigo, if you are resolved upon
marrying this identical individualI don't see the use, for
my part, of being in a hurrybetter look about a while;
plenty more of 'embut if you are resolved, the first
thing to be done is to make sure of her. That's
undeniable
.
The only difference of opinion, if you won't
wait and study charactercharacter's a noble study
is as to the
modus operandi
. Now, the lady's not sure
because she's committed; just the contrary,that's the
very reason she's not sure. My experience shows me
that when it's not so easy to retract, the attention,
especially that of young women, is drawn to
retraction
.
Somebody tells of a bird in a cage that grumbled
about being cooped up. It's clear to me that the bird
did not complain so much because it was in the cage, as
it did because it couldn't get outthat's bird nature, and
it's human nature too.
Ah, indeed! responded Pumpilion, with a smile of
confidence in his own attractions, mingled, however,
with a look which spoke that the philosophy of Mitts,
having for its object to render assurance double sure,
did not pass altogether unheeded.
It's a fact, added Mitts; don't be too secure.
Be as assiduous and as mellifluous as you please before
your divinity owns the soft impeachment; but afterwards
comes the second stage, and policy commands that it
should be one rather of anxiety to her. You must
every now and then play Captain Grand, or else she
may perform the part herself. Take offence frequently;
vary your Romeo scenes with an occasional touch of the
snow storm, and afterwards excuse yourself on the score
of jealous affection; that excuse always answers.
Nothing
sharpens love like a smart tiff by way of
embellishment
.
The sun itself would not look so bright if it were
not for the intervention of night; and these little
agitations
keep her mind tremulous, but intent upon yourself.
Don't mothers always love the naughtiest boys best?
haven't the worst men always the best wives? That
exemplifies the principle; there's nothing like a little
judicious bother. Miss Seraphina Serena will never
change her mind if bothered scientifically.
Perhaps so; but may it not be rather dangerous?
Dangerous! not at all; it's regular practice, I tell
you. A few cases may terminate unluckily; but that must
be charged to a bungle in the doctor. Why, properly
managed, a courtship may be continued, like a nervous
disease, or a suit at law, for twenty years, and be as
good at the close as it was at the beginning. In nine
cases out of ten, you must either perplex or be perplexed;
so you had better take the sure course, and play the
game yourself. Them's my sentiments, Mr. Speaker,
and Michael Mitts caused his lithe proboscis to oscillate
like a rudder, as he concluded his oracular speech, and
puckered his mouth to the whistling place to show that
he had shut up for the present. He then walked
slowly away, leaving Pumpilion with a new
wrinkle
.
Seraphina Serena, being both fiery and coquettish
withal, Pumpilion, under the direction of his preceptor,
tried the Mitts system of wooing, and although it
gave rise to frequent explosions, yet the quarrels, whether
owing to the correctness of the system or not, were
productive
of no lasting evil. Michael Mitts twirled his
nose and twisted his mouth in triumph at the wedding;
and set it down as an axiom that there is nothing like a
little insecurity for rendering parties firm in completing
a bargain; that, had it not been for practising the system,
Pumpilion might have become alarmed at the indications
of the latent spirit; and that, had it not been for the
practice of the system, Seraphina's fancy might have
strayed.
I'm an experimenter in mental operations, and there's
no lack of subjects, said Mitts to himself; one fact
being established, the Pumpilions now present a new
aspect.
There is, however, all the difference in the world
between carrying on warfare where you may advance
and retire at pleasure, and in prosecuting it in situations
which admit of no retreat. Partisan hostilities are one
thing, and regular warfare is another. Pumpilion was
very well as a guerilla, but his genius in that respect
was unavailing when the nature of the campaign did not
admit of his making an occasional demonstration, and of
evading the immediate consequences by a retreat. In a
very few weeks, he was reduced to the ranks as only
my husband, and, although no direct order of the day
was read to that effect, he was respected accordingly.
Before that retrograde promotion took place, Pedrigo
3
Pumpilion cultivated his hair, and encouraged its sneaking
inclination to curl until it woollied up quite fiercely; but
afterwards his locks became broken-heartedly pendent,
and straight with the weight of care, while his whiskers
hung back as if asking counsel and comfort from his
ears. He twiddled his thumbs with a slow rotary motion
as he sat, and he carried his hands clasped behind him
as he walked, thus intimating that he couldn't help it,
and that he didn't mean to try. For the same reason,
he never buttoned his coat, and wore no straps to the
feet of his trousers; both of which seemed too
energetically
resolute for only my husband.' Even his hat,
as it sat on the back part of his head, looked as if Mrs.
Pumpilion had put it on for him, (no one but the wearer
can put on a hat so that it will sit naturally,) and as if he
had not nerve enough even to shake it down to its
characteristic
place and physiognomical expression. His
personnel
loudly proclaimed that the Mitts method in
matrimony
had been a failure, and that the Queen had given
the King a check-mate. Mrs. Pumpilion had been
triumphant in acting upon the advice of her friend, the
widow, who, having the advantage of Mitts in combining
experience with theory, understood the art of breaking
husbands
merveille
.
My dear madam, said Mrs. Margery Daw, you
have plenty of spirit; but spirit is nothing without
steadiness
and perseverance. In the establishment of
authority
and in the assertion of one's rights, any intermission
before success is complete requires us to begin again.
If your talent leads you to the weeping method of
softening
your husband's heart, you will find that if you give
him a shower now and a shower then, he will harden in
the intervals between the rain; while a good sullen cry
of twenty-four hours' length may prevent any necessity
for another. If, on the contrary, you have genius for
the tempestuous, continued thunder and lightning for the
same length of time is irresistible. Gentlemen are great
swaggerers, if not impressively dealt with and early
taught to know their places. They are much like
Frisk, continued the widow, addressing her lap-dog.
If they bark, and you draw back frightened, they are
sure to bite; stamp your foot, and they soon learn to run
into a corner. Don't they, Frisky dear?
Ya-p! responded the dog: and Mrs. Pumpilion,
tired of control, took the concurrent advice.
To-morrow, said Pumpilion, carelessly and with
an of-course-ish air, as he returned to tea from a stroll
with his friend Michael Mitts, who had just been urging
upon him the propriety of continuing the Mitts method
after marriage, to-morrow, my love, I leave town for
a week to try a little trout fishing in the mountains.
Mr. Pumpilion! ejaculated the lady, in an awful
tone, as she suddenly faced him. Fishing?
Y-e-e-yes, replied Pumpilion, somewhat
discomposed
.
Then I shall go with you, Mr. Pumpilion, said
the lady, as she emphatically split a muffin.
Quite
on
possible, returned Pumpilion, with decisive
stress upon the first syllable; it's a buck party, if
I may use the expressiona back party entirely;
there's Mike Mitts, funny Joe Mungoozleson of old
Mungoozle's,Tommy Titcomb, and myself. We intend
having a rough and tumble among the hills to
beneficialise
our wholesomes, as funny Joe Mungoozle has it.
Funny Joe Mungoozle is not a fit companion for any
married man, Mr. Pumpilion; and it's easy to see, by
your sliding back among the dissolute friends and
dissolute
practices of your bachelorship, Mr. Pumpilionby
your wish to associate with sneering and depraved
Mungoozles
,
Mitts's, and Titcombs, Mr. Pumpilion, that the
society of your poor wife is losing its attractions, and
Mrs. Pumpilion sobbed convulsively at the thought.
I have given my word to go a fishing, replied
Pedrigo, rather ruefully, and a fishing I must go.
What would Mungoozle say?why, he would have a
song about it, and sing it at the `free and easies.'
What matter? let him saylet him sing. But it's
not my observationsit's those of funny Joe Mungoozle
that you care forthe affections of the `free and easy'
carousers that you are afraid of losing.
Mungoozle is a very particular friend of mine,
Seraphina
,
replied Pedrigo, rather nettled. We're going
a fishingthat's flat!
Without me?
Without you,it being a buck party, without
exception
.
Mrs. Pumpilion gave a shriek, and falling back, threw
out her arms
fitfully
the tea-pot went by the board, as
she made the tragic movement.
Wretched, unhappy woman! gasped Mrs.
Pumpilion
,
speaking of herself.
Pedrigo did not respond to the declaration, but
alternately
eyed the fragments of the tea-pot and the
untouched
muffin which remained on his plate. The
coup
had not been without its effect; but still he faintly
whispered
,
Funny Joe Mungoozle, and going a fishing.
It's clear you wish to kill meto break my heart,
muttered the lady in a spasmodic manner.
'Pon my soul, I don'tI'm only going a fishing.
I shall go distracted! screamed Mrs. Pumpilion,
suiting the action to the word, and springing to her feet
in such a way as to upset the table, and roll its contents
into Pedrigo's lap, who scrambled from the
debris
, as
his wife, with the air of the Pythoness, swept rapidly
round the room, whirling the ornaments to the floor, and
indulging in the grand rigadoon upon their sad remains.
You no longer love me, Pedrigo; and without your
love what is life? What is this, or this, or this,
continued
she, a crash following every word, without
mutual
affection?Going a fishing!
I don't know that I am, whined Pumpilion.
Perhaps
it will rain to-morrow.
Now it so happened that there were no clouds visible
on the occasion, except in the domestic atmosphere; but,
the rain was adroitly thrown in as a white flag,
indicative
of a wish to open a negotiation and come to terms.
Mrs. Pumpilion, however, understood the art of war
better
than to treat with rebels with arms in their hands.
Her military genius, no longer latent, whispered her
to persevere until she obtained a surrender at discretion.
Ah, Pedrigo, you only say that to deceive your
heart-broken wife. You intend to slip awayyou and
your Mungoozlesto pass your hours in roaring
iniquity
,
instead of enjoying the calm sunshine of domestic
peace, and the gentle delights of fireside felicity. They
are too tame, too flat, too insipid for a depraved taste.
That I should ever live to see the day! and she relapsed
into the intense style by way of a specimen of calm
delight
.
Mr. and Mrs. Pumpilion retired for the night at an
early hour; but until the dawn of day, the words of
reproach
,
now passionate, now pathetic, ceased not; and
in the very gray of the morning, Mrs. P. marched down
stairs
en dishabille
, still repeating ejaculations about the
Mungoozle fishing party. What happened below is not
3*
precisely ascertained; but there was a terrible turmoil in
the kitchen, it being perfectly clear a whole kettle of
fish was in preparation, that Pedrigo might not have the
trouble of going to the mountains on a piscatorial
expedition
.
He remained seated on the side of the bed, like
Marius
upon the ruins of Carthage, meditating upon the
situation of affairs, and balancing between a surrender to
petticoat government and his dread of Mongoozle's song
at the free and easies. At length he slipped down.
Mrs. Pumpilion sat glooming at the parlour window.
Pedrigo tried to read the Saturday News upside
down.
Good morning, Mr. Pumpilion! Going a fishing,
Mr. Pumpilion! Mike Mitts, funny Joe Mungoozle, and
Tommy Titcomb must be waiting for youyou know,
continued she with a mocking smile, you're to go this
morning to the mountains on a rough and tumble for the
benefit of your wholesomes. The elegance of the
phraseology
is quite in character with the whole affair.
Pedrigo was tired out; Mrs. Margery Daw's
perseverance
prescription had been too much for the Mitts
method; the widow had overmatched the bachelor.
No, Seraphina my dearest, I'm not going a fishing,
if you don't desire it, and I see you don't.
Not a word about its being likely to rainthe
surrender
was unconditional.
But, added Pedrigo, I should like to have a little
breakfast.
Mrs. Pumpilion was determined to clinch the nail.
There's to be no breakfast hereI've been talking
to Sally and Tommy in the kitchen, and I verily believe
the whole world's in a plot against me. They're gone,
Mr. Pumpiliongone a fishing, perhaps.
The battle was overthe victory was wonthe nail
was clinched. Tealess, sleepless, breakfastless, what
could Pedrigo do but sue for mercy, and abandon a
contest
waged against such hopeless odds? The supplies
being cut off, the siege-worn garrison must surrender.
After hours of solicitation, the kiss of amity was
reluctantly
accorded; on condition, however, that funny Joe
Mungoozle and the rest of the fishing party should be
given up, and that he, Pedrigo, for the future should
refrain from associating with bachelors and widowers,
both of whom she
tabooed
, and consort with none but
staid married men.
From this moment the individuality of that once free
agent, Pedrigo Pumpilion, was sunk into only my
husband
the
humblest of all humble animals. He fetches
and carries, goes errands, and lugs band-boxes and
bundles
;
he walks the little Pumpilions up and down the
room when they squall o' nights, and he never comes in
when any of his wife's distinguished friends call to visit
her. In truth, Pedrigo is not always in a presentable
condition; for as Mrs. Pumpilion is
de facto
treasurer,
he is kept upon rather short allowance, her wants being
paramount and proportioned to the dignity of head of the
family. But, although he is now dutiful enough, he at
first ventured once or twice to be refractory. These
symptoms of insubordination, however, were soon
quelledfor Mrs. Pumpilion, with a significant glance,
inquired,
Are you going a fishing again, my dear?
ORSON DABBS, THE HITTITE.
It
has been said, and truly, that it takes all sorts of
people to make a world. He who complains of the lights
and shades of character which are eternally flitting
before
him, and of the diversity of opposing interests
which at times cross his path, has but an illiberal,
contracted
view of the subject; and though the Emperor
Charles the Fifth, in his retirement at Estremadura, had
some reason for being a little annoyed when he could not
cause two or three score of watches to go together, yet
he was wrong in sighing over his previous ineffectual
efforts to make men think alike. It is, to speak
figuratively
,
the clashing which constitutes the music. The
harmony of the whole movement is produced by the
fusion into each other of an infinite variety of petty
discords
;
as a glass of punch depends for its excellence upon
the skilful commingling of opposing flavours and
antagonising
materials. Were the passengers in a wherry to
be of one mind, they would probably all sit upon the
same side, and hence, naturally, pay a visit to the Davy
Jones of the river; and if all the men of a nation thought
alike, it is perfectly evident that the ship of state must
lose her trim. The system of checks and balances
pervades
both the moral and the physical world, and without
it, affairs would soon hasten to their end. It is, therefore,
clear that we must have all sorts of people,some to
prevent
stagnation, and others to act as ballast to an excess
of animation. The steam engines of humanity must have
their breaks and their safety valves, and the dead weights
of society require the whip and the spur.
Orson Dabbs certainly is entitled to a place among the
stimulants of the world, and it is probable that in
exercising
his impulses, he produces beneficial effects. But it
would puzzle a philosopher to designate the wholesome
results which follow from his turbulent movements, or
to show, either by synthesis or analysis, wherein he is
a good. At all events, Orson Dabbs has the reputation
of being a troublesome fellow in the circles upon which
he inflicts himself; and, judging from the evidence
elicited
upon the subject, there is little reason to doubt the
fact. He is dogmatical, and to a certain extent fond of
argument; but when a few sharp words will not make
converts, he abandons those windy weapons with
contempt
,
and has recourse to more forcible persuadersa
pair of fists, each of which looks like a shoulder of
mutton.
If people are so obstinate that they won't, or so
stupid that they can't understand you, observed Dabbs,
in one of his confidential momentsfor Orson Dabbs
will sometimes unbend, and suffer those abstruse maxims
which govern his conduct to escapeif either for one
reason or the other, continued he, with that impressive
iteration which at once gives time to collect and marshal
one's thoughts, and lets the listener know that something
of moment is comingif they won't be convinced
easily and genteelly convincedyou must knock it into
'em short hand; if they can't comprehend, neither by
due course of mail, nor yet by express, you must make
'em understand by telegraph. That's the way I learnt
ciphering at school, and manners and genteel behaviour
at home. All I know was walloped into me. I took
larnin' through the skin, and sometimes they made a good
many holes to get it in.
And, timidly interjected an humble admirer of this
great man, hazarding a joke, with an insinuating smile;
and I s'pose you're so wise now because the hide
growed over it, and the larnin' couldn't get out, like
Ingey
ink in a sailor's arm.
Jeames, replied Orson Dabbs, relaxing into a grim
smile, like that of the griffin face of a knocker, and
shaking his bunch of fives sportively, as one snaps an
unloaded gunNapoleon tweaked the ears of his
courtiers
why
should not Dabbs shake his fist at his
satellites
?Jeames,
if you don't bequit poking fun at me,
I'll break your mouth, Jeames, as sure as you sit there.
But, to talk sensible, walloping is the only wayit's a
panacea for differences of opinion. You'll find it in
history
books, that one nation teaches another what it didn't
know before by walloping it; that's the method of
civilizing
savagesthe Romans put the whole world to rights
that way; and what's right on the big figger must be
right on the small scale. In short, there's nothing like
walloping for taking the conceit out of fellows who think
they know more than their betters. Put it to 'em strong,
and make 'em see out of their eyes.
Orson Dabbs acts up to these golden maxims. Seeing
that, from disputes between dogs up to quarrels between
nations, fighting is the grand umpire and regulator, he
resolves all power into that of the fist,treating bribery,
reason, and persuasion as the means only of those
unfortunate individuals to whom nature has denied the
stronger attributes of humanity. Nay, he even turns up
his nose at betting as a means of discovering truth.
Instead of stumping an antagonist by launching out his
cash, Dabbs shakes a portentous fist under his nose, and
the affair is settled; the recusant must either knock under
or be knocked down, which, according to our hero, is all
the same in Dutch. In this way, when politics ran
high, he used to decide who was to be elected to any
specified office; and he has often boasted that he once, in
less than five minutes too, scared a man into giving the
Dabbs candidate a large majority, when the unfortunate
stranger did not at first believe that the said candidate
would be elected at all.
Some people believe that the fist is the poorest of
arguments, and that it, therefore, should be the last.
Here they are completely at issue with Dabbs, and it is
well that they do not fall in his way, or he would soon
show them the difference. With him it is what action
was to the ancient orator, the first, the middle, and the
last. Being himself, in a great measure, fist proof, he
is very successful in the good work of proselytism, and
has quite a reputation as a straightforward reasoner and
a forcible dialectitian.
Misfortunes, however, will sometimes happen to the
most successful. The loftiest nose may be brought to
the grindstone, and the most scornful dog may be obliged
to lunch upon dirty pudding. Who can control his fate?
One night Mr. Dabbs came home from his loafing
placefor he loafs of an evening, like the generality
of peoplethat being the most popular and the cheapest
amusement extant; and, from the way he blurted open
the door of the Goose and Gridiron, where he resides,
and from the more unequivocal manner in which he
slammed
it after him, no doubt existed in the minds of his
fellow boarders that the well of his good spirits had been
riled; or, in more familiar phrase, that he was
spotty on the back. His hat was pitched forward,
with a bloodthirsty, piratical rakishness, and almost
covered his eyes, which gleamed like ignited charcoal
under a jeweller's blowpipe. His cheeks were flushed
with an angry spot, and his nosealways a quarrelsome
pugcurled more fiercely upward, as if the demon wrath
had turned archer, and was using it for a bow to draw
an arrow to its head. His mouth had set in opposition
to his nasal promontory, and savagely curved downward,
like a half-moon battery. Dabbs was decidedly out of
sortsperhaps beery, as well as wolfy; in short, in that
unenviable state in which a man feels disposed to divide
himself, and go to buffetsto kick himself with his own
footto beat himself with his own fist, and to throw his
own dinner out of the window.
The company were assembled round the fire to
discuss
politics, literature, men, and things. Dabbs looked
not at them, but, slinging Tommy Timid's bull terrier
Oseola out of the arm-chair in the corner, by the small
stump of a tail which fashion and the hatchet had left the
animal, he sat himself moodily down, with a force that
made the timbers creak. The conversation was turning
upon a recent brilliant display of the
aurora borealis
,
which the more philosophical of the party supposed to
arise from the north pole having become red-hot for
want of grease; while they all joined in deriding the
popular
fallacy that it was caused by the high price of flour.
Humph! said Dabbs, with a grunt, any fool
might know that it was a sign of war.
War! ejaculated the party; oh, your granny!
Yes, war! roared Dabbs, kicking the bull terrier
Oseola in the ribs, and striking the table a tremendous
blow with his fist, as, with clenched teeth and out-poked
head, he repeated, War! war! war!
Now the Goose and Gridiron fraternity set up for
knowing geniuses, and will not publicly acknowledge
faith in the doctrines on meterology broached by their
grandmothers, whatever they may think in private. So
they quietly remarked, confiding in their numbers against
the Orson Dabbs method of conversion, that the aurora
was not a sign of war, but an evidence of friction and
of no grease on the axle of the world.
That's a lie! shouted Dabbs; my story's the true
one, for I read it in an almanac; and to prove it true,
I'll lick anybody here that don't believe it, in two cracks
of a cow's thumb. Yes, added he, in reply to the looks
bent upon him; I'll not only wallop them that don't
believe it, but I'll wallop you all, whether you do or
not!
This, however, was a stretch of benevolence to which
the company were not prepared to submit. As Dabbs
squared off to proceed
secundum artem
, according to the
approved method of the schools, the watchful astrologer
might have seen his star grow pale. He had reached
his Waterloothat winter night was his 18th of June.
He fell, as many have fallen before him, by that implicit
reliance on his own powers which made him forgetful
of the risk of encountering the long odds. The threat
was too comprehensive, and the attempt at execution
was a failure. The company cuffed him heartily, and
in the fray the bull terrier Oseola vented its cherished
wrath by biting a piece out of the fleshiest portion of his
frame. Dabbs was ousted by a summary process, but
his heart did not fail him. He thundered at the door,
sometimes with his fists, and again with whatever missiles
were within reach. The barking of the dog and the
laughter from within, as was once remarked of certain
military heroes, did not intimate him in the least,
it only estimated him.
The noise at last became so great that a watchman
4
finally summoned up resolution enough to come near,
and to take Dabbs by the arm.
Let go, watchy!let go, my cauliflower! Your
cocoa is very near a sledge-hammer. If it isn't hard, it
may get cracked.
Pooh! pooh! don't be onasy, my darlintmy
cocoa is a corporation cocoait belongs to the city, and
they'll get me a new one. Besides, my jewel, there's
two cocoas standing here, you know. Don't be onasy
it mayn't be mine that will get cracked.
I ain't onasy, said Dabbs, bitterly, as he turned
fiercely round. I ain't onasy. I only want to caution
you, or I'll upset your apple cart, and spill your peaches.
I'm not in the wegetable way, my own-self, Mr.
Horse-radish. You must make less noise.
Now, look herelook at me well, said Dabbs,
striking
his fist hard upon his own bosom; I'm a real nine
foot breast of a fellowstub twisted and made of
horse-shoe
nailsthe rest of me is cast iron with steel springs.
I'll stave my fist right through you, and carry you on
my elbow, as easily as if you were an empty market
basketI willbile me up for soap if I don't!
Ah, indeed! why, you must be a real
Calcutta-from-Canting
,
warranted not to cut in the eye. Snakes is no
touch to you; but I'm sorry to say you must knuckle
down close. You must surrender; there's no help for
itnone in the world.
Square yourself then, for I'm coming! Don't you
hear the clockvorks! exclaimed Dabbs, as he shook
off the grip of the officer, and struck an attitude.
He stood beautifully; feet well set; guard well up;
admirable science, yet fearful to look upon. Like the
Adriatic, Dabbs was lovelily dreadful on this exciting
occasion. But when Greek meets Greek, fierce looks
and appalling circumstances amount to nothing. The
opponent of our hero, after regarding him coolly for a
moment, whistled with great contempt, and with
provoking
composure, beat down his guard with a smart blow
from a heavy mace, saying,
'Taint no use, no howyou're all used up for bait.
Ouch! shrieked Dabbs; my eye, how it hurts!
Don't hit me again. Ah, good man, but you're a bruiser.
One, two, three, from you would make a person believe
any thing, even if he was sure it wasn't true.
Very well, remarked the
macerator
, all I want
of you is to behave nice and genteel, and believe you're
going to the watch'us, for it's true; and if you don't
believe it yet, why (shaking his mace) I shall feel
obligated to conwince you again.
As this was arguing with him after his own method,
and as Dabbs had distinct impressions of the force of
the reasoning, he shrugged his shoulders, and then
rubbing his arms, muttered, Enough said.
He trotted off quietly for the first time in his life.
Since the affair and its consequences have passed away,
he has been somewhat chary of entering into the field of
argument, and particularly careful not to drink too much
cold water, for fear the bull terrier before referred to was
mad, and dreading hydrophobic convulsions.
ROCKY SMALT;
OR, THE DANGERS OF IMITATION.
Man
is an imitative animal, and so strong is the
instinctive feeling to follow in the footsteps of others,
that he who is so fortunate as to strike out a new path
must travel rapidly, if he would avoid being run down by
imitators, and preserve the merit of originality. If his
discovery be a good one, the
servum pecus
will sweep
toward it like an avalanche; and so quick will be their
motion, that the daring spirit who first had the
self-reliance
to turn from the beaten track, is in danger of
being lost among the crowd, and of having his claim to
the honours of a discoverer doubted and derided. Turn
where you will, the imitative propensity is to be
found busily at work; its votaries clustering round the
falcon to obtain a portion of the quarry which the nobler
bird has stricken; and perhaps, like Sir John Falstaff,
to deal the prize a new wound in the thigh, and
falsely claim the wreath of victory. In the useful arts,
there are thousands of instances in which the real
discoverer
has been thrust aside to give place to the
imitator
;
and in every other branch in which human
ingenuity
has been exercised, if the flock of copyists do not
obtain the patent right of fame, they soon, where it is
practicable, wear out the novelty, and measurably deprive
the inventor of the consideration to which he is entitled.
In the apportionment of applause, the praise too often
depends upon which is first seen, the statue or the cast
although the one be marble, and the other plaster.
In business, no one can hope to recommend his wares
to patronage in a new and taking way, no matter what
outlay of thought has been required for its invention,
without finding multitudes prompt in the adoption of
the same device. He who travels by a fresh and
verdant
path in literature, and is successful, soon hears the
murmurs of a pursuing troop, and has his by-way
converted
into a dusty turnpike, macadamized on the
principle
of writing made easy; while, on the stage, the
drama groans with great ones at second-hand. The
illustrious in tragedy can designate an army of those,
who, unable to retail their beauties, strive for renown by
exaggerating their defects; and Thalia has even seen her
female aids cut off their flowing locks, and teach
themselves
to wriggle, because she who was in fashion wore
a crop, and had adopted a gait after her own fancy.
It is to this principle that a professional look is
attributable
.
In striving to emulate the excellence of another,
the student thinks he has made an important step if he
can catch the air, manner, and tone of his model; and
believes that he is in a fair way to acquire equal wisdom,
if he can assume the same expression of the face, and
compass the same hang of the nether lip. We have
seen a pupil endeavouring to help himself onward in
the race for distinction by wearing a coat similar in cut
and colour to that wherewith his preceptor indued
himself; and we remember the time when whole classes
at a certain eastern university became a regiment of
ugly Dromios, lengthening their visages, and smoothing
their hair down to their eyes, for no other reason than
4*
that an eminent and popular professor chose to display
his frontispiece after that fashionand that, as they
emulated his literary abilities, they, therefore, thought it
advantageous to imitate his personal defects. When
Byron's fame was in the zenith, poetic scribblers dealt
liberally in shirt collar, and sported an expanse of neck;
and when Waterloo heroes were the wonders of the
hour, every town in England could show its limpers and
hobblers, who, innocent of war, would fain have passed
for men damaged by the French. On similar grounds,
humps, squints, impediments of speech, mouths awry,
and limbs distorted, have been the rage.
How then could Orson Dabbs, the Hittite, admired
and peculiar as he was, both for his ways and for his
opinions, hope to escape imitation? If he entertained
such a belief, it was folly; and if he dreamed that he
could so thump the world as to preserve his originality,
it was a mere delusion. Among the many who
frequented
the Goose and Gridiron, where Orson
resided
,
was one Rocky Smalt, whose early admiration
for the great one it is beyond the power of words to
utter, though subsequent events converted that
admiration
into hostility. Rocky Smalt had long listened with
delight to Orson's lectures upon the best method of
removing difficulties, which, according to him, is by
thumping them down, as a paviour smooths the streets;
and as Orson descanted, and shook his fists in
exemplification
of the text, the soul of Rocky, like a bean in a
bottle, swelled within him to put these sublime doctrines
in practice.
Now, it unluckily happens that Rocky Smalt is a
very little manone of the feather weightswhich
militates somewhat against the gratification of his
pugilistic
desires, insomuch that if he squares off at a big
fellow, he is obliged, in dealing a facer, to hit his
antagonist
on the knee; and a blow given there, everybody
knows, neither bungs a peeper nor taps a smeller.
But Rocky, being to a certain degree aware of his
gladiatorial
deficiencies, is rather theoretical than practical;
that is, he talks much more than he battles. His
narratives
,
differing from himself, are colossal; and as
Colossus
stood with one foot on one side, and with the other
foot on the other side, so do Rocky's speeches refer to
the past and to the futureto what he has done, and to
what he means to do. He is now retrospective, and
again prospective, in talking of personal contention, his
combats never being present, which is by far the most
agreeable method of obtaining reputation, as we thereby
avoid the inconvenience of pricking our fingers in
gathering
glory.
Rocky, in copying Dabbs as to his belligerent
principles
,
is likewise careful to do the same, as far as it is
possible, in relation to personal appearance. He is,
therefore, a pocket Dabbsa miniature Orson. He
cultivates whiskers to the apex of the chin; and although
they are not very luxuriant, they make up in length
what they want in thickness. He cocks his hat fiercely,
rolls in his gait, and, with doubled fists, carries his arms
in the muscular curve, elbows pointing outward, and
each arm forming the segment of a circle. He slams
doors after him, kicks little dogs, and swears at little
boys, as Orson does. If any one runs against him, he
waits until the offender is out of hearing, and then
denounces him in the most energetic expletives
belonging
to the language, and is altogether a vinaigrette of
wrath. It is the combat only that bothers Smalt; if it
were not for that link in the chain of progression from
defiance to victory, he would indeed be a most truculent
hero, and deserve a salary from all the nose menders
about town, whether natural bone-setters or gristle-tinkers
by commissionwere it not for that, Larrey's Military
Surgery would be in continual demand, as a guide to the
cure of contusions, and so great would be the application
of oysters to the eye, that there would be a scarcity of
shell-fish.
Sometimes, however, Smalt's flaming ardour
precipitates
him into a quarrel; but, even then, he manages
matters very adroitly, by selecting the largest individual
of the opposite faction for his antagonist.
Come on! shrieks Smalt, in such an emergency;
come on! I'll lick any thing near my own weight. I'll
chaw up any indewidooal that's fairly my matchyes,
and give him ten pounds. I ain't petickelar, when it's
a matter of accommodation. Whe-e-w! fire away!
But, as Rocky's weight is just ninety-four pounds,
counting boots, hat, dead-latch key, pennies, fips, clothes,
and a little bit of cavendish, he is certain to escape; for
even the most valiant may be excused from encountering
the long odds in a pitched battle, although he may
sometimes
run against them in a crowded chance-medley.
Rocky, therefore, puts on his coat again, puffing and
blowing like a porpoise, as he walks vapouring about, and
repeating with an occasional attitude
a la
Orson Dabbs,
Any thing in reasonand a little chucked in to
accommodate
when
I'm wound up, it 'most takes a stone wall to
stop me, for I go right through the timberthat's me!
Yet these happy days of theoretical championship at
length were clouded. Science avails nothing against
love: Dan Cupid laughs at sparring, and beats down the
most perfect guard. It so fell out that Orson Dabbs and
Rocky Smalt both were smitten with the tender passion
at the same time, the complaint perhaps being epidemic
at the season. This, however, though individually
troublesome, as the disorder is understood to be a sharp
one, would not have been productive of discord between
them, had it not unluckily happened that they became
enamoured of the same fair damosel. Two warriors
and but one lady!not one lady
per
piece, to speak
commercially, but one lady
per
pair. This was
embarrassing
this
was dangerous. Miss Araminta Stycke
or Miss Mint Stycke, as she was sometimes more sweetly
termedcould not, according to legal enactments, marry
both the gentlemen in question; and as each was
determined
to have her entire, the situation was decidely
perplexing
,
essentially bothering, and effectively dramatic,
which, however amusing to the looker-on, is the
ne plus
ultra
of discomfort to those who form the tableau. Miss
Araminta could doubtless have been very happy with
either, were t'other dear charmer away; but this was
out of the question; for, when Dabbs on one side stuck
to Stycke, Smalt on the other side just as assiduously
stuck to Stycke, and both stickled stoutly for her
smiles.
My dear Mint Stycke, said Rocky Smalt, at a tea
party, taking hold of a dish of plums nicely done in
molasses
my
dear Mint Stycke, allow me to help you to
a small few of the goodies.
Minty, my darling! observed Dabbs, who sat on
her left hand, Rocky being on the rightMinty my
darling, repeated Dabbs, with that dashing familiarity
so becoming in a majestic personage, as he stretched
forth his hand, and likewise grasped the dish of plums,
I insist upon helping you myself.
The consequence was an illustration of the
embarras
of having two lovers on the ground at the same time.
The plums were spilt in such a way as to render Miss
Stycke sweeter that ever, by giving sweets to the
sweet; but the young lady was by no means so pretty
to look at as she had been before the ceremony.
Of the twain, she most affected Dabbs, of which
Rocky was not a little jealous.
Minty, I don't care for Dabbs, said Rocky, in heroic
tones; big as he is, if he comes here too often a crossing
me, he'll ketch it. I'll thump him, Minty, I willfeed
me on hay, if I don't.
Minty laughed, and well she might, for just then Orson
arrived, and, walking into the room, scowled fiercely at
Smalt, who suddenly remembered he had to go
somewheres
,
and promised to be there earlyhe must go, as
it was a'most late now.
He thump me! said Dabbs, with a supercilious
smile, when Minty repeated the threat. The next time
I meet that chap, I'll take my stick and kill itI'll sqush
it with my foot.
Unhappily for the serenity of his mind, Rocky Smalt
had his ear at the key hole when this awful threat was
made, and he quaked to hear it, not doubting that Dabbs
would be as good as his word. He, therefore, fled
instanter
,
and roamed about like a perturbed spirit; now
travelling
quicklyanon pausing to remember the frightful
words, and, as they rushed vividly to mind, he would
hop-scotch convulsively and dart off like an arrow, the
whole being done in a style similar to that of a fish which
has indulged in a frolic upon
cocculus indicus
. In the
course of his eccentric rambles, he stopped in at various
places, and, either from that cause, or some other which
has not been ascertained, he waxed valiant a little after
midnight. But, as his spirits rose, his locomotive
propensity
appeared to decrease, and he, at length, sat down
on a step.
So! soliloquized our hero: he intends to belt me,
does he? Take a sticksqush with his footand calls
me `it'`it' right before Minty! Powers of wengeance,
settle on my fist, take aim with my knuckles, and shoot
him in the eye! If I wasn't so tired, and if I hadn't a
little touch of my family disorder, I'd start after him. I'd
go and dun him for the hiding; and if he'd only squat, or
let me stand on a chair, I'd give him a receipt in full,
right in the face, under my own hand and seal. I'd
knock him this-er way, and I'd whack him that-er way,
till you couldn't tell which end of his head his face
was on.
Smalt suited the action to the word, and threw out his
blows, right and left, with great vigour.
Suddenly, however, he felt a heavy hand grasp his
shoulder, and give him a severe shake, while a deep gruff
voice exclaimed:
Halloo! what the deuse are you about? You'll tear
your coat.
Ah! ejaculated Smalt, with a convulsive start;
oh, don't! I holler enough!
Why, little 'un, you must be cracked, if you flunk
out before we begin. Holler enough, indeed! nobody's
guv' you any yet.
Ah! gasped Smalt, turning round; I took you
for Orson Dabbs. I promised, when I cotch'd him, to
give him a licking, and I was werry much afeard I'd
have to break the peace. Breaking the peace is a werry
disagreeable thing fur to do; but I mustI'm conshensis
about itwhen I ketches Orson. Somebody ought to
tell him to keep out of the way, fur fear I'll have to break
the peace.
It wouldn't do to kick up a rowbut I'm thinking
it would be a little
piece
, if you could break it. I'll
carry home all the pieces you break off, in my
waistcoat
pocket. You're only a pocket piece yourself.
Nobody asked your opinionsgo 'way. I've got a
job of thinking to do, and I musn't be disturbedtalking
puts me out. Paddle, steamboat, or
Take keerdon't persume, was the impressive
reply; I'm a 'fishal functionary out a ketching of dogs.
You musn't cut up because it's night. The mayor and
the 'squires have gone to bed; but the law is a thing
that never gets asleep. After ten o'clock, the law is a
watchman and a dog ketcherwe're the whole law till
breakfast's a'most ready.
You only want bristles to be another sort of a whole
animal, muttered Smalt.
Whew! confound your little kerkus, what do you
mean? I'd hit you unofficially, if there was any use in
pegging at a fly.
Smalt began to feel uneasy; so, taking the hint
conveyed
in the word fly, he made a spring as the
commencement
of a retreat from one who talked so fiercely
and so disrespectfully. But he had miscalculated his
powers. After running a few steps, his apprehensions
overthrew him, and his persecutor walking up, said:
Oh! you stumpy little peace-breaker, I knows what
you have been aboutyou've been drinking.
You
nose
it, hey?much good may it do you.
Can't a man wet his whistle without your nosing it?
No, you can'tit's agin the law, which is very full
upon this pint.
Pint! Not the half of itI haven't got the stowage
room.
The ketcher laughed, for, notwithstanding their
sanguinary profession, ketchers, like Lord Norbury, are
said to love a joke, and to indulge in merriment,
whenever
the boys are not near. He therefore picked up
Smalt, and placing him upon his knee, remarked as
follows:
You're a clever enough kind of little feller, sonny;
but you ain't been eddicated to the law as I have; so I'll
give you a lecture. Justice vinks at vot it can't see, and
lets them off vot it can't ketch. When you want to break
it, you must dodge. You may do what you like in your
own house, and the law don't know nothing about the
matter. But never go thumping and bumping about
the streets, when you are primed and snapped. That's
intemperance, and the other is temperance. But now you
come under the muzzle of the ordinanceyou're a
loafer.
Now, look hereI'll tell you the truth. Orson
Dabbs swears he'll belt meyes, he calls me `it'he
said he'd sqush me with his foothe'd take a stick and
kill `it'me, I mean. What am I to do?there'll be a
fight, and Dabbs will get hurt.
He can't do what he saysthe law declares he
musn't; and if he does, it isn't any great matterhe'll
be put in limbo, you know.
This, however, was a species of comfort which had
very little effect upon Smalt. He cared nothing about
what might be done with Orson Dabbs after Orson had
done for him.
His new friend, however, proved, as Smalt classically
remarked, to be like a singed cat, much better than he
looked, for he conducted the Lilliputian hero home, and,
bundling him into the entry, left him there in comfort.
Rocky afterwards removed to another part of the town,
for the purpose of keeping clear of his enemy, and, with
many struggles, yielded the palm in relation to Miss
Araminta Stycke, who soon became Mrs. Orson Dabbs.
5
After this event, Rocky Smalt, who is not above the
useful employment of gathering a little wisdom from
experience, changed his system, and now speaks
belligerently
only in reference to the past, his gasconading
stories invariably beginning, A few years ago, when I
was a fighting carackter.
UNDEVELOPED GENIUS.
A PASSAGE IN THE LIFE OF P. PILGARLICK
PIGWIGGEN, ESQ.
The
world has heard much of unwritten music, and
more of unpaid debts; a brace of unsubstantialities, in
which very little faith is reposed. The minor poets
have twangled their lyres about the one, until the sound
has grown wearisome, and until, for the sake of peace and
quietness, we heartily wish that unwritten music were
fairly written down, and published in Willig's or Blake's
best style, even at the risk of hearing it reverberate from
every piano in the city: while iron-visaged creditors
all creditors are of course hard, both in face and in
heart, or they would not ask for their moneyhave
chattered of unpaid debts, ever since the flood, with a wet
finger, was uncivil enough to wipe out pre-existing scores,
and extend to each skulking debtor the benefit of the
act. But
undeveloped genius
, which is, in fact, itself
unwritten music, and is very closely allied to unpaid
debts, has, as yet, neither poet, trumpeter, nor biographer.
Gray, indeed, hinted at it in speaking of village
Hampdens
,
mute inglorious Miltons, and Cromwells
guiltless, which showed him to be man of some
discernment
,
and possessed of inklings of the truth. But
the general science of mental geology, and through that,
the equally important details of mental mineralogy and
mental metallurgy, to ascertain the unseen substratum
of intellect, and to determine its innate wealth, are as
yet unborn; or, if phrenology be admitted as a branch
of these sciences, are still in uncertain infancy.
Undeveloped
genius, therefore, is still undeveloped, and is
likely to remain so, unless this treatise should awaken
some capable and intrepid spirit to prosecute an
investigation
at once so momentous and so interesting. If not,
much of it will pass through the world undiscovered and
unsuspected; while the small remainder can manifest
itself in no other way than by the aid of a convulsion,
turning its possessor inside out like a glove; a method,
which the earth itself was ultimately compelled to adopt,
that stupid man might be made to see what treasures
are to be had for the digging.
There are many reasons why genius so often remains
invisible. The owner is frequently unconscious of the
jewel in his possession, and is indebted to chance for
the discovery. Of this, Patrick Henry was a striking
instance. After he had failed as a shopkeeper, and was
compelled to hoe corn and dig potatoes, alone on his
little farm, to obtain a meagre subsistence for his family,
he little dreamed that he had that within, which would
enable him to shake the throne of a distant tyrant, and
nerve the arm of struggling patriots. Sometimes,
however
,
the possessor is conscious of his gift, but it is to
him as the celebrated anchor was to the Dutchman; he
can neither use nor exhibit it. The illustrious Thomas
Erskine, in his first attempt at the bar, made so signal a
failure as to elicit the pity of the good natured, and the
scorn and contempt of the less feeling part of the auditory.
Nothing daunted, however, for he felt undeveloped
genius strong within him, he left the court; muttering,
with more profanity than was proper, but with much
truth, By ! it is in me, and it shall come out!
He was right; it was in him; he did get it out, and
rose to be Lord Chancellor of England.
But there are men less fortunate; as gifted as Erskine,
though perhaps in a different way, they swear frequently,
as he did, but they cannot get their genius out. They
feel it, like a rat in a cage, beating against their barring
ribs, in a vain struggle to escape; and thus, with the
materials for building a reputation, and standing high
among the sons of song and eloquence, they pass their
lives in obscurity, regarded by the few who are aware
of their existence, as simpletonsfellows sent upon the
stage solely to fill up the grouping, to applaud their
superiors, to eat, sleep, and die.
P. Pilgarlick Pigwiggen
, Esq., as he loves to be
styled, is one of these unfortunate undeveloped
gentlemen
about town. The arrangement of his name shows
him to be no common man. Peter P. Pigwiggen would
be nothing, except a hailing title to call him to dinner,
or to insure the safe arrival of dunning letters and tailors'
bills. There is as little character about it as about the
word Towser, the individuality of which has been lost
by indiscriminate application. To all intents and
purposes
,
he might just as well be addressed as You Pete
Pigwiggen, after the tender maternal fashion, in which,
in his youthful days, he was required to quit dabbling in
the gutter, to come home and be spanked. But
P. Pilgarlick Pigwiggen, Esq.
5*
the aristocracy of birth and genius is all about it. The
very letters seem tasselled and fringed with the cobwebs
of antiquity. The flesh creeps with awe at the sound,
and the atmosphere undergoes a sensible change, as at
the rarefying approach of a supernatural being. It
penetrates
the hearer at each perspiratory pore. The
dropping
of the antempenultimate in a man's name, and the
substitution of an initial therefor, has an influence which
cannot be definedan influence peculiary strong in the
case of P. Pilgarlick Pigwiggenthe influence of
undeveloped
geniusanalogous to that which bent the hazel
rod, in the hand of Dousterswivel, in the ruins of St.
Ruth, and told of undeveloped water.
But to avoid digression, or rather to return from a
ramble
in the fields of nomenclature, P. Pilgarlick
Pigwiggen
is an undeveloped geniusa wasted man; his talents
are like money in a strong box, returning no interest. He
is, in truth, a species of Byron in the egg: but unable to
chip the shell, his genius remains unhatched. The
chicken moves and faintly chirps within, but no one sees
it, no one heeds it. Peter feels the high aspirations and
the mysterious imaginings of poesy circling about the
interior of his cranium; but there they stay. When he
attempts to give them utterance, he finds that nature
forgot
to bore out the passage which carries thought to the
tongue and to the finger ends; and as art has not yet
found out the method of tunnelling or of driving a drift
into the brain, to remedy such defects, and act as a
general
jail delivery to the prisoners of the mind, his divine
conceptions continue pent in their osseous cell. In vain
does Pigwiggen sigh for a
splitting
headacheone that
shall ope the sutures, and set his fancies free. In vain
does he shave his forehead and turn down his shirt
collar
,
in hope of finding the poetic vomitory, and of leaving
it clear of impediment; in vain does he drink vast
quantities
of gin to raise the steam so high that it may burst
imagination's boiler, and suffer a few drops of it to
escape; in vain does he sit up late o' nights, using all
the cigars he can lay his hands on, to smoke out the
secret. 'Tis useless all. No sooner has he spread the
paper, and seized the pen to give bodily shape to airy
dreams, than a dull dead blank succeeds. As if a flourish
of the quill were the crowing of a rooster, the dainty
Ariels of his imagination vanish. The feather drops
from his checked fingers, the paper remains unstained,
and P. Pilgarlick Pigwiggen is still an undeveloped
genius.
Originally a grocer's boy, Peter early felt he had a
soul above soap and candles, and he so diligently
nourished
it with his master's sugar, figs, and brandy, that
early one morning he was unceremoniously dismissed
with something more substantial than a flea in his ear.
His subsequent life was passed in various callings; but
call as loudly as they would, our hero paid little attention
to their voice. He had an eagle's longings, and with an
inclination to stare the sun out of countenance, it was
not to be expected that he would stoop to be a barn-yard
fowl. Working when he could not help it; at times
pursuing check speculations at the theatre doors, by
way of turning an honest penny, and now and then
gaining entrance by crooked means, to feed his faculties
with a view of the performances, he likewise pursued
his studies through all the ballads in the market, until
qualified to read the pages of Moore and Byron.
Glowing with ambition, he sometimes pined to see
the poet's corner of our weekly periodicals graced
with his effusions. But though murder may out, his
undeveloped genius would not. Execution fell so far
short of conception, that his lyrics were invariably
rejected.
Deep, but unsatisfactory, were the reflections which
thence arose in the breast of Pigwiggen.
How is it, said hehow is it I can't level down
my expressions to the comprehension of the vulgar, or
level up the vulgar to a comprehension of my
expressions
?
How is it I can't get the spigot out, so my
verses will run clear? I know what I mean myself, but
nobody else does, and the impudent editors say it's
wasting
room to print what nobody understands. I've plenty
of geniuslots of it, for I often want to cut my throat,
and would have done it long ago, only it hurts. I'm
chock full of genius and running over; for I hate all sorts
of work myself, and all sorts of people mean enough to
do it. I hate going to bed, and I hate getting up. My
conduct is very eccentric and singular. I have the
miserable
melancholics all the time, and I'm pretty nearly
always as cross as thunder, which is a sure sign.
Genius is as tender as a skinned cat, and flies into a
passion whenever you touch it. When I condescend to
unbuzzum myself, for a little sympathy, to folks of ornery
intellectand caparisoned to me, I know very few
people that ar'n't ornery as to brainsand pour forth
the feelings indigginus to a poetic soul, which is always
biling, they ludicrate my sitiation, and say they don't
know what the deuse I'm driving at. Isn't genius
always
served o' this fashion in the earth, as Hamlet, the boy
after my own heart, says? And when the slights of the
world, and of the printers, set me in a fine frenzy, and
my soul swells and swells, till it almost tears the shirt
off my buzzum, and even fractures my dickeywhen it
expansuates and elevates me above the common herd,
they laugh again, and tell me not to be pompious. The
poor plebinians and worse than Russian scurfs!It is
the fate of geniusit is his'n, or rather I should say,
her'nto go through life with little sympathization and
less cash. Life's a field of blackberry and raspberry
bushes. Mean people squat down and pick the fruit,
no matter how they black their fingers; while genius,
proud and perpendicular, strides fiercely on, and gets
nothing but scratches and holes tore in its trousers.
These things are the fate of genius, and when you see
'em, there is genius too, although the editors won't
publish
its articles. These things are its premonitories, its
janissaries, its cohorts, and its consorts.
But yet, though in flames in my interiors, I can't
get it out. If I catch a subject, while I am looking at it,
I can't find words to put it in; and when I let go, to hunt
for words, the subject is off like a shot. Sometimes I
have plenty of words, but then there is either no ideas,
or else there is such a waterworks and cataract of them,
that when I catch one, the others knock it out of my
fingers. My genius is good, but my mind is not
sufficiently
manured by 'ears.
Pigwiggen, waiting it may be till sufficiently
manured
to note his thoughts, was seen one fine morning
not long since, at the corner of the street, with a
melancholy
,
abstracted air, the general character of his
appearance. His garments were of a rusty black, much
the worse for wear. His coat was buttoned up to the
throat, probably for a reason more cogent than that of
showing the moulding of his chest, and a black
handkerchief
enveloped his neck. Not a particle of white
was to be seen about him; not that we mean to infer
that his sark would not have answered to its name, if
the muster roll of his attire had been called, for we scorn
to speak of a citizen's domestic relations, and, until the
contrary is proved, we hold it but charity to believe that
every man has as many shirts as backs. Peter's cheeks
were pale and hollow; his eyes sunken, and neither
soap nor razor had kissed his lips for a week. His
hands were in his pocketsthey had the accommodation
all to themselvesnothing else was there.
Is your name Peter P. Pigwiggen? inquired a
man, with a stick, which he grasped in the middle.
My name is P. Pilgarlick Pigwiggen, if you please,
my good friend, replied our hero, with a flush of
indignation
at being miscalled.
You'll do, was the nonchalant response; and the
man with a stick drew forth a parallelogram of paper,
curiously inscribed with characters, partly written and
partly printed, of which the words, The commonwealth
greeting, were strikingly visible; you'll do, Mr. P.
Pilgarlick Pigwiggen Peter. That's a
capias ad
respondendum
,
the English of which is, you're cotched because
you can't pay; only they put it in Greek, so's not to
hurt a gentleman's feelings, and make him feel flat afore
the company. I can't say much for the manners of the
big courts, but the way the law's polite and a squire's
office is genteel, when the thing is under a hundred
dollars, is cautionary.
There was little to be said. Peter yielded at once.
His landlady, with little respect for the incipient Byron,
had turned him out that morning, and had likewise sent
the man with a stick to arrest the course of
undeveloped
genius. Peter walked before, and he of the taking
way strolled leisurely behind.
It's the fate of genius, squire. The money is owed.
But how can I help it? I can't live without eating and
sleeping. If I wasn't to do those functionaries, it would
be suicide, severe beyond circumflexion.
Well, you know, you must either pay or go to jail.
`Now, squire, as a friendI can't pay, and I don't
admire jailas a friend, now.
Got any bail?No!what's your tradewhat name
is it?
Poesy, was the laconic, but dignified reply.
Pusey?Yes, I remember Pusey. You're in the
shoe-cleaning line, somewhere in Fourth street. Pusey,
boots and shoes cleaned here. Getting whiter, ar'n't
you? I thought Pusey was a little darker in the
countenance
.
P-o-e-s-y! roared Peter, spelling the word at the
top of his voice; I'm a poet.
Well, Posy, I suppose you don't write for nothing.
Why didn't you pay your landlady out of what you
received for your books, Posy?
My genius ain't developed. I haven't written any
thing yet. Only wait till my mind is manured, so I can
catch the idea, and I'll pay off all old scores.
'Twont do, Posy. I don't understand it at all.
You must go and find a little undeveloped bail, or I
must send you to prison. The officer will go with you.
But stay; there's Mr. Grubson in the cornerperhaps
he will bail you.
Grubson looked unpromising. He had fallen asleep,
and the flies hummed about his sulky copper-coloured
visage, laughing at his unconscious drowsy efforts to
drive them away. He was aroused by Pilgarlick, who
insinuatingly preferred the request.
I'll see you hanged first, replied Mr. Grubson; I
goes bail for nobody. I'm undeveloped myself on that
subject,not but that I have the greatest respect for you
in the world, but the most of people's cheats.
You see, Posy, the development won't answer.
You must try out of doors. The officer will go with
you.
Squire, as a friend, excuse me, said Pilgarlick.
But the truth of the matter is this. I'm delicate about
being seen in the street with a constable. I'm principled
against it. The reputation which I'm going to get might
be injured by it. Wouldn't it be pretty much the same
thing, if Mr. Grubson was to go with the officer, and get
me a little bail?
I'm delicate myself, growled Grubson; I'm
principled
again that too. Every man walk about on his own
'sponsibility; every man bail his own boat. You might
jist as well ask me to swallow your physic, or take your
thrashings.
Alas! Pilgarlick knew that his boat was past bailing.
Few are the friends of genius in any of its stagesvery
few are they when it is undeveloped. He, therefore,
consented to sojourn in Arch west of Broad, until the
whitewashing process could be performed, on condition
he were taken there by the alley way; for he still
looks ahead to the day, when a hot-pressed volume shall
be published by the leading booksellers, entitled Poems,
by P. Pilgarlick Pigwiggen, Esq.
THE BEST-NATURED MAN IN THE
WORLD.
A yielding
temper, when not carefully watched and
curbed, is one of the most dangerous of faults. Like
unregulated
generosity, it is apt to carry its owner into a
thousand difficulties, and, too frequently, to hurry him
into vices, if not into crimes. But as it is of advantage
to others while inflicting injury upon its possessor, it
has, by the common consent of mankind, received a fine
name, which covers its follies and promotes its growth.
This easiness of disposition, which is a compound of
indolence
,
vanity, and irresolution, is known and applauded
as good-nature; and, to have reached the superlative
degree, so as to be called the best-natured fellow in the
worldalmost too good-natured for his own good, is
regarded as a lofty merit. When applied to the proper
person, though the recipient says nothing, it may be
seen that it thrills him with delight; the colour
heightens
on his cheek; and the humid brilliance of his eye
speaks him ready to weep with joy over his own fancied
perfections, and to outdo all his former outdoings. He
is warmed through by the phrase, as if he had been
feasting
upon preserved ginger, and he luxuriates upon the
sensation, without counting the cost, and without
calculating
the future sacrifices which it requires. He seldom
sees why he is thus praised. He is content that it is so,
6
without inquiring into the process by which it was
brought about. It is enough for him that he is the
best-natured
fellow in the world, and the conclusion generally
shows that, in phrase pugilistic, it is enough. There
are few kinds of extravagance more ruinous than that of
indulging a desire for being excessively good-natured, as
the good-natured pussy learnt when the monkey used her
paw to draw chestnuts from the fire. A man of
circumscribed
means may, with comparative safety, keep horses
and dogs, drink Champagne and Burgundy, but upon
races and upon cock-fights; he may even gratify a taste
for being very genteelfor these things may subside into
moderation; but being very good-natured, in the popular
acception of the phrase, is like the juvenile amusement
of sliding down Market street hill on a sled. The further
one goes, the greater is the velocity; and, if the
momentum
be not skilfully checked, we are likely to
land
in the
water.
The best-natured fellow in the world is merely
a convenience; very useful to others, but worse than
useless to himself. He is the bridge across the brook,
and men walk over him. He is the wandering pony of
the Pampas, seeking his own provender, yet ridden by
those who contribute not to his support. He giveth up
all the sunshine, and hath nothing but chilling shade for
himself. He waiteth at the table of the world, serveth
the guests, who clear the board, and, for food and pay,
give him fine words, which culinary research hath long
since ascertained cannot be used with profit, even in the
buttering of parsnips. He is, in fact, an appendage, not
an individuality; and when worn out, as he soon must
be, is thrown aside to make room for another, if another
can be had. Such is the result of excessive compliance
and obsequious good-nature. It plundereth a man of his
spine, and converteth him into a flexile willow, to be
bent and twisted as his companions choose, and, should
it please them, to be wreathed into a fish-basket.
Are there any who doubt of this? Let them inquire
for one
Leniter Salix
, and ask his opinion. Leniter
may be ragged, but his philosophy has not so many
holes in it as might be inferred from the state of his
wardrobe. Nay, it is the more perfect on that account;
a knowledge of the world penetrates the more easily
when, from defective apparel, we approach the nearer
to our original selves. Leniter's hat is crownless, and
the clear light of knowledge streams without impediment
upon his brain. He is not bound up in the strait jacket
of prejudice, for he long since pawned his solitary vest,
and his coat, made for a Goliath, hangs about him as
loosely as a politician's principles, or as the purser's shirt
in the poetical comparison. Salix has so long bumped
his head against a stone wall, that he has knocked a hole
in it, and like Cooke, the tragedian, sees through his
error. He has speculated as extensively in experience
as if it were town lots. The quantity of that article he
has purchased, could it be made tangible, would freight
a seventy-four;were it convertible into cash, Crsus,
King of Lydia, son of Halyattes, would be a Chelsea
pensioner to Salix. But unluckily for him, there are
stages in life when experience itself is more ornamental
than useful. When, to use a forcible expressionwhen
a man is done,it matters not whether he has as much
experience as Samson had hair, or as Bergami had
whisker
he
can do no more. Salix has been in his time so
much pestered with
duns
, hateful to gods and men,
that he is
done
himself.
The sun was rushing down the west, as Banim
has it, attending to its own business, and, by that means,
shedding benefit upon the world, when Leniter Salix
was seen in front of a little grocery, the
locale
of which
shall be nameless, sitting dejectedly upon a keg of
mackerel
,
number 2. He had been the best-natured fellow
in the world, but, as the geologists say, he was in a
state of transition, and was rapidly becoming up to
trap
.
At all events, he had his nose to the grindstone, an
operation
which should make men keen. He was
houseless
,
homeless, penniless, and the grocery man had asked
him to keep an eye upon the dog, for fear of the
midsummer
catastrophe which awaits such animals when their
snouts are not in a bird cage. This service was to be
recompensed with a cracker, and a glass of what the
shopman was pleased to call
racky mirackilis
, a fluid
sometimes termed railroad, from the rapidity with
which it hurries men to the end of their journey. Like
many of the best-natured fellows in the world, Salix, by
way of being a capital companion, and of not being
different
from others, had acquired rather a partiality for riding
on this railroad, and he agreed to keep his trigger eye
on the dog.
That's right, Salix. I always knowed you were the
best-natured fellow in the world.
H-u-m-p-s-e! sighed Salix, in a prolonged,
plaintive
,
uncertain manner, as if he admitted the fact, but
doubted the honour; h-u-m-p-s-e! but, if it wasn't for
the railroad, which is good for my complaint, because I
take it internally to drive out the perspiration, I've a sort
of a notion Carlo might take care of himself. There's
the dog playing about without his muzzle, just because
I'm good-natured; there's Timpkins at work making
money inside, instead of watching his own whelp, just
because I'm good-natured; and I'm to sit here doing
nothing instead of going to get a little job a man promised
me down town, just because I'm good-natured. I can't
see exactly what's the use of it to me. It's pretty much
like having a bed of your own, and letting other people
sleep in it, soft, while you sleep on the bare floor, hard.
It wouldn't be so bad if you could have half, or quarter
of the bed; but nothese good friends of mine, as I
may say, turn in, take it all, roll themselves up in the
kivering, and won't let us have a bit of sheet to mollify
the white pine sacking bottom, the which is pleasant to
whittle with a sharp knifequite soft enough for that
purposebut the which is not the pink of feather beds.
I don't like itI'm getting tired.
The brow of Salix began to blackentherein having
decidedly the advantage of his boots, which could
neither
blacken themselves, nor prevail on their master to do
itwhen Mrs. Timpkins, the shopman's wife, popped
out with a child in her arms, and three more trapesing
after her.
Law, Salix, how-dee-doo? I'm so gladI know
you're the best-natured creature in the world. Jist hold
little Biddy a while, and keep an eye on t'other young
'unsyou're such a nursehe! he! he!so busy
ain't got no girlso busy washingmost tea time
he! he! he! Salix.
Mrs. Timpkins disappeared, Biddy remained in the
arms of Salix, and t'other young 'uns raced about
with the dog. The trigger eye was compelled to invoke
the aid of its coadjutor.
Whew! whistled Salix; the quantity of pork
they give in this part of the town for a shilling is
amazin'
I'm
so good-natured! That railroad will be well
earnt, anyhow. I'm beginning to think it's queer there
ain't more good-natured people about besides meI'm
a sort of mayor and corporation all myself in this
business
.
6*
It's a monopoly where the profit's all loss. Now,
for instance, these Timpkinses won't ask me to tea,
because
I'm ragged; but they ar'n't a bit too proud to ask
me to play child's nurse and dog's unclethey won't
lend me any money, because I can't pay, and they're
persimmony
and sour about cash concernsand they won't
let me have time to earn any money, and get good
clothesthat's because I'm so good-natured. I've a good
mind to strike, and be sassy.
Hallo! Salix, my good fellow! said a man, on a
horse, as he rode up; you're the very chap I'm looking
for. As I says to my old woman, says I, Leniter Salix
is the wholesoul'dest chap I ever did see. There's nothing
he won't do for a friend, and I'll never forget him, if I
was to live as old as Methuselah.
Salix smiledHannibal softened rocks with vinegar,
but the stranger melted the ice of our hero's resolution
with praise. Salix walked towards him, holding the child
with one hand as he extended the other for a friendly
shake.
You're the best-natured fellow in the world, Salix,
ejaculated the stranger, as he leaped from the saddle,
and hung the reins upon Salix's extended fingers,
instead
of shaking hands with him; you're the
best-natured
fellow in the world. Just hold my horse a
minute
.
I'll be back in a jiffey, Salix; in less than half an
hour, said the dismounted rider, as he shot round the
corner.
If that ain't cutting it fat, I'll be darned! growled
Salix, as soon as he had recovered from his breathless
amazement, and had gazed from dog to babefrom horse
to children.
Mr. Salix, screamed Miss Tabitha Gadabout from
the next house, I'm just running over to Timpson's
place. Keep an eye on my street doorback in a
minute.
She flew across the street, and as she went, the
words best natured-soul alive were heard upon the
breeze.
That's considerable fatterit's as fat as show beef,
said Salix. How many eyes has a good-natured fellow
got, anyhow? Three of mine's in use a'ready. The
good-natureder you are, the more eyes you have, I s'pose.
That job up town's jobbed without me, and where I'm
to sleep, or to eat my supper, it's not the easiest thing
in the world to tell. Ain't paid my board this six months,
I'm so good-natured; and the old woman's so
good-natured
,
she said I needn't come back. These
Timpkinses
and all of 'em are ready enough at asking me
to do things, but when I ask themThere, that dog's
off, and the ketchers are comingCarlo! Carlo!
The baby began squalling, and the horse grew restive;
the dog scampered into the very teeth of danger; and the
three little Timpkinses, who could locomote, went
scrabbling, in different directions, into all sorts of mischief,
until finally one of them pitched head foremost into a
cellar.
Salix grew furious. Whoa, pony!hush, you
infernal
brat!here, Carlo!Thunder and crockery!there's
a young Timpkins smashed and spoilt!knocked into a
cocked hat!
Mr. Salix! shouted a boy, from the other side of
the way, when you're done that 'ere, mammy says
if you won't go a little narrand for her, you're so
good-nater'd
.
There are moments when calamity nerves us; when
wild frenzy congeals into calm resolve; as one may see
by penning a cat in a corner. It is then that the coward
fights; that the oppressed strikes at the life of the
oppressor
.
That moment had come to Salix. He stood bolt
upright, as cold and as straight as an icicle. His
good-nature
might be seen to drop from him in two pieces,
like Cinderella's kitchen garments in the opera. He
laid Biddy Timpkins on the top of the barrel, released
the horse, giving him a vigorous kick, which sent him
flying down the street, and strode indignantly away,
leaving Carlo, Miss Gadabout's house, and all other
matters in his charge, to the guardianship of chance.
The last time Salix was seen in the busy haunts of
men, he looked the very incarnation of gloom and
despair
.
His very coat had gone to relieve his necessities,
and he wandered slowly and dejectedly about, relieving
the workings of his perturbed spirit by kicking whatever
fell in his way.
I'm done, soliloquized he; pardenership between
me and good-nature is this day dissolved, and all persons
indebted will please to settle with the undersigned, who
alone is authorized. Yes, there's a good many indebted,
and its high time to dissolve, when your pardener has sold
all the goods and spent all the money. Once I had a
little shopah! wasn't it nice?plenty of goods and
plenty of business. But then comes one troop of fellows,
and they wanted tickI'm so good-natured; then comes
another set of chaps, who didn't let bashfulness stand in
their way a minute; they sailed a good deal nearer the
wind, and wanted to borry moneyI'm so good-natured;
and more asked me to go security. These fellows were
always very particular friends of mine, and got what
they asked for; but I was a very particular friend of
theirs, and couldn't get it back. It was one of the
good rules that won't work both ways; and I, somehow
or other, was at the wrong end of it, for it wouldn't
work my way at all. There's few rules that will,
barring
substraction, and division, and alligation, when our
folks allegated against me that I wouldn't come to no
good. All the cypherin' I could ever do made more
come to little, and little come to less; and yet, as I said
afore, I had a good many assistants too.
Business kept pretty fair; but I wasn't cured.
Because I was good-natured, I had to go with 'em
frolicking
,
tea partying, excursioning, and busting; and for
the same reason, I was always appinted treasurer to
make the distribution when there wasn't a cent of
surplus
revenue in the treasury, but my own. It was my
job to pay all the bills. Yes, it was always `Salix, you
know me'`Salix, pony up at the bar, and lend us a
levy'`Salix always shells out like a gentleman.'Oh!
to be sure, and why not?now I'm shelled out myself
first out of my shop by old
venditioni exponas
, at the
State Houseold
fiery fash 'us
to me directed. But
they didn't direct him soon enough, for he only got the
fixtures. The goods had gone out on a bust long before
I busted. Next, I was shelled out of my boarding
house; and now, (with a lugubrious glance at his shirt
and pantaloons,) I'm nearly shelled out of my clothes.
It's a good thing they can't easy shell me out of my
skin, or they would, and let me catch my death of cold.
I'm a mere shell-fishan oyster with the kivers off.
But, it was always sowhen I was a little boy,
they coaxed all my pennies out of me; coaxed me to
take all the jawings, and all the hidings, and to go first
into all sorts of scrapes, and precious scrapings they
used to be. I wonder if there isn't two kinds of people
one kind that's made to chaw up t'other kind, and t'other
kind that's made to be chawed up by one kind?
catkind
of people and mouse-kind of people? I guess there
isI'm very much mouse myself.
What I want to know is what's to become of me.
I've spent all I had in getting my eddication. Learnin',
they say, is better than houses and lands. I wonder if
anybody would swap some house and land with me for
mine? I'd go it even, and ask no boot. They should
have it at prime cost; but they won't; and I begin to be
afraid I'll have to get married, or list in the marines.
That's what most people do when they've nothing to
do.
What became of Leniter Salix immediately, is
immaterial
;
what will become of him eventually, is clear
enough. His story is one acting every day, and, though
grotesquely sketched, is an evidence of the danger of an
accommodating disposition when not regulated by
prudence
.
The softness of the best-natured fellow in the
world requires a large admixture of hardening alloy to
give it the proper temper.
A PAIR OF SLIPPERS;
OR, FALLING WEATHER.
Then I, and you, and all of us fell down.
Whenever
we look upon the crowded thoroughfare,
or regard the large assembly, we are compelled to admit
that the infinite variety of form in the human race
contributes
largely to the picturesque. The eye travels over
the diversity of shape and size without fatigue, and
renews
its strength by turning from one figure to another,
when, at each remove, it is sure to find a difference.
Satiated with gazing at rotundity, it is refreshed by a
glance at lathiness; and, tired with stooping to the lowly,
it can mount like a bird to the aspiring head which tops
a maypole. But, while the potency of these pictorial
beauties is admitted, it must be conceded that the
variations
from the true standard, although good for the
eye-sight
,
are productive of much inconvenience; and that, to
consider the subject like a Benthamite, utility and the
general advantage would be promoted if the total amount
of flesh, blood, bone, and muscle were more equally
distributed
.
As affairs are at present arranged, it is almost
impossible to find a ready made coat that will answer
one's purpose, and a man may stroll through half the
shops in town without being able to purchase a pair of
boots which he can wear with any degree of comfort. In
hanging a lamp, every shop keeper, who lights up,
knows that it is a very troublesome matter so to swing
it, that, while the short can see the commodities, the tall
will not demolish the glass. If an abbreviated turnippy
man, in the goodness of his heart and
in articulo mortis
,
bequeaths his wardrobe to a long and gaunt friend, of
what service is the posthumous present? It is available
merely as new clothing for the juveniles, or as something
toward another kitchen carpet. Many a martial spirit is
obliged to content himself with civic employment,
although
a mere bottle of fire and wrath, because heroism
is enlisted by inches, and not by degree. If under five
foot six, Csar himself could find no favour in the eye
of the recruiting sergeant, and Alexander the Great
would be allowed to bestride no Bucephalus in a dragoon
regiment of modern times. Thus, both they who get too
much, and they who get too little, in Dame Nature's
apportionment
bill, as well as those who, though abundantly
endowed, are not well made up, have divers reasons for
grumbling, and for wishing that a more perfect uniformity
prevailed.
Some of the troubles which arise from giving a man
more than his share in altitude, find illustration in the
subjoined narrative:
Linkum Langcale is a subject
in extenso
. He is, to
use the words of the poet, suggested by his name,
A bout
Of linked sweetness long drawn out:
and, in speaking of him, it is not easy to be brief.
Linkum
is entirely too long for his own comfortsomething
shortif the word
short
may be used in this connexion
something short of the height of the Titans of old, who
pelted Saturn with brickbats; but how much has never
yet been ascertained, none of his acquaintances being
sufficiently acquainted with trigonometry to determine
the fact. He is one of those men who, like the gentle
Marcia, tower above their sex, and must always be
called down to their dinner, as no information can be
imparted to them unless it be hallooed up; and in
conversing
with whom, it is always necessary to begin by
hailing the maintop. There is not, however, more
material in Linkum than enough for a man of ordinary
length. The fault is in his not being properly made up.
He is abominably wire drawnstretched out, as
Shakspeare
says, almost to the crack of doom. It is clear
that there has been an attempt to make too much of
him, but the frame of the idea has not been well filled
out. He is the streak of a Colossus, and he resembles
the willow wand at which Locksley shot his gray goose
shaft in the lists of Ashby de la Zouche. The
consequence
is, that Linkum is a crank vessel. If he wore a
feather in his cap, he would be capsized at every corner;
and as it is, he finds it very difficult to get along on a
windy day, without a paving stone in each coat pocket
to preserve the balance of power. He is, however, of a
convivial nature, and will not refuse his glass,
notwithstanding
the aptitude of alcohol to ascend into the brain,
and so to encumber it as to render a perpendicular
position troublesome to men shorter than himself. When
in this condition, his troubles are numberless, and among
other matters, he finds it very difficult to get a clear fall,
there being in compact cities very little room to spare
for the accommodation of long men tumbling down in
the world.
One evening Linkum walked forth to a convivial
meeting, and supped with a set of jolly companions.
Late at night a rain came on, which froze as it fell, and
7
soon made the city one universal slide, sufficiently
glip for all purposes, without the aid of saw-dust.
Of Linkum's sayings and doings at the social board, no
record is preserved; but it is inferred that his
amusements
were not of a nature to qualify him for the safe
performance of a journey so slippery as that which it
was necessary to undertake to reach home. No lamps
were lighted, they who were abroad being under the
necessity of supposing the moonshine, and of seeing
their way as they walked, or of gathering themselves up
when they fell, by the lantern of imagination.
Good night, fellers, said Linkum, at the top of the
steps, as the door closed after him. He pulled his hat
over his eyes determinedly, buttoned his coat with
resolution, and sucked at his cigar with that iron energy
peculiar to men about to set forth on their way home on a
cold, stormy night. The fire of the cigar reflected from
his nose was the only illumination to be seen; and
Linkum, putting his hands deep into his pockets, kept
his position on the first step of the six which were
between him and the pavement.
I've no doubt, said he, as he puffed forth volumes
of smoke, and seemed to cogitate deeplyI've not the
slightest doubt that this is as beautiful a night as ever
was; only it's so dark you can't see the pattern of it.
One night is pretty much like another night in the dark;
but it's a great advantage to a good looking evening, if
the lamps are lit, so you can twig the stars and the
moonshine. The fact is, that in this 'ere city, we do
grow the blackest moons, and the hardest moons to find,
I ever did see. Sometimes I'm most disposed to send
the bellman after 'emor get a full blooded pinter to
pint 'em out, while I hold a candle to see which way he
pints. It wouldn't be a bad notion on sich occasions to
ask the man in the steeple to ring which way the moon
is. Lamps is lamps, and moons is moons, in a business
pint of view, but practically they ain't much if the
wicks ain't afire. When the luminaries are, as I may
say, in the raw, it's bad for me. I can't see the ground
as perforately as little fellers, and every dark night I'm
sure to get a hysteither a forrerd hyst, or a backerd
hyst, or some sort of a hystbut more backerds than
forrerds, 'specially in winter. One of the most
unfeeling
tricks I know of, is the way some folks have
got of laughing out, yaw-haw! when they see a
gentleman
ketching a riggler hysta long gentleman,
for instance, with his legs in the air, and his noddle
splat down upon the cold bricks. A hyst of itself is
bad enough, without being sniggered at: first, your
sconce gets a crack; then, you see all sorts of stars,
and have free admission to the fireworks; then, you
scramble up, feeling as if you had no head on your
shoulders, and as if it wasn't you, but some confounded
disagreeable feller in your clothes; yet the jacksnipes
all grin, as if the misfortunes of human nature was only
a poppet show. I wouldn't mind it, if you could get up
and look as if you didn't care. But a man can't rise,
after a royal hyst, without letting on he feels flat. In
such cases, however, sympathy is all gammon; and as
for sensibility of a winter's day, people keep it all for
their own noses, and can't be coaxed to retail it by the
small.
Linkum paused in his prophetic dissertation upon
hyststhe popular pronunciation, in these parts, of
the word
hoist
, which is used
quasi lucus a non
lucendo
to convey the idea of the most complete
tumble
which man can experience. A fall, for instance, is
indeterminate. It may be an easy slip downa gentle
visitation of mother earth; but a hyst is a rapid, forcible
performance, which may be done, as Linkum observes,
either backward or forward, but of necessity with such
violence as to knock the breath out of the body, or it is
unworthy of the noble appellation of hyst. It is an apt,
but figurative mode of expression, and it is often carried
still further; for people sometimes say, lower him up,
and hyst him down.
Our hero held on firmly to the railing, and peered
keenly into the darkness, without discovering any object
on which his vision could rest. The gloom was
substantial
.
It required sharper eyes than his to bore a
hole in it. The wind was up, and the storm continued
to coat the steps and pavements with a sheet of ice.
It's raining friz potatoes, observed Linkum; I
feel 'em, though I can't see 'em, bumping the end of my
nose; so I must hurry home as fast as I can.
Heedless and hapless youth! He made a vain attempt
to descend, but, slipping, he came in a sitting posture
upon the top step, and, in that attitude, flew down like
lightningbump! bump! bump! The impetus he had
acquired prevented him from stopping on the sidewalk,
notwithstanding his convulsive efforts to clutch the icy
bricks, and he
skuted
into the gutter, whizzing over the
curbstone, and splashing into the water, like a young
Niagara.
A deep silence ensued, broken solely by the pattering
of the rain and the howling of the wind. Linkum was
an exhausted receiver; the hyst was perfect, the breath
being completely knocked out of him.
Laws-a-massy! at length he panted, ketching
breath at intervals, and twisting about as if in pain; my
eyes! sich a hyst! Sich a quantity of hysts all in one!
The life's almost bumped out of me, and I'm jammed
up so tight, I don't believe I'm so tall by six inches as I
was before. I'm druv' up and clinched, and I'll have to
get tucks in my trousers.
Linkum sat still, ruminating on the curtailment of
his fair proportions, and made no effort to rise. The
door soon opened again, and Mr. Broad Brevis came
forth, at which a low, suppressed chuckle was uttered
by Linkum, as he looked over his shoulder, anticipating
a quantity of hysts all in one for the new comer,
whose figure, however,short and stout,was much
better calculated for the operation than Linkum's. But
Brevis seemed to suspect that the sliding was good, and
the skating magnificent.
No, you don't! quoth he, as he tried the step with
one foot, and recovered himself; I haven't seen the
Alleghany Portage and inclined planes for nothing. It
takes me to diminish the friction, and save the wear and
tear.
So saying, he quietly tucked up his coat tails, and
sitting down upon the mat, which he grasped with both
hands, gave himself a gentle impulse, crying All aboard!
and slid slowly but majestically down. As he came to
the plain sailing across the pavement, he twanged forth
Ta-ra-ta-ra-ta-ra-tra-a-a! in excellent imitation of the
post horn, and brought up against Linkum. Clear the
course for the express mail, or I'll report you to the
department! roared Brevis, trumpeting the alarum,
so well known to all who have seen a tragedy
Tra-tretra-ta-ra-tra-a-a
!
That's queer fun, anyhow, said a careful wayfarer,
turning the corner, with lantern in hand, and sock on
foot, who, after a short parley, was induced to set the
gentlemen on their pins. First planting Brevis against
the pump, who sang Let me lean on thee, from the
7*
Sonnambula, in prime style, he undertook to lift up
Linkum.
Well, observed the stranger, this is a chap
without
no end to himhe'd be pretty long a drowning, any
how. If there was many more like him in the gutters,
it would be better to get a windlass, and wind 'em up.
I never see'd a man with so much slack. The
corporation
ought to buy him, starch him up stiff, cut a hole for
a clock in his hat, and use him for a steeple; only
Downing wouldn't like to trust himself on the top of
such a ricketty concern.Neighbour, shall I fetch the
Humane Society's apparatus?
NoI ain't drownded, only bumped severe. The
curbstones have touched my feelings. I'm all over like
a mapred, blue, and green.
Now, said their friendly assistant, grinning at the
joke, and at the recompense he had received for the job,
now, you two hook on to one another like Siameses,
and mosey. You've only got to tumble one a top of
t'other, and it won't hurt. Tortle offit's slick going
'specially if you're going down. Push ahead!
continued
he, as he hitched them together; and away they
went,
a pair of slippers
, arm in arm. Many were their
tumbles and many their mischances before they reached
their selected resting place.
I can't stand this, said Linkum to his companion,
as they were slipping and falling; but it's mostly owing
to my being so tall. I wish I was razee'd, and then it
wouldn't happen. The awning posts almost knock the
head off me; I'm always tumbling over wheelbarrows,
dogs, and children, because, if I look down, I'm certain
to knock my noddle against something above. It's a
complete
nuisance to be so tall. Beds are too short; if you
go to a tea-fight, the people are always tumbling over
your trotters, and breaking their noses, which is what
young ladies ain't partial to; and if you tipple too much
toddy of a slippery nightabout as easy a thing to do as
you'd wish to tryyou're sure to get a hyst a square long
just such a one as I've had. If I'd thought of it, I
could have said the multiplication table while I was going
the figure. Stumpy chaps, such as you, ain't got no
troubles in this world.
That's all you know about it, puffed Brevis, as
Linkum alternately jerked him from his feet, and then
caused him to slide in the opposite direction, with his
heels ploughing the ice, like a shaft horse holding back:
phew! That's all you know about itstumpies have
troubles.
I can't borrow coats, added Linkum,
soliloquizing
,
because I don't like cuffs at the elbows. I can't
borrow pants, because it isn't the fashion to wear
knee-breeches
,
and all my stockings are socks. I can't hide
when anybody owes me a lambasting. You can see me
a mile. When I sit by the fire, I can't get near enough
to warm my body, without burning my knees; and in a
stage-coach, there's no room between the benches, and
the way you get the crampdon't mention it.
I don't know nothing about all these things; but to
imagine I was a tall chap
Don't try; you'll hurt yourself, for it's a great stretch
of imagination for a little feller to do that.
After which amicable colloquy, nothing more was
heard of them, except that, before retiring to rest, they
chuckled over the idea that the coming spring would
sweat the ice to death for the annoyance it had caused
them. But ever while they live, will they remember
the night of hysts.
INDECISION.
An obstinate temper is very disagreeable, particularly in a wife;
a passionate one very shocking in a child; but for one's own
particular
comfort, Heaven help the possessor of an irresolute one!Its
day of hesitationits night of repentancethe mischief it doesthe
misery it feels!its proprietor may well say, `Nobody can tell what
I suffer but myself!'
We
know not to whom the remarks above quoted are
to be attributed, but every observer of human actions will
acquiesce in their justice. There are few misfortunes
greater than the possession of an irresolute mind. Other
afflictions are temporary in their nature; the most
inveterate
of chronic diseases leaves the patient his hours of
comfort; but he who lacks decision of character must
cease to act altogether before he can be released from the
suffering it occasions. It is felt, whether the occasion
be great or small, whenever there is more than one method
of arriving at the same end, and it veers like a
girouette
at the aspect of alternatives. One can scarcely go so far
as the poet, who quaintly says:
It needs but this, be bold, bold, bold;
'Tis every virtue told
Honour and truth, humanity and skill
,
The noblest charity the mind can will
.
But the lines are pregnant with meaning. The curse of
indecision impedes the growth of virtue, and renders our
best powers comparatively inoperative.
It would certainly be the parent of interminable
confusion
if all men were qualified to lead in the affairs of
the world. The impulse to direct and to command is
almost irrepressible. He who is born with it
instinctively
places himself at the head of a movement, and
clutches the baton of authority as if it had been his
plaything
from infancy. Even in the sports of childhood,
the controlling and master spirit of the merry group is to
be detected at a glance; and, if three men act together
for a day, the leading mind discovers and assumes its
place. The inferior in mental power sink rapidly to their
appropriate station; the contemplation of an emergency
tends to convince them that they are incompetent to head
the column, and, although they may grumble a little,
they soon fall quietly into the ranks. It, therefore,
would not answer if all men had that self-reliance and
that iron will which are the essential ingredients in the
composition of a leading mind. The community would
be broken up into a mob of generals, with never a soldier
to be had for love or money. There would be no more
harmony extant than there is in the vocal efforts of a
roomfull of bacchanalians, when each man singeth his
own peculiar song, and hath no care but that he may
be louder than his boon companions. Our time would
be chiefly spent in trying to disprove the axiom, that
when two men ride a horse one must ride behind. Each
pony in the field would have riders enough; but, instead
of jogging steadily toward any definite end, he who was
in the rear would endeavour to clamber to the front, and
thus a species of universal leap-frog would be the order
of the day. Great results could not be achieved, for action
in masses would be a thing unheard of, and the nations
would be a collection of unbound sticks.
Yet the cultivation of the energies to a certain extent
is a matter of import to the welfare and happiness of
every individual. We are frequently placed in
circumstances
in which it is necessary to be our own
captain-general
;
and, with all deference to the improving spirit
of the time, and to the labours of the many who devote
themselves to the advancement of education, it must be
confessed that the energies do not always receive the
attention
to which they are entitled. It is true there is an
abundance of teaching; we can scarcely move without
coming in contact with a professor of something, who,
in the plenitude of his love for his fellows, promises, for
the most trifling consideration, to impart as much if not
more than he knows himself, in a time so incredibly
short that, if we were not aware of the wonder-working
power of the high pressure principle, we should not
believe
it; but no one has yet appeared in the useful character
of a Professor of Decisionno one has yet thought it
a good speculation to teach in six lessons of an hour
each, the art of being able without assistance speedily to
make up the mind upon a given subject, and to keep it
made up, like a well-packed knapsack. There are
arithmeticians
and algebraists in plenty; but the continent
may be ranged without finding him who can instruct us
how to solve, as Jack Downing would express it, a tuff
sum in conduct, and to act unflinchingly upon the
answer; and ingenuity has discovered no instrument to
screw the mind to the sticking place. Now, although
humility may be a very amiable characteristic, and
deference
to the opinions of others a very pleasing trait, yet
promptness in decision and boldness in action form the
best leggins with which to scramble through the thistles
and prickles of active life; and a professor of the kind
alluded to would doubtless have many pupils from the
ranks of those who have, by virtue of sundry tears
and scratches, become anxious for a pair of nether
integuments
of that description. At least, he might rely
upon
DUBERLY DOUBTINGTON,
THE MAN WHO COULDN'T MAKE UP HIS MIND
Leah
, tell your master dinner's been waiting for him
this hour.
He can't come, mem;the man's with him yet,
mem.
What man?
The solumcolly man, mem;the man that stays so
long, and is always so hard to go.
Every one who has visiters is aware of the great
difference among them in the matter referred to by Leah.
In fact, they may be divided into two classesvisiters
who are easy to go and administer themselves,
according
to Hahnemann, in homopathic doses, and visiters
who are hard to go, and are exhibited in quantity, in
conformity with regular practice.
The individual who was guilty of keeping Mr. Edax
Rerum from his dinner was Duberly Doubtington, a
man who couldn't make up his minda defect of
character
which rendered him peculiarly hard to go, and
made him responsible for having caused many to eat
their mutton cold. It was Juliet who found,
Parting such sweet sorrow,
That she could say good night till it be morrow;
and Duberly's farewells are equally interminable. When
he has once fairly effected a lodgment, he is rooted to
the spot. It is as difficult for him to go off, as it
frequently
is for stage heroes to make their pistols shoot. But,
though it is hard for him to go, yet he finds it quite easy
to be hours in going. By way of preparation, he first
reaches his hat, and smooths its raven down. He
then lays it aside again for the greater convenience of
drawing on a glove, and that operation being completed,
the gauntlet is speedily drawn off that he may adjust his
side-locks. Much time being consumed in these
interesting
preliminaries, he has no difficulty at all in
employing
an additional hour when once fairly upon his
legs. He discourses over the back of his chair, he
pauses at the parlour door, he hesitates in the hall, and
rallies manfully on the outer steps. The colder the
weather the more determined his grasp upon his victim,
having decidedly the advantage over the resident of the
mansion, in being hatted, coated, and gloved. In this
way, indeed, he deserves a medal from the faculty for
cutting out doctor's work, especially in influenza times.
The straps and buckles of Duberly's resolution will
not hold, no matter how tightly he may pull them up,
and he has suffered much in the unphilosophic attempt
to sit upon two stools. When he starts upon a race, an
unconsidered shade of opinion is sure to catch him by
the skirt, and draw him back. He is, in a measure,
Fabian in policy. He shifts his position continually,
and never hazards an attack. His warfare is a
succession
of feints and unfinished demonstrations, and he has
been aptly likened to a leaden razor, which looks sharp
enough, but will turn in the cutting. He is in want of
a pair of mental spectacles; for he has a weakness in the
optic nerve of his mind's eye which prevents him, in
regarding the future, from seeing beyond the nose of the
present movement. The chemistry of events, which
figures out ulterior results from immediate combination
and instant action, is a science as yet unknown to
Duberly
,
Doubtington. He cannot tell what to think; he
knows not what to do. The situations in which he is
placed have never occurred to him before; the lights of
experience are wanting, and he is therefore perplexed
in the labyrinth. Like the fabled coffin of Mohammed,
he is always in a state of betweenity. He is, in short,
as a forcible writer well observes, one of those
unfortunate
people who seldom experience
the sweet slumber
of a decided opinion
.
Such is the moral man of Duberly Doubtington, and
his physical man betrays traits of indecision equally as
strong. He tries to encourage his heart by cocking his
beaver
la militaire
, but its furry fierceness cannot
contradict the expression of the features it surmounts.
His eyebrows form an uncertain arch, rising nearly an
inch above the right line of determination, and the button
of his nose is so large and blunt as to lend any thing but
a penetrating look to his countenance. His under lip
droops as if afraid to clench resolutely with its
antagonist
;
and his whiskers hang dejectedly down, instead of
bristling like a
chevaux de frise
toward the outer angle
of the eye. The hands of Mr. Doubtington always
repose in his pockets, unwilling to trust to their own
means of support, and he invariably leans his back
against the nearest sustaining object. When he walks,
his feet shuffle here and there so dubiously that one may
swear they have no specific orders where to go; and so
indefinite are the motions of his body, that even the tails
of his coat have no characteristic swing. They look,
not like Mr. Doubtington's coat-tails, but like coat-tails
in the abstractundecided coat-tails, that have not yet
got the hang of anybody's back, and have acquired no
8
more individuality than those which dangle at the shop
doors in Water street.
Duberly Doubtington was at one time tolerably
comfortable
in his pecuniary circumstances. His father had
been successful in trade, and, of course, thought it
unnecessary
to teach his children to make up their minds
about any thing but enjoying themselves. This neglect,
however, proved fatal to the elder Doubtington.
That worthy individual being taken one warm summer
afternoon with an apoplectic fit, the younger Doubtington
was so perplexed whether or not to send for a physician,
and if he did, what physician should be called in
whether he should or should not try to bleed him with
a penknife, and whether it was most advisable to have
him put to bed up stairs or to leave him upon the sofa
down stairs,that the old gentleman, being rather pressed
for time, could not await the end of the debate, and
quietly slipped out of the world before his son could
make up his mind as to the best method of keeping him
in it. In fact, it was almost a chance that the senior
Doubtington obtained sepulture at all, as Duberly could
not make up his mind where that necessary business
should take place; and he would have been balancing the
pros and cons of the question to this day, if some other
person, more prompt of decision, had not settled the
matter.
Duberly Doubtington was now his own master.
There were none entitled to direct, to control, or to
advise him. He was the Phton of his own fortunes, and
could drive the chariot where he pleased. But, although
he had often looked forward to this important period
with much satisfaction, and had theorised upon it with
great delight, yet in practice he found it not quite so well
adapted to his peculiar abilities as he thought it would
be. A share of decision is required even by those who
are placed beyond the necessity of toiling for bread. The
disposition of his means frequently called on him to
resolve upon a definite course.
I regard it as a very fair investment, Mr.
Doubtington
,
said his broker; your money is useless
where it is.
`But, what do you advise?under the circumstances,
what should I do? replied Duberly.
Of course, I don't pretend to direct. I want no
unnecessary
responsibility. There's no knowing what
may happen these slippery times. I think the chance a
good one; but make up your mind about it.
There are people who talk about making up one's
mind as if it were a task as easy as to eat a dinner, or
as if it were as purely mechanical as driving a nail, or
putting on a pair of old familiar boots.
I pay that man for attending to my business,
muttered Duberly, and yet he has the impudence to
tell me to make up my mind!That's the very thing I
want him to do for me. The tailor makes my clothes
Sally makes my bednature makes my whiskers, and
John makes my fires; yet I must be bothered to make
up my mind about money matters! I can'tthe greatest
nuisances alive are these responsibility shifting people;
and, if some one would tell me who else to get to attend
to my business, I'd send that fellow flying.
Difficult, however, as he supposed it would be,
Duberly
at length found a gentleman manager of his pecuniary
affairs, who never troubled him to make up his mind,
with what results shall appear anon.
Duberly could not resolve whether it was the best
policy to travel first in the old world or in the new, and
he therefore did neither; but as time is always heavy on
the hands of those who have much of it at disposal, and
as it is difficult to lounge eternally at home, or in the
street, he slowly established what the Scotch call a
howf for each portion of the day. In the morning
he dozed over the newspapers at a reading room;
between
noon and the dinner hour, he lolled upon three
chairs at the office of his friend Capias the lawyer, by
way of facilitating that individual's business; the
afternoon
was divided between whittling switches at home
and riding to some popular resort, where he cut his name
upon the table. In the evening, if he did not yawn at
the theatre, he visited some hospitable mansion, where
the elders were good natured and the juniors agreeable.
At the house of Mrs. St. Simon Sapsago, a bouncing
widow, with a dashing son, and a pair of daughters,
Mr. Duberly Doubtington was invariably well received;
for, although he could not make up his mind, he was in
other respects so eligible that Mrs. St. Simon Sapsago
was always pleased to see him, and willing that he
should either listen or talk as much as he liked within
her doors. Miss Ethelinda St. Simon Sapsago was a
very pretty girl; and, for some reason or other, comported
herself so graciously to Duberly, that, when troubled to
form a conclusion, he usually asked her advice, and to his
great satisfaction, was sure to receive it in a comfortable,
decisive way.
Miss Ethelinda, I'm trying to make up my mind
about coats; but I can't tell whether I like bright
buttons
or not. Nor do I know exactly which are the
nicest colours. I do wish there was only one sort of
buttons, and only one kind of colour; the way every
thing is now, is so tiresomeone's perpetually
bothered
.
So Ethelinda St. Simon Sapsago, with her sweetest
smile, would give her views upon the subject, to
Duberly's
great delight. In fact, she was his council's
consistory
;
or, as the Indians have it, she was his
sense-bearer
,
a very important item in the sum total of one's
domestic relations.
But, though these consultations were very frequent,
still Duberly said nothing to the purpose,
notwithstanding
the fact that every one looked upon it as a settled
thing, and wanted to know when it was to be. Duberly
Doubtington, however, never dreamed of matrimony; or
if he did, it only floated like a vague mist across the
distant horizon of his speculative thoughts. He regarded
it as a matter of course that, at some period or other, he
should have a wife and childrenjust as we all expect
either to be bald, or to have gray hairs, and to die: but
he shivered at the idea of being called on to make up his
mind on such a step. He had a faint hope that he
would be married, as it were, imperceptibly; that it
would, like old age, steal upon him by degrees, so that he
might be used to it before he found it out. The
connubial
state, however, is not a one into which a Doubtington
can slide by degrees; there is no such thing as being
imperceptibly
married, a fact of which Mrs. and Miss St.
Simon Sapsago were fully aware, and, therefore, resolved
to precipitate matters by awakening Duberly's jealousy.
Ethelinda became cold upon giving her advice on the
subject of new coats and other matters. Indeed, when
asked by Duberly whether she did not think it would be
better for him to curtail his whiskers somewhat during
the summer months, she went so far as to say that she
didn't care what he did with them, and that she never
had observed whether he wore huge corsair whiskers, or
lawyerlike apologies. Duberly was shocked at a
defection so flagrant on the part of his sense-bearer.
8*
Insult his whiskers!he couldn't make up his mind
what to think of it.
But still more shocked was he when he observed that
she smiled upon Mr. Adolphus Fitzflam, who cultivated
immense black curls, latitudinarian whiskers, black
moustaches, with an
imperial
to matchFitzflam, who
made it the business of his life to do the appalling, and
out-haired everybody except the bison at the
Zoological
Institute. Duberly felt uncomfortable; he was not
in loveat least he had never found it outbut he was
troubled with a general uneasiness, an oppression, a
depression
,
and a want of appetite. Gastric derangement,
said the quack advertisements, and Duberly took a box
of pills: but one disease, said the newspapers, and
Duberly swallowed another box of pills, but without
relief. Whenever Fitzflam approached, the symptoms
returned.
I can't make up my mind about it, said Duberly;
but I don't think I like that buffalo fellow, Fitzflam.
Why don't they make him up into mattrasses, and stuff
cushions with whatever's left?
Mr. Doubtington, isn't Augustus Fitzflam a duck?
said Ethelinda one evening when they were left
tte-
-t
te;
such beautiful hair!
I can't tell whether he's a duck or not, said
Duberly
,
dryly, I haven't seen much more of him than the
tip of his nose; but, if not a member of the goose
family, he will some day share the fate of the man I saw
at Fairmountbe drowned in his own
locks
.
But he looks so romanticso piraticalas if he had
something on his mind, never slept, and had a silent
sorrow here.
He had better try a box of the vegetable pills,
thought Duberly.
Well, I do declare it's not surprising that so many
have fallen in love with Adolphus Fitzflam, and Miss
Ethelinda St. Simon Sapsago breathed a scarcely
perceptible
sigh.
Duberly startedhis eyes were opened to his own
complaint at once, and somehow or other, without
making up his mind, he hurriedly declared himself.
Speak to my ma, faintly whispered Miss
Ethelinda
St. Simon Sapsago.
To-morrow, replied Duberly Doubtington, taking
a tender, but rapid farewell.
Duberly was horror-struck at his own rashness. He
tossed and rolled all night, trying to make up his mind
as to the propriety of his conduct. He stayed at home
all day for the same purpose, and the next day found
him still irresolute.
Mrs. St. Simon Sapsago's compliments, and wishes
to know if Mr. Duberly Doubtington is ill.
No!
Three days more, and yet the mind of Mr.
Doubtington
was a prey to perplexity.
Mr. Julius St. Simon Sapsago called to ask the
meaning of his conduct, and Duberly promised to inform
him when he had made up his mind.
Mr. Adolphus Fitzflam, as the friend of Julius St. S.
Sapsago, with a challenge.
Leave your errand, boy, said Doubtington, angrily,
and go.
Fitzflam winked at the irregularity, and retreated.
Duberly lighted a cigar with the cartel, and puffed
away vigorously.
`What's to be done?marry, or be shot! I don't
like eitherat least, I've come to no conclusion on the
subject. When I've made up my mind, I'll let 'em
knowplenty of time.
No notice being taken of the challenge, Mr. Julius St.
Simon Sapsago assaulted Mr. Doubtington in the street
with a horsewhip, while Fitzflam stood by to enjoy the
sport. There is nothing like a smart external application
to quicken the mental faculties, and so our hero found it.
Stop! said he, dancing
la Celeste
.
You're a scoundrel! cried Julius, and the whip
cracked merrily.
I've made up my mind! replied Duberly, suddenly
shooting his clenched fist into the countenance of the
flagellating Julius, who turned a backward summerset
over a wheelbarrow. Fitzflam lost his hat in an abrupt
retreat up the street, and he was fortunate in his
swiftness
,
for, had all his hairs been lives, Duberly would
have plucked them.
But, from this moment, the star of Duberly
Doubtington
began to wane. The case of Sapsago
versus
Doubtington
,
for breach of promise of marriage, made heavy
inroads upon his fortune. His new man of business,
who took the responsibility of managing his money
affairs without pestering him for directions, sunk the
whole of his cash in the Bubble and Squeak Railroad and
Canal Company, incorporated with banking privileges.
Doubtington, therefore, for once was resolute, and turned
politician; and in this capacity it was that he called upon
Mr. Edax Rerum for his influence to procure him an
office. He still lives in the hope of a place, but,
unluckily
for himself, can never make up his mind on which
side to be zealous until the crisis is past and zeal is
useless.
His last performance was characteristic. Having
escorted the Hon. Phinkey Phunks to the steamboat, the
vessel began to move before he had stepped ashore.
He stood trembling on the brink. Jump, you fool!
said a jarvey.Take keerit's too fur! said a
newspaper
boy. The advice being balanced, Doubtington
was perplexed, and, making a half step, as the distance
widened, he plumped into the river. He was fished out
almost drowned, and, as he stood streaming and
wo-be-gone
upon the wharf, while other less liquid patriots earned
golden opinions by shouting, Hurrah for Phunks!
imagination could scarcely conceive a more appropriate
emblem of the results of indecision than that presented
by Duberly Doubtington, a man who, had it been left to
himself, would never have been in the world at all.
DILLY JONES;
OR, THE PROGRESS OF IMPROVEMENT.
One
of the most difficult things in the world is to run
before the wind; and, by judiciously observing the
changes of the weather, to avoid being thrown out.
Fashion is so unsteady, and improvements are so rapid,
that the man whose vocation yields him an abundant
harvest now, may, in a few years, if he has not a keen
eye, and a plastic versatility, find that his skill and his
business are both useless. Many were the poor barbers
shipwrecked by the tax upon hair-powder, and numerous
were the leather breeches makers who were destroyed
by the triumph of woollens. Their skill was doubtless
very great, but it would not avail in a contest against the
usages of the world; and unless they had the capacity
to strike out a new course, they all shared the fate of
their commodities, and retired to the dark cellars of
popular
estimation. Every day shows us the same principle
of change at work, and no one has more reason to reflect
and mourn about it than one Dilly Jones of this city.
Dilly is not, perhaps, precisely the person who would be
chronicled by the memoir writers of the time, or have a
monument erected to him if he were no more; but Dilly
is a man of a useful though humble vocation, and no one
can saw hickory with more classic elegance, or sit upon
the curbstone and take his dinner with more picturesque
effect.
Yet, as has been hinted above, Dilly has his sorrows,
particularly at night, after a hard day's work, when his
animal spirits have been exhausted by reducing gum logs
to the proper measure. In the morning he is full of life
and energy, feeling as if he could saw a cord of
Shot-towers
,
and snap the pillars of the Bank across his knee
like pipe stems. In the full flush of confidence at that
time of day, reflection batters against him in vain; but
as the night draws on, Dilly feels exhausted and
spiritless
.
His enthusiasm seems to disappear with the sun,
and neither the moon nor the stars can cause high tide in
the river of his mind. The current of his good spirits
shrinks in its channel, leaving the gay and gorgeous
barques of hope and confidence drearily ashore on the
muddy flats; and his heart fails him as if it were useless
longer to struggle against adversity.
It was in this mood that he was once seen travelling
homeward, with his horse and saw fixed scientifically
upon his shoulders. He meandered in his path in the
way peculiar to men of his vocation, and travelled with
that curvilinear elegance which at once indicates that he
who practises it is of the wood-sawing profession, and
illustrates the lopsided consequences of giving one leg
more to do than the other. But Dilly was too
melancholy
on this occasion to feel proud of his professional
air, and perhaps, had he thought of it, would have
reproved
the leg which performed the sweep of sixty,
for indulging in such graces, and thereby embarrassing
its more humble brother, which, knowing that a right
line is the shortest distance between two places, laboured
to go straight to its destination. Dilly, however, had no
such stuff in his thoughts. His mind was reasoning from
the past to the future, and was mournfully meditating
upon the difficulties of keeping up with the changes of
the times, which roll onward like a Juggernaut, and crush
all who are not swift enough to maintain themselves in
the lead. He wondered why fashions and customs
should so continually change, and repined that he could
not put a spoke in their wheel, that the trade of one's
early days might likewise be the trade of one's latter
years. So complete was his abstraction that he
unconsciously
uttered his thoughts aloud:
Sawing wood's going all to smash, said he, and
that's where every thing goes what I speculates in. This
here coal is doing us up. Ever since these black stones
was brought to town, the wood-sawyers and pilers, and
them soap-fat and hickory-ashes men, has been going
down; and, for my part, I can't say as how I see what's
to be the end of all their new-fangled contraptions. But
it's always so; I'm always crawling out of the little end
of the horn. I began life in a comfortable sort of a way;
selling oysters out of a wheelbarrow, all clear grit, and
didn't owe nobody nothing. Oysters went down slick
enough for a while, but at last cellars was invented, and
darn the oyster, no matter how nice it was pickled, could
poor Dill sell; so I had to eat up capital and profits
myself
.
Then the `pepree pot smoking' was sot up, and
went ahead pretty considerable for a time; but a parcel
of fellers come into it, said my cats wasn't as good as
their'n, when I know'd they was as fresh as any cats in
the market; and pepree pot was no go. Bean soup was
just as bad; people said kittens wasn't good done that
way, and the more I hollered, the more the customers
wouldn't come, and them what did, wanted tick. Along
with the boys and their pewter fips, them what got trust
and didn't pay, and the abusing of my goods, I was soon
fotch'd up in the victualling lineand I busted for the
benefit of my creditors. But genius riz. I made a raise
of a horse and saw, after being a wood-piler's prentice
for a while, and working till I was free, and now here
comes the coal to knock this business in the head. My
people's decent people, and I can't disgrace 'em by
turning
Charcoal Jemmy, or smashing the black stones with
a pickaxe. They wouldn't let me into no society at all
if I did.
The idea of being excluded from the upper circles of
he society in which he had been in the habit of moving,
fell heavily upon the heart of poor Dilly Jones. He
imagined the curled lips and scornful glances of the
aristocratic
fair, who now listened with gratification to his
compliments and to his soft nonsense; he saw himself
passed unrecognised in the streetabsolutely cut by his
present familiar friends, and the thought of losing caste
almost crushed his already dejected spirit.
The workings of his imagination, combined with the
fatigue of his limbs, caused such exhaustion, that,
dislodging
his horse from his shoulder, he converted it into
a camp-stool, seated himself under the lee of a shop
window, and, after slinging his saw petulantly at a dog,
gazed with vacant eyes upon the people who occasionally
passed, and glanced at him with curiosity.
Hey, mister! said a shop-boy, at last, I want to
get shut of you, 'cause we're goin' to shet up. You're
right in the way, and if you don't boom along, why Ben
and me will have to play hysence, clearance, puddin's out
with you afore you've time to chalk your knuckles
won't we, Ben?
We'll plump him off of baste before he can say fliance,
or get a sneak. We're knuckle dabsters, both on us.
9
You'd better emigratethe old man's coming, and if he
finds you here, he'll play the mischief with you, before
you can sing out `I'm up if you knock it and ketch.'
So saying, the two lads placed themselves one on each
side of Dilly, and began swinging their arms with an
expression
that hinted very plainly at a forcible ejectment.
Dilly, however, who had forgotten all that he ever knew
of the phrases so familiar to those who scientifically
understand
the profound game of marbles, wore the puzzled
air of one who labours to comprehend what is said to him.
But the meaning became so apparent as not to be
mistaken
,
when Ben gave a sudden pull at the horse which
almost dismounted the rider.
Don't be so unfeelin', ejaculated Dilly, as he
clutched
the cross-bars of his seat; don't be unfeelin', for a
man in grief is like a wood-piler in a cellarmind how
you chuck, or you'll crack his calabash.
Take care of your calabash then, was the grinning
response; you must skeete, even if you have to cut
high-dutchers with your irons loose, and that's no
fun.
High-dutch yourself, if you know how; only go
'way from me, 'cause I ain't got no time.
Well, said the boys, haven't we caught you
on our payment?what do you mean by crying here
what do you foller when you're at home?
I works in wood; that's what I foller.
You're a carpenter, I s'pose, said Ben, winking at
Tom.
No, not exactly; but I saws wood better nor any
half dozen loafs about the drawbridge. If it wasn't for
grief, I'd give both of you six, and beat you too the best
day you ever saw, goin' the rale gum and hickoryfor I
don't believe you're gentlemen's sons; nothin' but poor
trashhalf and halfwant to be and can't, or you
wouldn't keep a troubling of me.
Gauley, Ben, if he isn't a wharf-rat! If you don't
trot, as I've told you a'ready, boss will be down upon
you and fetch you up like a catty on a cork-linejerk!
That's enough, replied Dilly; there's more places
nor one in the worldat least there is yet; new
fashions
haven't shut up the streets yet, and obligated people
to hire hackney balloons if they want to go a walkin', or
omnibus boardin' houses when they want a fip's worth
of dinner, or a levy's worth of sleep. Natural legs is
got some chance for a while anyhow, and a man can get
along if he ain't got clock-vurks to make him go.
`I hope, by'm'by, added Dill scornfully, as he
marched away from the chuckling lads, that there
won't be no boys to plague people. I'd vote for that
new fashion myself. Boys is luisances, accordin' to
me.
He continued to soliloquize as he went, and his last
observations were as follows:
I wonder, if they wouldn't list me for a Charley?
Hollering oysters and bean soup has guv' me a splendid
woive; and instead of skeering 'em away, if the thieves
were to hear me singing out, my style of doing it would
almost coax 'em to come and be took up. They'd feel
like a bird when a snake is after it, and would walk up,
and poke their coat collars right into my fist. Then, after
a while, I'd perhaps be promoted to the fancy business of
pig ketching, which, though it is werry light and werry
elegant, requires genus. Tisn't every man that can come
the scientifics in that line, and has studied the nature of
a pig, so as to beat him at canuvering, and make him
surrender 'cause he sees it ain't no use of doing nothing.
It wants larning to conwince them critters, and it's only
to be done by heading 'em up handsome, hopping which
ever way they hop, and tripping 'em up genteel by
shaking hands with their off hind leg. I'd scorn to pull
their tails out by the roots, or to hurt their feelin's by
dragging 'em about by the ears.
But what's the use? If I was listed, they'd soon find
out to holler the hour and to ketch the thieves by steam;
yes, and they'd take 'em to court on a railroad, and try
'em with biling water. They'll soon have black locomotives
for watchmen and constables, and big bilers for judges
and mayors. Pigs will be ketched by steam, and will be
biled fit to eat before they are done squealing. By and
by, folks won't be of no use at all. There won't be no
people in the world but tea kettles; no mouths, but safety
valves; and no talking, but blowing off steam. If I had
a little biler inside of me, I'd turn omnibus, and
week-days
I'd run from Kensington to the Navy Yard, and
Sundays I'd run to Fairmount.
THE FLESHY ONE.
'Twas fat, not fate, by which Napoleon fell.
There
is a little man in a sister citythere are little
men in most citiesbut the one now on the tapis is a
peculiar
little mana fat little man. He is one who may be
described as a person about five feetfive feet high and
very nearly five feet thick, bearing much resemblance to
a large New England pumpkin stuck upon a pair of beets.
When he lies down to sleep, were it not for his nose at
one extremity and his toes at the other, the spectator
would naturally suppose that he was standing upright
under the cover. When he descends the stairs, he might
as well roll on his side as fatigue himself with walking;
and, as for tumbling down as other people tumble down,
that is out of the question with Berry Huckel, or Huckel
Berry, as he is sometimes called, because of his
roundness
.
Should he, however, chance to trip,which he is
apt to do, not being able to reconnoitre the ground in the
vicinity of his feet,before he achieves a fair start from
the perpendicular, his corporosity touches the ground
which his hands in vain attempt to reach, and he remains,
until helped up, in the position of a schoolboy stretching
himself over a cotton bale. Had he been the Lucius
Junius of antiquity, the Pythia would never have been
so silly as to advise him to kiss his mother earth; for
9*
unless his legs are tilted up by some one like the handles
of a wheelbarrow, Berry Huckel can never bite the dust.
He cannot fall on his nosethat glorious privilege has
been denied to men of his periphery; but when enjoying
moderate serenity of mind, he is always able to sleep
o' nights, therein having no trifling advantage over your
Seurats, your Edsons, your walking anatomies, whose
aspect is a reproach to those who have the feeding of
them.
But biographical accuracy, and a desire that future
generations may not be misled as to those important facts
which make up the aggregate of history, render it
necessary
to avow that these fleshy attributes worry Mr. Berry
Huckel. He cannot look upon the slender longitude of
a bean-pole, he cannot observe the attenuated extent of a
hop-stick, or regard the military dandyism of a
grey-hound's
waist, without experiencing emotions of envy,
and wishing that he had himself been born to the same
lankiness of figure, the same emaciation of contour. He
rejoices not in his dimensions, and, contrary to all rules
in physical science, believes that what he gains in weight,
he loses in importance. It must, however, be confessed
that he has some reason for discontent. He cannot wear
shoes, for he must have assistance to tie them, and other
fingers than his own to pull them up at heel. Boots are
not without their vexations, although he has a pair of
long hooks constructed expressly for his own use; and
should a mosquito bite his kneewhich mosquitoes are
apt to doit costs him a penny to hire a boy to scratch
it. Berry is addicted to literature, and once upon a time
could write tolerable verses, when he was thin enough to
sit so near a table as to be able to write upon it. But this
is not the case at present. His body is too large, and his
arms too short, for such an achievement.
It is happily so arranged that the mind of man in
general accommodates itself to circumstances. We
become reconciled to that which is beyond remedy,
and at length scarcely bestow a thought upon subjects
which, when new, were sources of much disquietude and
annoyance. In fact, owing to the compensating principle
so often acted on by nature, it is by no means rare to
find vanity flourishing most luxuriantly in those who
have least cause to entertain the feeling. The more
numerous our defects, the greater is our self-satisfaction,
and thus the bitterness and discontent that might be
engendered by a knowledge that in mental or in
physical
gifts we are far inferior to the majority of mankind,
are harmlessly and pleasantly prevented. Who so happy
as the simpleton, who is unconscious of any difference
between himself and the superior spirits with whom he
is thrown in contact, and who would smilingly babble
his
niaiseries
in the presence of the assembled wisdom
of the world? Who look more frequently or with
greater delight into the mirror, than they who have in
truth but little reason to be gratified with the object it
reflects?and who indulge more in personal adornment
than they in whom it would be the best policy to avoid
display, and to attract the least possible attention to their
outward proportions? The ugly man is apt to imagine
that the fair are in danger of being smitten with him at first
sight, and perhapsbut we do not pretend to much
knowledge on this branch of the subject, though
suspecting
,
contrary to the received opinion, that the masculine
gender are much more liable to the delusions of conceit
than the softer sex, and that the guilty, having a more
perfect command of the public ear, have in this instance,
as in many others, charged their own sins upon the
guiltlessperhaps plain women are to a certain extent
subject to the same imputation. But who, even if he had
the power, would be so unfeeling as to dissolve the charm
and dissipate the glamour which is so potent in making
up the estimate, when we sit in judgment on ourselves?
Who, indeed, could do it safely?for every one is
indebted to the witchery of self-deception for no small
portion of the comfortable sensations that strew
flowers
on his path through life; and it would be the
height of cruelty if the giftie desired by Burns were
accorded, enabling us to see oursels as ithers see us.
It washad it been carried out to its full extentan
unkind offer, that of Cassius to play the moral
looking-glass
to his brother conspirator, and show that to
himself which he yet knew not of. If true and
unrelenting
in its office, such a looking-glass would be in
danger of a fracture, and it would have the alternatives
of being either considered as a malicious exaggerator, or
as a mere falsifier that delights to wound.
But digression is a runaway steed,all this bears but
slantingly on Berry Huckel, and they who love not
generalizing, may substitute for it the individual
specification
that, owing to the comforting operation of custom,
even Berry might not have troubled himself on the score
of the circumstantial and substantial fat by which he is
enveloped, had it not been that in addition to an affection
for himself, he had a desire that he should be equally
esteemed by another. In short, Berry discovered, like
many other people, that his sensibilities were expansive
as well as his figurethat it was not all sufficient to
happiness to love one's self, and that his heart was more
than a sulky, being sufficient to carry two. Although so
well fenced in, his soul was to be reached, and when
reached, it was peculiarly susceptible of soft impressions.
The blind bow-boy's butt-shaft never had a better mark.
In love, however, like does not consort with like
either in complexion, in figure, or in temper, or each
race would preserve its distinct lineage with the
regularity
of the stripes upon the tartan. The fiery little
manlittle men are almost always fiery, a fact which
can only be accounted for on the theory, that whether the
individual be big or little, he contains the same quantity
of the electro-magnetism of vitality, or in other words, of
the spirit of life,this spirit in a large body, having a
greater amount of matter to animate, cannot afford to
flash and blaze except on extraordinary occasions
while, being superabundant in the smaller figure, it has
a surplus on hand, which stimulates to restlessness and
activity, engenders warmth and irritability of temper,
and is always ready for explosionthus, the fiery little
man is apt to become attached to beauty upon a large
scale. He loves by the ton, and will have no idol but
one that he must look up to. By such means the
petulance
of diminutiveness is checked and qualified by the
phlegmatic calmness and repose of magnitude. The
walking tower, on the contrary, who shakes the earth
with his ponderous tread, dreams of no other lady-love
except those miniature specimens of nature's handiwork,
who move with the lightness of the gossamer, and seem
more like the creation of a delightful vision than tangible
reality. In this, sombre greatness asks alleviation from
the butterfly gayety which belongs to the figure of fairy
mould. The swarthy bend the knee to those of clear
and bright complexion, and your Saxon blood seeks the
dark-eyed one to pay its devotions. The impulse of
nature leads to those alliances calculated to correct faults
on both sides, and to prevent their perpetuity. The
grave would associate with the gay, the short pine for
the tall, the fat for the lean, the sulky for the sunny
the big covet the little; and, if our philosophy be not
always borne out by the result, it is because circumstance
or accident counteracts instinct, or that the cases cited
form exceptions to the rule without impairing its force.
A true theorist always leaves the wicket of escape open
behind him.
At all events, Berry Huckel was in the strictest
conformity
to the rule. His affections were set upon
lathiness
,
and if he could not fall in love, he certainly
contrived
to roll himself into it.
He was indulging himself in a walk on a pleasant day,
and, as usual, was endeavouring to dance along and to
skip over the impediments in the path, for the purpose
of persuading himself that he was a light and active
figure, and that if any change were going on in his
corporal
properties, it was a favourable one, when an event
occurred which formed an era in his life. He twirled
his little stick,a big one would have looked as if he
needed support,and, pushing a boy with a basket aside,
attempted to hop over a puddle which had formed on the
crossing at the corner of the street. The evolution,
however, was not so skilfully achieved as it would have
been by any one of competent muscle who carried less
weight. Berry's foot came down on the margin of
fair Zurich's waters, and caused a terrible splash,
sending the liquid mud about in every direction.
Phew! puffed Berry, as he recovered himself, and
looked with a doleful glance at the melancholy condition
in which his vivacity had left his feet.
Splut! ejaculated the boy with the basket, as he
wiped the mud out of his eyes. Jist let me ketch you
up our alley, that's all, puddy-fat!
Ah! shrieked Miss Celestina Scraggs, a very tall
lady, and particularly bony, as she regarded the terrible
spots and stains with which Berry had disfigured her
dress: what a pickle!
Berry turned round at the voice of a female in distress,
and the sight of her went to his heart like an arrow.
Miss Celestina Scraggs was precisely his beau ideal of
what a woman should benot perhaps in countenance,
but her figure was the very antipodes of his own, and he
felt that his time was come. As for face and a few more
years than are desirable, Berry cared not, if the lady were
tall enough and thin enough, and in the individual before
him he saw both those qualities combined.
My dear madam, said Berry, ducking his head
after the semblance of a bow, and raising his hat with a
graceful curvemy dear madam, I beg ten thousand
pardons. Allow me, if you please, continued he,
observing
that she paid no attention to his speech, and was
attempting to shake off the looser particles of mud, an
operation in which Berry ventured to assist.
Let me alone, sirI wonder at your impudence,
was the indignant reply, and Miss Celestina Scraggs
floated onward, frowning indignantly, and muttering as
she wentFirst splash a body, and then insult a body!
Pretty pickle,nice situation! fat bear!
Berry remained in attitude, his hat in one hand and
his handkerchief with which he would have wiped the
injured dress in the other. The scorn of the lady had
no other effect on him than that of riveting his chains.
Hip-helloo, you sir! shouted an omnibus driver
from his box, as he cracked his whip impatiently;
don't stand in the middle of the street all day a blockin'
up the gangvay, or I'll drive right over youblamenation
if I don't!
Shin it, good man! ejaculated a good-natured
urchin; shin it as well as you know how!
The qualification was a good one, Berry not being
well calculated for a shinner of the first class. So
starting from his revery, he hastened to escape as well
as he knew how, and, placing his hat once more upon
his head, he resolved to follow the injured lady to
ascertain
her residence, and to devise ways and means of
seeking her favour under better auspices. He hurried
up the street with breathless haste, forming a striking
resemblance to the figure which a turtle would present
if walking a match against time on its hinder flippers.
Passing over intermediate circumstances, it will
suffice to say that Mr. Berry Huckel discovered the
residence of Miss Scraggs, and that, by perseverance, he
obtained an introduction according to etiquette. The
more he saw of her the more thoroughly did he become
fascinated; but Miss Scraggs showed no disposition to
receive his suit with any symptoms of favour. She
scornfully rejected his addresses, chiefly because, although
having no objection to a moderate degree of plumpness,
his figure was much too round to square with her ideas
of manly beauty and gentility of person. In vain did he
plead the consuming passion, which, like the purest
anthracite with the blower on, flamed in his bosom and
consumed his vitals. Miss Scraggs saw no signs of
spontaneous combustion in his jolly form; and Miss
Scraggs, who is as tall and as straight as a poplar tree,
declared that she could not marry a man who would
hang upon her arm like a bucket to a pump. That he
was not a grenadier in height might have been forgiven;
but to be short and roly-poly at the same time! Miss
Seraphina Scraggs could not think of itshe would
faint at the idea.
Berry became almost desperate. He took lessons on
the flute, and trolled forth melancholy lays beneath the
lady's casement, to try the effect of dulcet sounds upon a
hard heart; but having been informed from a
neighbouring
window that fifer-boys were not wanted in that
street, and that no nuisances would be tolerated, he
abandoned music in despair; and having consulted a
physician as to the best method of reducing corpulency,
he went to the Gymnasium, and endeavoured to climb
poles and swing upon bars for hours at a time. But the
unhappy Berry made but little progress, and in his
unskilful efforts having damaged his nose and caused
temporary injury to the beauty of his frontispiece, he
gave up the design of making himself an athlete by that
species of exercise. For sparring, he found that he had
no genius at all, his wind being soon exhausted, and his
body being such pleasant practice that his opponents
never knew when to be done hitting at one whose frame
gave no jarring to the knuckles. It was, however,
picturesque
to see Berry with the gloves on, accoutred for
the fray, and squaring himself to strike and parry at his
own figure in the glass. Deliberation and the line of
beauty were in all his movements. Not obtaining his
end in this way, he tried dieting and a quarter at
dancing school; but short-commons proved too
disagreeable
,
and his gentle agitations to the sound of the fiddle,
as he
chassez'd, coupez'd, jetez'd
, and
balancez'd
only
increased his appetite and added to his sorrows.
Besides
,
his landlady threatened to discharge him for
damaging the house, and alarming the sleepers by his
midnight repetitions of the lessons of the day. As he
lay in bed wakeful with thought, he would suddenly, as
he happened to remember that every moment was of
importance for the reduction of his dimensions, slide out
upon the floor, and make tremendous efforts at a
performance
10
of the pigeon-wing, each thump resounding
like the report of a cannon, and causing all the glasses
in the row to rattle as if under the influence of an
earthquake
.
On one occasion indeedit was about two
o'clock in the morningthe whole house was roused by
a direful, and, until then, unusual uproar in the chamber
of Berry Huckela compound of unearthly singing and
of appalling knocks on the floor. The boldest, having
approached the door to listen, applied their ears to the
keyhole, and heard as follows: Turn out your toes
forward twotol-de-rol-tiddle (
thump
)tiddle (
bump
)
twiddle (
bang!
)cross overtiddle (
whack
)twiddle
(
smack
)tiddle (
crack
)twiddle (
bang!
)
(
Rap! rap! rap!
) Good gracious, Mr. Huckel, what's
the meaning of all this?are you crazy?
No, I'm dancing
balancez!
tiddle (
bump
)tiddle
(
thump
)tiddle (
bang!
)
Crash! splash! went the basin-stand, and the boarders
rushing in, found Berry Huckel in the garb of old
Gaul, stumbling amid the fragments he had caused by
his devotions to the graces. He was in disgrace for a
week, and always laboured under the imputation of
having been a little
non-com
on that occasion; but with
love to urge him on, what is there that man will not
strive to accomplish?
Berry's dancing propensity led him to various balls
and hops; and on one of these occasions, he met Miss
Scraggs in all her glory, but as disdainful as ever.
After bowing to her with that respectful air, which
intimated that the heart he carried, though lacerated by
her conduct, was still warm with affection, he took a
little weak lemonade, which, as he expressed it, was the
appropriate tipple for gentlemen in his situation, and then
placed himself immediately under the fiddlers, leaning
against the wall in a despairing attitude, arms carelessly
crossed, a handkerchief dangling negligently from his
little finger, his mouth half open, and his eyes now fixed
with resignation upon the ceiling, and anon dropping
misanthropically to the ground. The
tout ensemble
was touching in the extreme, but Miss Scraggs only
smiled derisively when her eyes fell upon her dejected
lover
Berry, however, finding that this would not do, cheered
himself with wine, and danced furiously at every
opportunity
.
Gracefully glided the dancers, merrily twinkled
their feet, and joyously squeaked the fiddles, as Berry,
late in the evening, panting with his previous
Terpsichorean
exertions, resolved to have a chat with the
obdurate
Seraphina, and solicited the honour of her fair hand
for the next set.
Mons'us warm, miss, said Berry, by way of
opening
the conversation in a novel and peculiarly elegant
way, mons'us warm, and dancing makes it mons'usser.
Very mons'us, replied Miss Scraggs, glancing at
him from head to foot with rather a satirical look, for
Miss Scraggs is disposed to set up for a wit; very
mons'us, indeed. But you look warm, Mr. Huckel
hadn't you better try a little punch? It will agree with
your figure.
Punch! exclaimed Berry, in dismay, as he started
back three stepsOh, Judy!
He rushed to the refreshment room to cool his fever
he snatched his hat from its dusky guardian, forgetting
to give him a levy, and hurriedly departed.
It was not many hours afterwards that Berryhis love
undiminished, and his knowledge refreshed that
gymnastics
are a remedy against exuberance of fleshwas seen
with his hat upon a stepping stone in front of a house in
Chestnut street, labouring with diligence at jumping over
both the stone and the chapeau. But the heaviness of
his heart seemed to rob his muscles of their elasticity.
He failed at each effort, and kicked his hat into the
middle of the street.
Phew! said he, my hat will be ruinationed to
all intents and purposes. Oh! if I wasn't so fat, I might
be snoozing it off at the rate of nine knots instead of
tiring myself to death. Fat ain't of no use, but on the
contrary. Fat horses, fat cows, and fat sheep are respected
accordin', but fat men are respected disaccordin'. Folks
laughthe gals turn up their noses, and Miss Scraggs
punches my feelings with a personal insinuation. Punch!
oh my!It's tiresome, to be sure, to jump over this 'ere,
but it's a good deal tiresomer to be so jolly you can't jump
at all, and can't even jump into a lady's affeckshins. So
here's at it agin. Warn'ee wunst! warn'ee twy'st!
warn'ee three timesall the way home!'
Berry stooped low, swinging his arms with a
pendulum
motion at each exclamation, and was about assuming
the salient attitude of the pound of butter which
Dawkins
,
for want of a heavier missile, threw at his wife, when
he was suddenly checked by the arrival of a fellow
boarder, who exclaimed, Why, Berry, what
are
you at?
Don't baulk, good manI say, don't baulkbut now
you have done it, can you jump over that 'ere hat, fair
standing jump, with a brick in each handnone of your
long runs and hop over?kin you do it?answer me
that! queried Berry, as he blew in his hands, and then
commenced flapping his arms
la
wood-sawyer.
Perhaps I mightbut it won't do for us to be cutting
rusties here at this time o' night. You had better sing
mighty small, I tell you.
Pooh! pooh! don't be redickalis. The doctor says
if I don't exercise, I'll be smothered; and Miss Scraggs
called me punch, and won't have meI'm jumping for
my life, and for my wife too.
You'd better go prentice to Jeames Crow, said
his friend Brom, dryly, and learn the real
scientifics
.
It would make me laugh, replied Berry, gravely;
such as you can afford to laugh and get fat, but I
can't. I've jumped six fireplugs a' ready, and I'll jump
over that 'ere hat before I go homeI'm be blowed out
bigger if I don't. Now squat, Bromsquat down, and
see if I go fair. Warn'ee wunst
You're crazy! answered Brom, losing all patience,
you're a downright noncompusser. I haven't seen a
queerer fellow since the times of `Zacchy in the
mealbag
;'
and if you go on as you have lately, it's my
opinion that your relations shouldn't let you run at
large.
That's what I complain ofI can't run any other
way than at large; but if you'll let me alone, I'll try to
jump myself smaller. So clear out, skinny, and let me
practyse. Warn'ee wunst!
You'd better come home, and make no bones about
it.
Bones! I ain't got any. I'm a boned turkey. If
you do make me go home, you can't say you boned me.
I've seen the article, but I never had any bones myself.
This was, to all appearance, true enough, but his
persecutor did not take the joke. Berry is, in a certain
sense, good stock. He would yield a fat dividend; but,
though so well incorporated, no bone-us for the
privilege
is forthcoming.
10*
Yes, you're fat enough, and I'm sorry to say, you're
queer enough too; queer is hardly a name for you. You
must be taken care of, and go home at once, or I'll call
assistance.
`Well, if I must, I mustthat's all. But if I get the
popperplexy, and don't get Miss Scraggs, it's all your
fault. You won't let me dance in my chamberyou
won't let me jump over my hatyou won't let me do
nothing. I can't get behind the counter to tend the
customers
,
without most backing the side of the house out;
but what do you care?and now you want me to get
fatter by going to sleep. By drat! I wouldn't wonder
if I was to be ten pounds heavier in the morning. If I
am, in the first place, I'll charge you for widening me and
spoiling my clothes; and thenfor if I get fatter, Miss
Scraggs won't have me a good deal more than she won't
now, and my hopes and affeckshins will be blighteder than
they are at this present sittingwhy, then, I'll sue you
for breach of promise of marriage.
Come along. There's too many strange people
running about already. It's time you were thinned off.
That's jist exactly what I want; I wish you could thin
me off, sobbed Berry, as he obeyed the order; but he
was no happier in the morning. Miss Seraphina Scraggs
continues obdurate, for her worst fears are realized. He
still grows fatter, though practising warn'ee wunst
at all convenient opportunities.
GARDEN THEATRICALS.
Man
is an imitative animal, and consequently, the
distinguished success which has fallen to the lot of a few
of our countrymen in the theatrical profession, has had
a great effect in creating longings for histrionic honours.
Of late years,
debuts
have been innumerable, and it
would be a more difficult task than that prescribed by
Orozimboto count the leaves of yonder forest
if any curious investigator, arguing from known to
unknown quantities, were to undertake the computation
of the number of Roscii who have not as yet been able
to effect their
coup d'essai
. In this quiet citymany
as she has already given to the boardsmultitudes are
yet to be found, burning with ardour to walk the
plank, who, in their prospective dreams, nightly hear
the timbers vocal with their mighty tread, and snuff the
breath of immortality in the imaginary dust which
answers to the shock. The recesses of the town could
furnish forth hosts of youths who never thrust the left
hand into a Sunday boot, preparatory to giving it the last
polish, without jerking up the leg thereof with a
Keanlike
scowl, and sighing to think that it is not the well
buffed gauntlet of crook'd Richardlads, who never don
their night gear for repose, without striding thus attired
across their narrow dormitory, and for the nonce,
believing
themselves accoutred to go on for Rolla, or
the Pythagorean of Syracusetwo gentlemen who
promenade
in cutty sarks, and are as indifferent about
rheumatism as a Cupid horsed upon a cloud.
But in the times of which we speak, stage-struck
heroes were rare. The theatrical mania was by no
means prevalent. It went and came like the
influenza
,
sometimes carrying off its victims; but they
were not multitudinous. Our actors were chiefly
importations
.
The day of native talent was yet in the
gray of its morninga few streakings or so, among the
Tressels and Tyrells, but nothing tip-topping it in the
zenith. There are, however, few generalities without
an exception, and in those days, Theodosius Spoon had
the honour to prove the rule by being an instance to the
contrary.
Theodosius Spooncalled by the waggish
Tea-spoon
,
and supposed by his admirers to be born for a stirring
fellowone who would whirl round until he secured for
himself a large share of the sugar of existence
Theodosius
Spoon was named after a Roman emperornot
by traditional nomenclature, which modifies the effect of
the thing, but directly, out of a history book abridged
by Goldsmith. It having been ascertained, in the first
place, that the aforesaid potentate, with the exception of
having massacred a few thousand innocent people one
day, was a tolerably decent fellow for a Roman
emperor
,
he was therefore complimented by having his name
bestowed upon a Spoon. It must not, however, be
thought that the sponsors were so sanguine as to
entertain
a hope that their youthful charge would ever reach
the purple. Their aspirations did not extend so far; but
being moderate in their expectations, they acted on the
sound and well established principle that, as fine feathers
make fine birds, fine names, to a certain extent, must
have an analogous effectthat our genius should be
educed, as it were, by the appellation bestowed upon
us; and that we should be so sagaciously designated that
to whatever height fortune leads, fame, in speaking of
us, may have a comfortable mouthful, and we have no
cause under any circumstances to blush for our name.
Mr. and Mrs. Spoonwise people in their way
reasoned
in the manner referred to. They were satisfied
that a sonorous handle to one's patronymic acts like a
balloon to its owner, and that an emaciated, every-day,
threadbare cognomena Tom, Dick, and Harry
denomination
is
a mere dipsey, and must keep a man at the
bottom. Coming to the application of the theory, they
were satisfied that the homely though useful qualities
of the spoon would be swallowed up in the superior
attributes of Theodosius. That this worthy pair were
right in the abstract is a self-evident proposition. Who,
for instance, can meet with a Napoleon Bonaparte Mugg,
without feeling that when the said Mugg is emptied of
its spirit, a soul will have exhaled, which, had the gate
of circumstance opened the way, would have played
foot-ball with monarchs, and have wiped its brogues
upon empires? An Archimedes Pipps is clearly born to
be a screw, and to operate extensively with burning
glasses, if not upon the fleets of a Marcellus, at least
upon his own body corporate. While Franklin Fipps,
if in the mercantile line, is pretty sure to be a great flier
of kites, and a speculator in vapours, and such like fancy
stocks. If the Slinkums call their boy Csar, it follows
as a natural consequence that the puggish disposition of
the family nose will, in his case, gracefully curve into the
aquiline, and that the family propensity for the Fabian
method of getting out of a scrape, will be Csarised into
a valour, which at its very aspect would set all Gaul
into a quake. Who can keep little Diogenes Doubikens
out of a tub, or prevent him from scrambling into a
hogshead, especially if sugar is to be gathered in the
interior? Even Chesterfield Gruff is half disposed to be
civil, if he thinks he can gain by so unnatural a course
of proceeding; and everybody is aware that Crichton
Dunderpate could do almost any thing, if he knew how,
and if, by a singular fatality, all his fingers were not
thumbs.
Concurrent testimony goes to prove that the son of a
great man is of necessity likewise greatthe children of
a
blanchisseuse
, or of a house-scrubber, have invariably
clean hands and faces; schoolmasters are very careful
to imbue their offspring with learning; and, if we are not
mistaken, it has passed into a proverb that the male
progeny
of a clergyman, in general, labour hard for the
proud distinction of being called hopeful youths and
promising youngsters. The corollary, therefore, flows
from this, as smoothly as water from a hydrant, that he
who borrows an illustrious name is in all probability
charged to the brim,
ipso facto
, with the qualities whereby
the real owner was enabled to render it illustrious
qualities
,
which only require opportunity and the true
position
to blaze up in spontaneous combustion, a beacon to
the world. And thus Theodosius Spoon, in his course
through life, could scarcely be otherwise than, if not an
antique Roman, at least an antic rum 'un; his sphere
of action might be circumscribed, but he could not do
otherwise than make a figure.
Our Spoonhis parents being satisfied with giving
him an euphonious namewas early dipped into the broad
bowl of the world to spoon for himself. He was
apprenticed
to a shoemaker to learn the art and mystery of
stretching uppers and of shaping unders. But,
for this employment, as it was merely useful and
somewhat
laborious, he had no particular fancy. Whether it
was owing to the influence of his name or not, we cannot
pretend to say, but, like Jaffier and many other worthy
individuals, he was much troubled with those serious
inconveniences
termed elegant desires. Young as he
was, his talent for eating was aldermanic; aristocracy
itself might have envied his somnolent performances in
the morning; while, if fun or mischief were afoot, no
watch dog could better encounter prolonged vigils, and
no outlying cat could more silently and skilfully crawl
in at a back window than he, when returning from his
nocturnal perambulations. His genius for lounging,
likewise
,
when he should have been at work, was as
remarkable
as his time-consuming power when sent on an
errand. He could seem to do more, and yet perform less,
than any lad of his inches in the town; and, being ordered
out on business, it was marvellous to see the swiftness
with which he left the shop, and the rapidity of his
immediate
return to it, contrasted with the great amount of
time consumed in the interval. With these
accomplishments
,
it is not surprising that Theodosius Spoon was
discontented with his situation. He yearned to be an
embellishmentnot a plodding letter, valuable only
in combination, but an ornamental flourish, beautiful
and graceful in itself; and, with that self-reliance
peculiar
to genius, he thought that the drama opened a short
cut to the summit of his desires. Many a time, as he
leaned his elbow on the lapstone, and reposed his chin
upon his palm, did his work roll idly to the floor,
while he gazed with envious eyes through the window
at the playbills which graced the opposite corner, and
hoped that the time would come when the first night of
Theodosius Spoon would be thereupon announced in
letters as large as if he were a histrionic ladle. Visions
of gloryof crowded housesof thundering plaudits
of full pocketsof pleasant nights, and of day lounges up
and down Chestnut street, the wonder of little boys and
the focus of all eyes,floated vividly across his
imagination
.
How could he, who bore the name of a Roman
emperor, dream of being elsewhere that at the topmost
round of fortune's ladder, when he had seen others there,
who, subjected to mental comparison, were mere
rushlights
compared to himself?
Filled with these gorgeous imaginings, our Spoon
became metamorphosed into a spout, pouring forth
streams of elocution by night and by day, and, though
continually corking his frontispiece to try the expression
in scenes of wrath, it soon became evident that his
powers could not remain bottled in a private station.
When a histrionic inclination ferments so noisily that its
fizzling disturbs the neighbourhood, it requires little
knowledge of chemistry to decide that it must have vent,
or an explosion will be the consequence; and such was
the case in the instance of which we speak. The
oratorical powers of Theodosius Spoon were truly
terrible, and had become, during the occasional absence
of the boss, familiar to every one within a square.
An opportunity soon afforded itself.Those
Philadelphians
,
who were neither too old nor too young, when
Theodosius Spoon flourished, to take part in the
amusements
of the town, do not require to be told that for the
delectation of their summer evenings, the city then
rejoiced in a Garden Theatre, which was distinguished
from the winter houses by the soft Italian appellation of
the Tivoli. It was located in Market near Broad street,
in those days a species of
rus in urbe
, improvement
not having taken its westward movement; and before its
brilliancy was for ever extinguished, the establishment
passed through a variety of fortunes, furnishing to the
public entertainment as various, and giving to the stage
many a regular whose first essay was made upon its
boards.
At this period, so interesting to all who study the
history of the drama, lived one Typus Tympan, a
printer's devil, who cronied with Spoon, and had been
the first to give the reaching of his soul an inclination
stageward. Typus worked in a newspaper office, where
likewise the bills of the Garden Theatre were printed,
and,
par consequence
, Typus was a critic, with the
entre
of the establishment, and an occasional order for
a friend. It was thus that Spoon's genius received the
Promethean spark, and started into life. By the
patronising
attentions of Typus, he was no longer compelled
to gaze from afar at the members of the company as they
clustered after rehearsal, of a sunny day, in front of the
theatre, and varied their smookings by transitions from
the long nine to the real Habana, according to the
condition of the treasury, or the state of the credit system.
Our hero now nodded familiarly to them all, and by dint
of soleing, heel-tapping, and other small jobs in the leather
way, executed during the periods of overwork for Mr.
Julius Augustus Winkins, was admitted to the personal
friendship of that illustrious individual. Some idea of the
honour thus conferred may be gathered from the fact
that Mr. Winkins himself constituted the entire male
department of the operatic corps of the house. He
grumbled the bass, he warbled the tenor, and, when
necessary, could squeak the counter in beautiful
perfection
.
All that troubled this magazine of vocalism
was that, although he could manage a duet easily enough,
soliloquizing a chorus was rather beyond his capacity, and
11
he was, therefore, often compelled to rely upon the
audience at the Garden, who, to their credit be it spoken,
scarcely needed a hint upon such occasions. On opera
nights, they generally volunteered their services to fill
out the harmony, and were so abundantly obliging, that
it was difficult to teach them where to stop. In his
private capacitywhen he was
ex officio
Winkinshe did
the melancholico-Byronic style of manpicturesque, but
suffering in his innards,to the great delight of all the
young ladies who dwelt in the vicinity of the Garden.
When he walked forth, it was with his slender frame
inserted in a suit of black rather the worse for wear, but
still retaining a touching expression, softened, but not
weakened, by the course of time. He wore his shirt
collars turned down over a kerchief in the fountain
tie, about which there is a Tyburn pathos, irresistible
to a tender heart; and with his well oiled and raven
locks puffed out
en masse
on the left side of his head,
he declined his beaver over his dexter eye until its brim
kissed the corresponding ear. A profusion of gilt chain
travelled over his waistcoat, and a multitude of rings of
a dubious aspect encumbered his fingers. In this
interesting
costume did Julius Augustus Winkins, in his
leisure moments, play the abstracted, as he leaned
gracefully
against the pump, while obliquely watching the
effect upon the cigar-making demoiselles who operated
over the way, and who regarded Julius as quite a love,
decidedly the romantic thing.
Winkins was gracious to Spoon, partly on the account
aforesaid, and because both Spoon and Tympan were
capital
claqueurs
, and invariably secured him an encore,
when he warbled Love has eyes, and the other
rational ditties in vogue at that period.
Now it happened that business was rather dull at the
Garden, and the benefit season of course commenced.
The hunting up of novelties was prosecuted with great
vigour; even the learned pig had starred at it for once;
and as the Winkins night approached, Julius Augustus
determined to avail himself of Spoon for that occasion,
thinking him likely to draw, if he did not succeed, for in
those days of primitive simplicity first appearances had
not ceased to be attractive. The edge not being worn
off, they were sure to be gratifying, either in one way
or the other.
It was of a warm Sunday afternoon that this important
matter was broached. Winkins, Spoon, and Tympan
sat solacing themselves in a box at the Garden,
puffing their cigars, sipping their liquid refreshment, and
occasionally nibbling at three crackers brought in upon
a large waiter, which formed the substantials of the
entertainment. The discourse ran upon the drama.
Theo, my boy! said Winkins, putting one leg on
the table, and allowing the smoke to curl about his nose,
as he cast his coat more widely open, and made the
accost friendly.
Spoon, my son! said Winkins, being the advance
paternal of that social warrior, as he knocked the ashes
from his cigar with a flirt of his little finger.
Spooney, my tight 'un!the assault irresistible,
how would you like to go it in uncle Billy Shakspeare,
and tip the natives the last hagony in the tragics?
Winkins put his other leg on the table, assuming an
attitude both of superiority and encouragement.
Oh, gammin! ejaculated Spoon, blushing, smiling,
and putting the forefinger of his left hand into his mouth.
Oh, get out! continued he, casting down his eyes
with the modest humility of untried, yet self-satisfied
genius.
Not a bit of itI'm as serious as an empty barn
got the geniuswant the chancemy benefittwo acts
of any thingcut mugsup to snuffdown upon 'em
fortune madethat's the go.
It's our opinion,we think, Theodosius, observed
Typus Tympan, with editorial dignity, as he
emphatically
drew his cuff across the lower part of his
countenance
,
we think, and the way we know what's what,
because of our situation, is sing'lerstanding, as we
newspaper folks do, on the shot tower of societythat
now's your time for gittin' astraddle of public opinion,
and for ridin' it like a hoss. Jist such a chance as
you've been wantin'. As the French say, all the
bew
mundy
come to Winkins's benefit; and if the old man
won't go a puff leaded, why we'll see to havin' it sneaked
in, spread so thick about genius and all, that it will
draw like a blisterwe will, even if we get licked for it.
'Twon't do, simpered Spoon, as he blushed brown,
while the expression of his countenance contradicted his
words. 'Twon't do. How am I to get a dresss'pose
boss ketches me at it? Besides, I'm too stumpy for
tragedy, and anyhow I must wait till I'm cured of my
cold.
It will do, returned Winkins, decisively; and
tragedy's just the thing. There are, sir, varieties in
tragedy
by
the new school, it's partitioned off in two
grand divisions. High tragedy of the most helevated
description, (Winkins always
haspirated
when desirous
of being emphatic,) high tragedy of the most helevated
and hexalted kind should be represented by a gentleman
short of statue, and low comedy should be sustained by
a gentleman tall of statue. In the one case, the higher
the part, the lowerer the hactor, and in the other case,
wisey wersy
. It makes light and shade between the
sentiment and the performer, and jogs the attention by
the power of contrast. The hintellectual style of
playing
likewise requires crooked legs.
We think, then, our friend is decidedly calkilated to
walk into the public. There's a good deal of
circumbendibus
about Spoon's gamshe's got serpentine
trotters
splendid
for crooked streets, or goin' round a
corner
,
interpolated Typus, jocularly.
There's brilliancy about crooked legs, continued
Winkins, with a reproving glance at Typus. The
monotony
of straight shanks answers well enough for genteel
comedy and opera; but corkscrew legs prove the mind
to be too much for the body; therefore, crooked legs,
round shoulders, and a shovel nose for the
heccentricities
of the hintellectual tragics. Audiences must have
it queered into 'em; and as for a bad cold, why it's a
professional blessing in that line of business, and saves a
tragedian the trouble of sleeping in a wet shirt to get a
sore throat. Blank verse, to be himpressive, must be
froggedit must be groaned, grunted, and gaspedbring
it out like a three-pronged grinder, as if body and soul
were parting. There's nothing like asthmatic elocution
and spasmodic emphasis, for touching the sympathies and
setting the feelings on edge. A terrier dog in a pucker
is a good study for anger, and always let the spectators
see that sorrow hurts you. There's another style of
tragedy
the
physical school
That must be a dose, ejaculated Typus, who was
developing into a wag.
But you're not big enough, or strong enough for
that. A physical must be able to outmuscle ten
blacksmiths
,
and bite the head off a poker. He must
commence
the play hawfully, and keep piling on the hagony
till the close, when he must keel up in an hexcruciating
11*
manner, flip-flopping it about the stage as he defuncts,
like a new caught sturgeon. He should be able to
hagonize
other people too, by taking the biggest fellow in the
company by the scuff of the neck, and shaking him at
arm's length till all the hair drops from his head, and
then pitch him across, with a roar loud enough to break
the windows. That's the menagerie method. The
physical
must always be on the point of bursting his boiler,
yet he mustn't burst it; he must stride and jump as if he
would tear his trousers, yet he mustn't tear 'em; and
when he grabs anybody, he must leave the marks of his
paws for a week. It's smashing work, but it won't do
for you, Spooney; you're little, black-muzzled, queer
in the legs, and have got a cold; nature and sleeping with
the windows open have done wonders in making you fit
for the hintellectuals, and you shall tip 'em the
sentimental
in Hamlet.
Parts of this speech were not particularly gratifying
to Spoon; but, on the whole, it jumped with his desires,
and the matter was clinched. Winkins trained him;
taught him when and where to come the hagony;
when and where to cut terrific mugs at the pit; when
and where to wait for the applause, and how to
chassez
an exit, with two stamps and a spring, and a glance
en arriere
.
Not long after, the puff appeared as Typus promised.
The bills of the Garden Theatre announced the
Winkins benefit, promising, among other novelties, the
third act of Hamlet, in which a young gentleman, his
first appearance upon any stage, would sustain the
character
of the melancholy prince. Rash promise! fatal
anticipation!
The evening arrived, and the Garden was crowded.
All the boys of the trade in town assembled to witness
the
debut
of a brother chip, and many came because others
were coming. Winkins, in a blue military frock,
buttoned
to the chin, white pantaloons strapped under the
foot, and gesticulating with a shining black hat with
white lining, borrowed expressly for the occasion, had
repeated My love is like the red, red rose with
immense applause, when the curtain rang up, and the
third act began.
The tedious prattle of those who preceded him being
over, Theodosius Spoon appeared. Solemnly, yet with
parched lips and a beating heart, did he advance to the
footlights, and duck his acknowledgments for the applause
which greeted him. His
abord
, however, did not
impress his audience favourably. The black attire but
ill became his short squab figure, and the hintellectual
tragicality of his legs, meandering their brief extent,
like a Malay creese, gave him the aspect of an Ethiopian
Bacchus dismounted from his barrel. Hamlet resembled
the briefest kind of sweep, or an erect black tadpole
taking snuff.
With a fidelity to nature never surpassed, Hamlet
expressed his dismay by scratching his head, and, with
his eyes fixed upon his toes, commenced the soliloquy,
another beautiful conception,for the prince is supposed
to be speaking to himself, and his toes are as well
entitled to be addressed as any other portion of his
personal
identity. This, however, was not appreciated by
the spectators, who were unable to hear any part of the
confidential communication going on between Hamlet's
extremities.
Louder, Spooney! squeaked a juvenile voice, with
a villanous twang, from a remote part of the Garden.
Keep a ladling it out strong! Who's afeard?it's only
old Tiwoly!
Throw it out! whispered Winkins, from the wing.
Go it like a pair of bellowses!
But still the pale lips of Theodosius Spoon continued
quivering nothings, as he stood gasping as if about to
swallow the leader of the fiddlers, and alternately raising
his hands like a piece of machinery. Ophelia advanced.
Look out, bull-frog, there comes your mammy.
Please, ma'am, make little sonny say his lesson.
Bursts of laughter, shouts, and hisses resounded
through the Garden. Whooror for Spooney! roared
his friends, as they endeavoured to create a diversion in
his favourwhooror for Spooney! and wait till the
skeer is worked off uv him!
How vu'd you like it? exclaimed an indignant
Spooneyite to a hissing malcontent; how vu'd you
like it fur to have it druv' into you this 'ere vay? Vot kin
a man do ven he ain't got no chance?
As the hisser did but hiss the more vigorously on
account of the remonstrance, and, jumping up, did it
directly in the teeth of the remonstrant, the friend to
Spooney knocked him down, and the
parquette
was soon
in an uproar. Leave him up! cried oneOrder!
put 'em down, and put 'em out! The aristocracy of
the boxes gazed complacently upon the grand set-to
beneath them, the boys whacked away with their clubs
at the lamps, and hurled the fragments upon the stage,
while Ophelia and Hamlet ran away together.
Ladies and gentlemen, exclaimed Winkins, as he
rushed upon the stage, dragging after him the rose and
the expectancy of the fair state, the shrinking
Theodosius
,will
you hear me for a moment?
Hurray for Vinkins! replied a brawny critic,
taking his club in both hands, as he hammered against
the front of the boxes; Vinkey, sing us the Bay uv
Viskey, and make bull-frog dance a hornspike to the tune
uv it. Hurray! Twig Vinkey's new hatmake a
speech, Vinkey, fur your vite trousers!
At length, comparative silence being restored, Mr.
Winkins, red with wrath, yet suppressing his rage,
delivered himself as followsat times adroitly dodging
the candle ends, which had been knocked from the main
chandelier, and were occasionally darted at him and his
proteg
.
Ladies and gentlemen, permit me (
dodge
)
respectfully
to ask one question. Did you (
dodge
) come here
to admire the beauties of the drama, (
successive dodges to
the right and left
,) or am I to (
dodge, dodge
) to
understand
that you came solely to kick up a bloody row?
The effect of this insinuating query had scarcely time
to manifest itself, before
Monsieur le directeur en chef
, a
choleric Frenchman, who made a profitable mixture of
theatricals, ice cream, and other refreshments, suddenly
appeared in the flat, foaming with natural anger at the
results of the young gentleman's
debut
. Advancing
rapidly as the kick rang upon his ear, he suited the
action to the word, and, by a dexterous application of his
foot, sent Winkins, in the attitude of a flying Mercury,
clear of the orchestra, into the midst of the turbulent
crowd in the pit. Three rounds of cheering followed this
achievement, while Theodosius gazed in pallid horror at
the active movement of his friend.
Kick, aha! Is zat de kick, monsieur dam
hoomboog
?
Messieurs et mesdames, lick him goodsump
him into fee-penny beets! Sacre! added the enraged
manager, turning toward Theodosius, I sall lick de
petit hoomboog ver' goodsump him bon, nice,
moimeme
by
me ownsef.
But the alarmed Theodosius, though no linguist,
understood enough of this speech not to tarry for the
consequences, and climbing into the boxes, while the
angry manager clambered after him, he rushed through
the crowd, and in the royal robes of Denmark hurried
home.
For the time, at least, he was satisfied that bearing the
name of a Roman emperor did not lead to instant success
on the stage, and though he rather reproached the
audience with want of taste, it is not probable that he
ever repeated the attempt; for he soon, in search of an
easy life, joined the patriots on the Spanish main, and
was never after heard of.
PETER BRUSH,
THE GREAT USED UP.
It
was November; soon after election time, when a
considerable portion of the political world are apt to be
despondent, and external things appear to do their utmost
to keep them so. November, the season of dejection,
when pride itself loses its imperious port; when
ambition
gives place to melancholy; when beauty hardly
takes the trouble to look in the glass; and when
existence
doffs its rainbow hues, and wears an aspect of such
dull, commonplace reality, that hope leaves the world
for a temporary excursion, and those who cannot do
without her inspiring presence, borrow the aid of pistols,
cords, and chemicals, and send themselves on a longer
journey, expecting to find her by the way:a season,
when the hair will not stay in curl; when the walls weep
dewy drops, to the great detriment of paper-hangings,
and of every species of colouring with which they are
adorned; when the banisters distil liquids, any thing
but beneficial to white gloves; when nature fills the
ponds, and when window-washing is the only species of
amusement at all popular among housekeepers.
It was on the worst of nights in that worst of seasons.
The atmosphere was in a condition of which it is difficult
to speak with respect, much as we may be disposed to
applaud the doings of nature. It was damp, foggy, and
drizzling; to sum up its imperfections in a sonorous and
descriptive epithet, it was 'orrid muggy weather. The
air hung about the wayfarer in warm, unhealthy folds,
and extracted the starch from his shirt collar and from
the bosom of his dickey, with as much rapidity as it
robbed
his spirits of their elasticity, and melted the sugar of
self-complacency from his mind. The street lamps
emitted a ghastly white glare, and were so hemmed in
with vapory wreaths, that their best efforts could not
project a ray of light three feet from the burner. Gloom
was universal, and any change, even to the heat of Africa,
or to the frosts of the arctic circle, would, in
comparison
,
have been delightful. The pigs' tails no longer
waved in graceful sinuosities; while the tail of each
night-roving, hectoring bull-dog ceased flaunting toward
the clouds, a banner of wrath and defiance to punier
creatures
,
and hung down drooping and dejected, an emblem
of a heart little disposed to quarrel and offence. The
ornamentals of the brute creation being thus below par,
it was not surprising that men, with cares on their
shoulders
and raggedness in their trousers, should likewise
be more melancholy than on occasions of a brighter
character. Every one at all subject to the skiey
influences
,
who has had trouble enough to tear his clothes,
and to teach him that the staple of this mundane
existence
is not exclusively made up of fun, has felt that
philosophy
is but a barometrical affair, and that he who is
proof against sorrow when the air is clear and bracing,
may be a very miserable wretch, with no greater cause,
when the wind sits in another quarter.
Peter Brush is a man of this susceptible class. His
nervous system is of the most delicate organization, and
responds to the changes of the weather, as an Eolian
harp sings to the fitful swellings of the breeze. Peter
was abroad on the night of which we speak; either
because, unlike the younger Brutus, he had no Portia
near to tell him that such exposure was not physical,
and that it was the part of prudence to go to bed, or that,
although aware of the dangers of miasma to a man of his
constitution, he did not happen at that precise moment
to have access to either house or bed; in his opinion,
two essential pre-requisites to couching himself, as he
regarded taking it
al fresco
, on a cellar door, not likely
to answer any sanitary purpose. We incline ourselves
to the opinion that he was in the dilemma last mentioned,
as it had previously been the fate of other great men.
But be that as it may, Mr. Peter Brush was in the street,
as melancholy as an unbraced drum, a gib-ed cat, or
a lugged bear.
Seated upon the curb, with his feet across the gutter,
he placed his elbow on a stepping-stone, and like Juliet
on the balcony, leaned his head upon his handa hand
that would perhaps have been the better of a covering,
though none would have been rash enough to volunteer
to be a glove upon it. He was in a dilapidated condition
out at elbows, out at knees, out of pocket, out of office,
out of spirits, and out in the streetan out and outer
in every respect, and as
outr
a mortal as ever the eye of
man did rest upon. For some time, Mr. Brush's
reflections
had been silent. Following Hamlet's advice, he
gave them an understanding, but no tongue; and he
relieved himself at intervals by spitting forlornly into
the kennel. At length, suffering his locked hands to
fall between his knees, and heaving a deep sigh, he
spoke:
A long time ago, my ma used to put on her specs
and say, `Peter, my son, put not your trust in princes;'
and from that day to this I haven't done any thing of the
12
kind, because none on 'em ever wanted to borry nothing
of me; and I never see a prince or a king,but one or
two, and they had been rotated out of office,to borry
nothing of them. Princes! pooh!Put not your trust
in politicianersthem's my sentiments. You might jist
as well try to hold an eel by the tail. I don't care which
side they're on, for I've tried both, and I know. Put
not your trust in politicianers, or you'll get a hyst.
Ten years ago it came into my head that things
weren't going on right; so I pretty nearly gave myself
up tee-totally to the good of the republic, and left the
shop to look out for itself. I was brimfull of patriotism,
and so uneasy in my mind for the salivation of freedom,
I couldn't work. I tried to guess which side was going
to win, and I stuck to it like wax;sometimes I was
a-one side, sometimes I was a-t'other, and sometimes I
straddled till the election was over, and came up jist in
time to jine the hurrah. It was good I was after; and
what good could I do if I wasn't on the 'lected side?
But, after all, it was never a bit of use. Whenever the
battle was over, no matter what side was sharing out the
loaves and the fishes, and I stepped up, I'll be hanged if
they didn't cram all they could into their own mouths,
put their arms over some, and grab at all the rest with
their paws, and say, `Go away, white man, you ain't
capable.'Capable! what's the reason I ain't capable?
I've got as extensive a throat as any of 'em, and I could
swallow the loaves and fishes without choking, if each
loaf was as big as a grindstone and each fish as
big as a sturgeon. Give Peter a chance, and leave him
alone for that. Then, another time when I called`I
want some spoils,' says I; `a small bucket full of spoils.
Whichever side gets in, shares the spoils, don't they?'
So they first grinned, and then they ups and tells me that
virtue like mine was its own reward, and that spoils
might spoil me. But it was
no
spoils that spoilt me,
and
no
loaf and fish that starved meI'm spoilt because
I couldn't get either. Put not your trust in politicianers
I say it agin. Both sides used me jist alike. Here
I've been serving my country, more or less, these ten
years, like a patriotgoing to town meetings, hurraing
my daylights out, and getting as blue as blazesblocking
the windows, getting licked fifty times, and having more
black eyes and bloody noses than you could shake a
stick at, all for the common good, and for the purity of
our illegal rightsand all for what? Why, for nix. If
any good has come of it, the country has put it into her
own pocket, and swindled me out of my arnings. I can't
get no office! Republics is ungrateful! It wasn't reward
I was after. I scorns the base insinivation. I only
wanted to be took care of, and have nothing to do but to
take care of the public, and I've only got halfnothing
to do! Being took care of was the main thing.
Republics
is
ungrateful; I'm swaggered if they ain't. This is
the way old sojers is served.
Peter, having thus unpacked his o'erfraught heart,
heaved a sigh or two, as every one does after a
recapitulation
of their own injuries, and remained for a few
minutes wrapped in abstraction.
Well, well, said he, mournfully, swaying his head
to and fro after the sagacious fashion of Lord Burleigh
live and learnlive and learnthe world's not what a
man takes it for before he finds it out. Whiskers grow
a good deal sooner than experiencegenus and
patriotism
ain't got no chanceheigh-ho!But anyhow, a
man might as well be under kiver as out in the open air
in sich weather as this. It's as cheap laying down as it is
settin' up, and there's not so much wear and tear about it.
With a groan, a yawn, and a sigh, Peter Brush slowly
arose, and stretching himself like a drowsy lion, he
walked toward the steps of a neighbouring house. Having
reached the top of the flight, he turned about and looked
round with a scrutinizing glance, peering both up and
down the street, to ascertain that none of the hereditary
enemies of the Brushes were in the vicinity. Being
satisfied on that score, he prepared to enjoy all the
comfort
that his peculiar situation could command.
According
to the modern system of warfare, he carried no
baggage
to encumber his motions, and was always ready to
bivouac without troublesome preliminaries. He
therefore
placed himself on the upper step, so that he was
just within the doorway, his head reclining against one
side of it, and his feet braced against the other,
blockading
the passage in a very effectual manner. He adjusted
himself in position as carefully as the Sybarite who was
annoyed at the wrinkle of a rose-leaf on his couch,
grunting
at each motion like a Daniel Lambert at his toilet,
and he made minute alterations in his attitude several
times before he appeared perfectly satisfied that he had
effected the best arrangements that could be devised.
After reposing for a while as if the flinty and steel
couch of war were his thrice-driven bed of down, he
moved his head with an exclamation of impatience at the
hardness of the wall, and taking his time-worn beaver,
he crumpled it up, and mollified the austerity of his
bolster
by using the crushed hat as a pillow.
That will do, ejaculated Brush, clasping his hands
before him, and twirling his thumbs; and he then closed
his eyes for the purpose of reflecting upon his condition
with a more perfect concentration of thought than can be
obtained when outward objects distract the mind. But
thinking in this way is always a hazardous experiment,
whether it be after dinner, or in the evening; and Peter
Brush soon unwittingly fell into a troubled, murmuring
sleep, in which his words were mere repetitions of what
he had said before, the general scope of the argument
being to prove the received axiom of former times, that
republics do not distribute their favours in proportion to
services rendered, and that, in the speaker's opinion, they
are not, in this respect, much better than the princes against
whom his mother cautioned him. Such, at least, was
the conviction of Mr. Brush; at which he had arrived,
not by theory and distant observation, but by his own
personal experience.
It is a long lane which has no turning, and it is a long
sleep in the open air, especially in a city, which does not
meet with interruption. Brush found it so in this
instance
,
as he had indeed more than once before. Several
gentlemen, followed by a dog, arrived at the foot of the
steps, and, after a short conversation, dispersed each to
his several home. One, however, remainedthe owner
of the dogwho, whistling for his canine favourite, took
out his night-key, and walked up the steps. The dog,
bounding before his master, suddenly stopped, and after
attentively regarding the recumbent Brush, uttered a
sharp rapid bark.
The rapidity of mental operations is such that it
frequently
happens, if sleep be disturbed by external sounds,
that the noise is instantly caught up by the ear, and
incorporated
with the subject of the dreamor perhaps a
dream is instantaneously formed upon the nucleus
suggested
by the vibration of the tympanum. The bark of
the dog had one of these effects upon Mr. Brush.
Bow! wow! waugh! said the dog.
There's a fellow making a speech against our side,
muttered Peter; but it's all talkwhere's your facts?
12*
print your speech in pamphlet form, and I'll answer it.
Hurray for us!everybody else is rascalsnothing but
ruination when that fellow's principles get the upper
handour side for everwe're the boys!
Be still, Ponto! said the gentleman. Now, sir,
be pleased to get up, and carry yourself to some other
place. I don't know which side has the honour of
claiming
you, but you are certainly on the wrong side at
present.
Don't be official and trouble yourself about other
people's business, said Brush, trying to open his eyes;
don't be official, for it isn't the genteel thing.
Not official! what do you mean by that? I shall be
very official, and trundle you down the steps if you are
not a little more rapid in your motions.
Oh, very well, responded Brush, as he wheeled
round in a sitting posture, and fronted the stranger
very wellbe as sassy as you pleaseI suppose you've
got an office, by the way you talkyou've got one of
the fishes, though perhaps it is but a minny, and I ain't
but if I had, I'd show you a thing or two. Be sassy, be
any thing, Mr. Noodle-soup. I don't know which side
you're on either, but I do know one thingit isn't saying
much for your boss politicianer that he chose you when
I must have been on his list for promotionthat's all,
though you are so stiff, and think yourself pretty to look
at. But them that's pretty to look at ain't always good
'uns to go, or you wouldn't be poking here. Be off
there's no more business before this meeting, and you
may adjourn. It's moved, seconded, and carriedpay the
landlord for the use of the room as you go.
The stranger, now becoming somewhat amused, felt a
disposition to entertain himself a little with Peter.
How does it happen, said he, that such a public
spirited individual as you appear to be should find
himself
in this condition? You've had a little too much of
the
stimulantibus
, I fear.
I don't know Greek, but I guess what you mean,
was the answer. It's owing to the weatherpart to
the weather, and part because republics is ungrateful;
that's considerable the biggest part. Either part is excuse
enough, and both together makes it a credit. When it's
such weather as this, it takes the electerizing fluid out
of you; and if you want to feel something likedo you
know what `something like' is?it's cat-bird, jam up
if you want to feel so, you must pour a little of the
electerizing
fluid into you. In this kind of weather you must
tune yourself up, and get rosumed, or you ain't good for
muchtuned up to concert pitch. But all that's a trifle
put not your trust in politicianers.
And why not, Mr. Rosum?
Why not! Help us uptheresteady she goes
hold on! Why not?look at me, and you'll see the why
as large as life. I'm the why you musn't put your trust
in politicianers. I'm a rig'lar patriotlook at my coat
I'm all for the public goodtwig the holes in my
trousers
.
I'm steady in my course, and I'm upright in my
conductdon't let me fall downI've tried all parties,
year in and year out, just by way of making myself
popular and agreeable; and I've tried to be on both sides
at once, roared Brush, with great emphasis, as he
slipped
and felland this is the end of it!
His auditor laughed heartily at this striking illustration
of the results of the political course of Peter Brush, and
seemed quite gratified with so strong a proof of the
danger
of endeavouring to be on two sides at once. He
therefore assisted the fallen to rise.
Are you hurt?
NoI'm used to being knocked aboutthe steps
and the pavement are no worse than other people
they're like politicianersyou can't put any trust in 'em.
But, continued Brush, drawing a roll of crumpled
paper from the crown of his still more crumpled hat
see here nowyou're a clever fellow, and I'll get you
to sign my recommendation. Here's a splendid
character
for me all ready wrote down, so it won't give you
any trouble, only to put your name to it.
But what office does it recommend you forwhat
kind of recommendation is it?
It's a circular recommenda slap at any thing that's
going.
Firing into the flock, I suppose?
That's it exactlygood characterfit for any fat
post either under the city government, the state
government
,
or the gineral government. Now jist put your
fist to it, added Peter, in his most persuasive tones, as
he smoothed the paper over his knee, spread it upon the
step, and produced a bit of lead pencil, which he first
moistened with his lips, and then offered to his
interlocutor
.
Excuse me, was the laughing response; it's too
darkI can't see either to read or to write. But what
made you a politicianer? Haven't you got a trade?
Trade! yes, replied Brush, contemptuously; but
what's a trade, when a feller's got a soul? I love my
country, and I want an officeI don't care what, so it's
fat and easy. I've a genus for governingfor telling
people
what to do, and looking at 'em do it. I want to take
care of my country, and I want my country to take care
of me. Head work is the trade I'm made fortalking
that's my linetalking in the streets, talking in the
barrooms
,
talking in the oyster cellars. Talking is the
grease for the wagon wheels of the body politic and the
body corpulent, and nothing will go on well till I've got
my say in the matter; for I can talk all day, and most
of the night, only stopping to wet my whistle. But
parties is all alikeall ungrateful; no respect for genus
no respect for me. I've tried both sides, got nothing,
and I've a great mind to knock off and call it half a day.
I would, if my genus didn't make me talk, and think, and
sleep so much I can't find time to work.
Well, said the stranger, you must find time to go
away. You're too noisy. How would you like to go
before the mayor?
No, I'd rather not. Stopnow I think of it, I've
asked him before; but perhaps if you'd speak a good
word, he'd give me the first vacancy. Introduce me
properly
,
and say I want something to do shockingno,
not something to doI want something to get; my
genus won't let me work. I'd like to have a fat salary,
and to be general superintendent of things in general
and nothing in particular, so I could walk about the
streets, and see what is going on. Now, put my best
leg foremostsay how I can make speeches, and how I
can hurray at elections.
Away with you, said the stranger, as he ran
up the steps, and opened the door. Make no noise
in this neighbourhood, or you'll be taken care of soon
enough.
Well, now, if that isn't ungrateful, soliloquized
Brush,keep me here talking, and then slap the door
right in my face. That's the way politicianers serve me,
and it's about all I'd a right to expect. Oh, pshaw!
sich a worldsich a people!
Peter rolled up his circular recommend, put it in
his hat, and slowly sauntered away. As he is not yet
provided for, he should receive the earliest attention of
parties, or disappointment may induce him to abandon
both, take the field upon his own hook, and constitute
an independent faction under the name of the Brush
party, the cardinal principle of which will be that
peculiarly
novel impulse to action, hostility to all
politicianers
who are not on the same side.
MUSIC MAD;
OR, THE MELOMANIAC.
To be thin-skinned may add to the brilliancy and to
the beauty of the complexion; but, as this world goes,
it is more of a disadvantage than a blessing. Where
there is so much scraping and shaving, the cuticle of a
rhinoceros is decidedly the most comfortable wear; and to
possess any of the senses beyond a certain degree of
acuteness may be regarded as a serious misfortune. It
opens the door to an infinite variety of annoyances.
There are individuals with noses as keen as that of a
beagle; but whether they derive more of pleasure or of
pain from the faculty, is a question easily answered when
the multiplicity of odors is called to mind. To be what
the Scotch term nose-wise, sometimes, it is true,
answers a useful purpose, in preventing people in the
dark from drinking out of the wrong bottle, and from
administering
the wrong physic; it has also done good
service in enabling its possessor to discover an incipient
fire; but such occasions for the advantageous
employment
of the proboscis are not of every-day occurrence,
and, on the general average, its exquisite organization is
an almost unmitigated nuisance to him who is obliged
to follow from his cradle to his grave, a nose so
delicately
constituted, so inconveniently hypercritical, so
frequently
discontented, and so intolerably fastidious.
They, likewise, who are gifted with that which is
technically termed a fine ear, have sufferings
peculiar
to themselves, and, like the king of Denmark, receive
their poison through the porches of the auricle. They
are the victims of sound. It is conceded that from good
music they derive pleasures of which the rest of the
world can form but a faint conception; but,
notwithstanding
the rage for its cultivation, really good music is
not quite so plentiful as might be supposed, and the pain
inflicted on the family of fine ear by the inferior
article
is not to be expressed in words. A discord passes
through them as freezingly as if it were a bolt of ice; a
flat note knocks them down like a mace; and, if the
vocalist flies into the opposite extreme, and indulges in
being a little sharp, all the acids of the shop could not
give the unhappy critic a more vinegar aspect, or more
effectually set his teeth one edge. To him a noise is not
simply a noise in the concrete; the discriminating
powers of his tympanum will not suffer him, as it were,
to lump it as an infernal clatter. Like a skilful torturer,
he analyzes the annoyance; he augments the pain by
ascertaining exactly why the cause is unpleasant, and by
observing the relative discordance of the components,
which, when united, almost drive him mad. The drum
and the fife, for instance, do very well for the world at
large; but the man with the ear is too often
agonized
at perceiving how seldom it is that the drumstick
twirler braces his sheepskin to the proper pitch, and he
cannot be otherwise than excruciated at the piteous
squeaking of its imperfect adjunctthat false one
which is truly a warlike instrument, being studiously
and successfully constructed for offence, if not for
defence
.
Now it so happens that Matthew Minim is a man
with an ear, his tympanum being a piece of most
elaborate
workmanship. He could sing before he could talk,
and his early musical experiments were innumerable.
The first use he made of his teeth was to bite his nurse
for singing one strain of hush-a-by-baby, in three
keys; and he could scarcely be prevailed upon to look at
his pa, because that respectable individual, with a
perversity
peculiar to the incompetent, was always subjecting
poor Hail Columbia to the Procrustean bed of his
musical capabilities, and, while whistling to show his
own light-heartedness, did any thing but communicate
corresponding pleasure to his auditors.
Screw it up, poppy, would little Minim exclaim,
with the expression of one upon the rack; screw it up,
and keep it there. What's the use of chasing a tune all
about?
But in some mouths a tune will run all about of itself,
let their lips be puckered ever so tightly, and there is no
composition of a popular nature which is so often heard
performing that erratic feat as the one familiarly termed
Hail Curlumby. Matthew's poppy, therefore,
remained
a tune-chaser, while Matthew himself went on
steadily in the work of cultivating his ear, and of
enlarging
his musical knowledge. He, of course, commenced
his studies with the flute, which may be regarded among
men and boys as the first letter of the alphabet in
musical
education. He then amused himself with the
fiddle
tried
the French horn for a season, varying the
matter by a few lessons upon the clarionet and hautboy,
and finally improving his powers of endurance by a little
practising of the Kent bugle. He at length became a
perfect melomaniac, and was always in danger of being
indicted as a nuisance by his less scientific neighbours,
whose ears were doomed to suffer both by night and by
13
day. The twangling of stringed instruments was the
only relief they could obtain from the blasts of those
more noisy pieces of mechanism which receive voice
from the lips, and it has even been supposed that
Matthew
Minim ranged his bugles, trumpets, and fiddles by
the side of his bed, that he might practise between
sleeps.
Not long since, Matthew Minim was returning from
a musical party late at night, and his friend Jenkinson
Jinks, who is likewise a votary of the divine art, was
with him. Minim carried his flute in a box under his
arm, and Jinks bore his fiddle in a bag on his shoulder.
Nature, observed Minim, is the most perfect of
musicians; she never violates the rules of composition,
and though her performers are often noisy, yet, so long as
they attempt no more than is jotted down for them, they
are always in time and in tune. In fact, the world is one
great oratorio. Hark!listen! throw aside vulgar
prejudices
,
and hear how chromatic and tender are the voices
of those cats in the kennel!consider it as the balcony
scene from
Romeo e Giulietta
how perfectly beautiful
that slide! how exact the concord between the rotund bass
notes of Thomas Cat, and the dulcet intonations of the
feminine pussy, and how sparkling the effect produced
by the contrast in the alternate passages! They are the
Fornasari and the Pedrotti of this moonlit scene.
Bellini
himself, with all his flood of tenderness, never
produced
any thing more characteristic, appropriate, and
touching; nor could the most accomplished
artistes
give
the idea of the composer with more fidelity.
Yes, ma'am, said Jenkinson Jinks, who was not
altogether
capable of entering into the spirit of the refined
abstractions in which, after supper, his companion was
prone to indulge.
Ph-i-t!  ph-i-z! exclaimed the cats, as they
scampered away in alarm at the approach of the
musicians
.
Staccato
and expressive in execution, said Jinks;
but certainly not
stay-cat-o
in effect.
Admirable! remarked MinimPhit and phiz are
the exact phrase to express in short metre that it is time
to be off like a shot, and the notes in which they were
uttered
are those best calculated to convey the sense of the
passage.
A very rapid passage it was, too, added Jinks;
quite a
roulade
the performers are running divisions
up and down old Boodle's fencea passage from the
oratorio of `Mosey' perhaps.
I bar punning, ejaculated Minim, impatiently; and
to elucidate my theory upon the subject of natural music,
and to prove
Cate
gorically? inquired Jinks.
Hush! To prove that the composer can have no
better
study for the true expression of the passions and
emotions than is to be found in observing the animal
creation, I shall now proceed to kick this dog, which
lies asleep upon the pavement, and, without his being at
all aware of what I want, I shall extract from him a
heartrending passage in the minor key, expressive of
great dolor, and of a sad combination of mental and
physical
discomfort.
Stop! hurriedly exclaimed Jinks, ensconcing
himself
behind a tree; before you give that
dog
matical
illustration, allow me to inform you that the dog before
you is old Boodle's Towserhe bites like fury.
Bite! replied Minim, contemptuously; and what's
a bite in the cause of science, and in the exemplification
of the minor key?
Minim accordingly gave the dog a gentle push with his
foot.
Ya-a-a-ah! angrily and threateningly remonstrated
Towser, without moving.
ThereI told you so! roared Jinksthat's not
in the minor keyit's as military a major as ever I heard
in my life: when I listen to it, I can almost see you in
the shape of a cocked hat.
Well, then, poke him with your fiddle, said
Minim
,
drawing back, and eying the dog rather suspiciously.
Come away from the tree, and give Mr. Boodle's
Towser a jolly good punch.
Not I, replied Jinks; I've no notion of letting my
Cremona be chawed up
agitato
by an angry Towser
poke him with your flute.
NostopI'll get at him as it were slantindicularly
round a corner, said Minim, retiring so that he was
partially protected by the flight of steps, from which
position he extended his leg, and dealt to Mr. Boodle's
Towser a most prodigious kick.
Y-a-h! y-o-a-h!b-o-o! snarled the dog
indignantly
,
as he dashed round the corner to revenge the
insult
,
which was so direct and pointed that no animal of
spirit could possibly pass it over unnoticed.
Mr. Matthew Minim turned to fly, but he was not
quick enough, and the dog entered a detainer by seizing
him by the pantaloons.
Get out! shrieked Minim. Take him off, Jinks,
or he'll eat me without salt!
Splendid illustration of natural music! shouted
Jinks, clapping his hands in ecstasy;
Con furore! Da
capo
, Towser!
Volti subito
, Minim!Music
expressive
of tearing your breeches. I never saw a situation
at once so picturesque, dramatic, and operatic. Why
don't you sing
`
Oh, I cannot give expression
To this dog's deep felt impression
?'
for I'm sure, while he bites and you squeal, that he's
proving to your satisfaction how well nature understands
counterpoint. Bravo, Towser!  that's a magnificent
shake; but he won't let you favour us with a run,will
he, Matthew?
Towser held on determinedly, shaking his head and
growling fiercely, with his mouth full of pantaloons,
which, however, being very strong, did not give way and
suffer the distressed captive to escape.
Hit him with a stickget a big stone! panted
Minimquit cracking jokes, for when the cloth goes
the horrid beast will take hold againperhaps of my
flesh, and bite a piece right out!
Very likelyit's better eating than woollens; but
go on with your duetdon't mind me, added Jinks
quietly, as he looked about for a missile. Having found
one sufficiently heavy for his purpose, he took deliberate
aim, and threw it with such force that the angry animal
was almost demolished. On finding himself so violently
assailed, the dog relaxed his jaws and scampered down
the street, making the neighbourhood vocal with his cries.
There, I told you, said Minim, settling his
disordered
dress, and hoping, by taking the lead in conversation,
to avoid any hard-hearted reference to his misfortuneI
told you he would sing out in the minor key, if he was
hurt. Hear that nowthe dog is really heartrending.
Yes, replied Jinks, he's quite a tearer of a dog
now heartrending, and from the looks of your clothes,
he was a little while ago really breeches-rending. But
pick up your flutethe lecture upon natural music is
over for this evening.
13*
Um! growled Minim, discontentedly, as he took
up his hat and flute-box, and walked
dog
gedly forward.
Not a word was said while they walked several squares.
Peter was musing upon the cost of new pantaloons, and
Jinks chuckled to himself as he thought how capitally
the story about natural music would tell at a small
party.
A protracted silence, however, if men are not alone or
are not positively occupied, becomes wearisome and
annoying
,
and brings the nerves into unpleasant action.
Taciturnity, though commended, is after all but a
monkish virtue. Nature designed the human race to talk
when they are togetherto be brightened and enlivened
by an interchange of sentiment; and while gratifying
themselves by exhibiting their old ideas, to be enriched
by the reception of new thoughts and fresh impressions.
So strong is the impulse, that there are many minds
which, under these circumstances, cannot continue a chain
of thought, and grow restless and impatient, in the belief
that the neighbour mind gives out nothing because it
waits for the lead, and is troubled for the want of it. The
silence therefore continues, the same idea prevailing on
both sides, and disabling each from tossing a subject into
the air, to elicit that volley of ideas or of words, as the
case may be, which constitutes conversation. The
exemplification
is to be met with every day, and never
more frequently than in formal calls, when the parties
are not so well acquainted as to be able to find a
common
topic on an emergency. He was not so much of
a simpleton as people think him, who said a foolish thing
during the excruciating period of an awkward pause,
merely for the purpose of making talk. Every one
is familiar with plenty of instances, in which a Wamba
to make talk would have been regarded as a blessing,
saving those present from the torture of cudgelling torpid
brains in vain, and from the annoyance of knowing that
each uncomfortable looking individual of the company,
though likewise cudgelling, regarded every other person
as remarkably stupid and unsocial.
From feelings analogous to those just mentioned, was
it that Jenkinson Jinks felt it incumbent upon him to
hazard an observation. He looked about for a cloud, but
there was none to be seen. He glanced at the stars, but
they were neither very bright nor very dim.
Magnificent houses, said Jinks, at last, by way of
starting a leading fact, which was at once undeniable and
calculated to elicit a kindly response. The conscience
of Jinks rather reproached him with having laughed too
heartily at Minim's recent misadventure, and he
therefore
selected a topic the least likely to afford opportunity
for a petulant reply, or to open the way to altercation.
Minim received the olive branch.
Yes, but there's a grand mistake about this
luxurious
edifice for instance, replied Minim; halting, and
leaning against a pump in front of a house which was
adorned with both a bell and a knocker, the builder
has regarded the harmony of proportion, and all that
he has made the proper distances between the windows
and doors,the countenance, expression, and figure of
the house has been attended to; but I'm ready to bet,
without trying, that no one has thought of its voiceno
one has had the refined judgment to harmonize the bell
and the knocker, and, luckily for our nerves, knockers
are going out and have left the field to the bells. But,
where they remain, there's nothing but discord in the
vocal department; and if the servants have ears,and
why should they not?it must almost drive them
distracted
.
Yes, yesvery prettyfine steps, fine house,
bright knocker, glittering bell handle, and plenty of
discord
.
It's as sure as that the bell and knocker are there
in juxtaposition. To be morally certain, I'll try.
Up strode Matthew Minim to the top of the steps.
Now, Jinksout with your fiddleit's up to
concert
pitchsound your A.
Jinks laughingly did as he was ordered, and after a
preliminary flourish, sounded orchestra fashion, Twa-a-a
twawdle, tweedle, twawdletwa-a-a!
Taw-lol-tol-teetee-lol-tol-taw! sang Minim,
travelling
up and down the octave, to be sure of the pitch.
Now, listen, and he rattled a stirring peal upon the
knocker. That's not in tune with us no how you can
take itis it, Jinks?
Notwudle, tweedle, twudle, tweedle! replied
Jinks, fiddling merrily, as he skipped about the pavement,
delighted with his own skill.
Be quiet therenow, I'll try whether the bell and the
knocker are in tune with each other. Let's give 'em a
fair trial. So saying, Minim seized the knocker in
one hand, and the bell in the other, sounding them to
the utmost of his power.
Oh, horrid! shameful! abominable!even worse
than I thoughtupon my word!
Halloo, below! said a voice from the second story
window, emanating from a considerable quantity of
night-cap
and wrapper; what's the matter? Is it the Ingens,
or is the house afire?
I ain't a fireman myself, and I can't tell until the big
bell rings whether there's a fire or not, said Minim;
but, if the house is positively on fire, I advise you as a
friend to come down, and leave it as soon as possible.
Bring your clothes, for the weather's not over warm.
Yes, said Jinks; bring your trousers anyhow,
for we've only got one whole pair down here.
You're a pair of impertinent rascals: what do you
mean by kicking up such a bobbery at this time of night?
Bobbery!don't be cross, fiddle-strings; always be
harmonious in company, and melodious when you're
alone, especially when you snore. I merely wish to
inform
you that your bell and knocker do not accord. Just
listen!
Bell and knocker were both again operated on
vigorously
.
Did you ever hear the like? I'm ashamed of you
have them tuned, doit's dreadful. Tune 'em.
Once more Minim rang the bell and plied the knocker
with great vigour and strength of muscle, while Jinks
played
Nel furor delle tempeste
, from Il Pirata.
The night-capped head disappeared from the window,
and the musical gentlemen stood chattering and laughing,
the one on the step and the other on the pavement, all
unconscious of the mischief that was brewing for them.
Come, said Minimlet's give these people a
dueta serenade will enlarge their musical capacities.
What shall it be? queried Jinks, humming a
succession
of airs, to find something suited to the occasion.
Something about bells, if you don't know any thing
about knockers, added Minim, giving the bell handle
another affectionate tweak.
Just then, Meinherr Night-cap and Wrapper returned
to the window, aided by a stout servant, bearing a bucket
of water. I'll not call the watch, chuckled he, but
I'll teach these fellows how to swim.
Home, fare thee well
,
The ocean's storm is over
,
sang Matthew Minim and Jenkinson Jinks.
Not over yet, said the voice from the window, as
Minim was drenched by the upsetting of the bucket
take care of the ground-swell!
A spluttering, panting, and puffing sound succeeded,
like
The bubbling shrick, the solitary cry
Of some strong swimmer in his agony
.
Jinks paddled off rapidlyhe had seen enough of the
Cataract of the Ganges in former times: not so with Mr.
Minim, who exclaimed,
Fire and fury! who asked for a water-piece? If
`Water parted' is your tune, you may stick to Arne, but
I'll give you a touch of Kotzwaraa specimen of the
`Battle of Prague,' with a little of the `Halistone
chorus.'
Minim hammered away at the door; but not being
able to beat in the panels with his feet, he caught up a
paving-stone and hurled it against the frame, shouting
Stony-batter!
Windows flew up in all directions, and night-capped
heads projected from every embrasure. The people
shouted
,
the dogs barked, and rattles were sprung all round.
Never was there heard a less musical din.
Minim stood aghast. Worse and worse! cried he;
what a clatter! Haydn's `Chaos' was a fool to this!
It's natural music, however, and I'll play my part till I
get in, and catch the fellow who appointed himself the
watering committee; and he, therefore, continued
beating
upon the door.
Mr. Minim was, however, overpowered by a number
of individuals, headed by the bucket bearing servant,
and as his heels were tripped up, he mournfully
remarked
,
So fell Cardinal Wolsey. Will nobody favour us
with the `Last words of Marmion,' or `The soldier tired,'
`My lodging is on the cold ground,' or something else
neat and appropriate?
Can't you get somebody to bail you? said a
punning
individual, alluding to Mr. Minim's drenched
condition
.
Let him run, Jacob, exclaimed the gentleman with
the night-cap, speaking from the window; take him
round the corner, and give him a start. He is sufficiently
water-lynched, and I want no further trouble on his
account
.
I won't go, replied Minim. I've finished playing
for the night; but as you are leader, give the
coup
d'archet
,
and set your orchestra in motion. I won't walk
round the cornercarry methis must be a
sostenuto
movement.
Well, if that ain't a good note! said the admiring
crowd, as Minim was transported round the corner,
whence, being set at liberty, he walked drippingly home,
and ever after confined his musical researches within
decorous bounds.
RIPTON RUMSEY;
A TALE OF THE WATERS.
They
who are at all mindful of atmospheric
phenomena
must remember a storm, remarkable for its
violence
,
which occurred not long since. It was a storm by
night, and of those abroad at the time, every one averse
to the shower bath, and having a feline dislike to wet
feet, will bear it in mind, at least until the impression is
washed out by the floods of a greater tempest. In the
evening, the rain, as if exercising itself for more
important
feats, fell gently and at intervals; but as the night
advanced, the wind came forth intent upon a frolic.
Commencing
with playful gambols, it amused itself at first
with blowing out the old women's candles at the apple
stands. Then growing bolder, it extinguished a few
corporation lamps, and, like a mischievous boy, made
free to snatch the hats of the unguarded, and to whisk
them through mud and kennel. At length becoming wild
by indulgence, it made a terrible turmoil through the
streets, without the slightest regard to municipal
regulations
to the contrary. It went whooping at the top of its
voice round the corners, whistled shrilly through the
key-holes, and howled in dismal tones about the chimney
tops. Here, it startled the negligent housewife from her
slumbers by slamming the unbolted shutter till it roared
like a peal of artillery; and there, it tossed a rusty sign
until its ancient hinges creaked for mercy; while at
intervals, the heavy tumble of scantling told that when
Auster chooses to kick up a breeze, he is very nearly as
good at a practical joke as Boreas, or any other
frolicsome
member of the olian family. The clouds too
threw open their sluices, and the water joining in the
saturnalia, tried a variety of ways to amuse itself, and its
capers were as numerous as those of the gale. It beat
the tattoo upon the pavement with such sportive fury,
that it was difficult to decide whether it did not rain
upward
as violently as it did downward. Anon the breeze
came sweeping along in a horizontal shower, disdaining
alike the laws of gravity, and the perpendicular, but more
hackneyed method of accomplishing its object. In short,
whether reference be had to wind or to water, it may be
noted in the journals of those curious in regard to
weather
,
as a night equally calculated to puzzle an umbrella,
and to render every man his own washerwoman.
Selecting a single incident from the many, which it is
natural to suppose might have been found by the aid of a
diving bell on such a night, it becomes necessary to fish
up Ripton Rumsey, who happened to be abroad on that
occasion, as he is upon all occasions when left to consult
his own wishes. Where Ripton had been in the early
part of the evening, it would not have been easy either
for himself or any one else to tell. It is, therefore, fair
to infer that, distributing his attentions, he had been as
usual about in spots. The fact is he has a hobby,
which, like many hobbies, is apt to throw its rider.
Although
temperately disposed, such is the inquiring nature
of his philosophic spirit, that, with a view perhaps to
the ultimate benefit of the human race, he is continually
experimenting as to the effects of alcoholic stimulants
14
upon the human frame. It is probable, therefore, that on
this occasion having imbibed too much of the enemy
neat as imported, he had walked forth to qualify it by a
stroll in the rain. This, however, is irrelevant, where
he was, is the point at issue.
The rain came down heavier than ever. A solitary
watchman, more amphibious than his race in general,
was seen wending his way through the puddles,
thinking
,
if he thought at all, of the discomforts of those whom
Noah left behind, and of that happy provision of nature
which renders a wet back fatal to none but young
goslings
.
Dodging between the drops was out of the
question
;
so he strode manfully onward, until he stumbled
over something which lay like a lion, or a bundle of wet
clothing, in his path.
Why, hello!what do you call this when it's biled,
and the skin's tuck off? said he, recovering himself,
and giving the obstruction a thrust with his foot. What's
this without ing'ens? continued he, in that metaphorical
manner peculiar to men of his profession, when they ask
for naked truths and uncooked facts.
It was Ripton Rumseyin that independent condition
which places men beyond the control of circumstances,
enabling them to sleep quietly either on the pavement
or on the track of a well travelled railroad, and to repose
in despite of rain, thunder, a gnawing conscience, or the
fear of a locomotive. It was Ripton Rumsey, saved from
being floated away solely by the saturated condition of
both his internal and external man.
It's a man, remarked the investigator, holding to a
tree with his right hand, as he curiously, yet cautiously
pawed Ripton with his left foot. It's a man who's
turned in outside of the door, and is taking a snooze on
the cold water principle. Well, I say, neighbour, jist in
a friendly way, added he, giving Ripton a prodigious
kick as an evidence of his amicable feelingif you
don't get up, you'll ketch a nagee or the
collar-and-fix-you
.
Up with you, Jacky Dadle.
Ripton's condition, as before hinted, was beyond the
ordinary impulses to human action; and he, therefore,
endured several severe digs with the foot aforesaid,
without
uttering more than a deep-toned grunt; but at last
the sharp corner of the boot coming in contact with his
ribs, he suddenly turned over in the graceful attitude of a
frog, and struck out vigorously. Like Giovanni's
faithful
squire, he proved himself an adept at swimming on
land. He handled his arms and legs with such
dexterity
,
that before his progress could be arrested, he was
on the curbstone. The next instant heard him plunge
into the swollen and roaring kennel, and with his head
sticking above the water, he buffeted the waves with a
heart of controversy.
The boat's blowed up, and them that ain't biled are
all overboard! spluttered the swimmer, as he dashed
the waters about, and seemed almost strangled with the
quantities which entered the hole in his head entitled a
mouth, which was sadly unacquainted with undistilled
fluidsStrike out, or you're gone chickens! them as
can't swim must tread water, and them as can't tread
water must go to Davy Jones! Let go my leg! Every
man for himself! Phre-e-e! bro-o-o! Who's got some
splatterdocks?
The watch looked on in silent admiration; but finding
that the aquatic gentleman did not make much headway,
and that a probability existed of his going out of the
world in soundings and by water, a way evidently not in
conformity to his desires, the benevolent guardian of the
night thought proper to interpose; and bending himself
to the work, at last succeeded in re-establishing Ripton
Rumsey on the curbstone.
Ha! said Ripton, after gasping a few minutes, and
wringing the water from his face and hairyou've
saved me, and you'll be put in the newspapers for it by
way of solid reward. Jist in timeI'd been down twyst,
and if I'd gone agin, Ripton Rumsey would a stayed there
once more and the last and the nearest gits it. Only
thinkmy eye! how the shads and the catties would a
chawed me up! Getting drownded ain't no fun, and
after you're drownded it's wus. My sufferings what I had
and my sufferings what I like to had is enough to make
a feller cry, only I ain't got no hankercher, and my
sleeve's so wet it won't wipe good.
Yes, young 'un, said the Charley, s'posing the
fishes had been betting on elections, they'd have invited
the other fishes to eat you for oyster suppers,so much
majority for sturgeon-nose, or a Ripton Rumsey supper
for the companywhy not? If we ketch the fishes, we eat
them; and if they ketch us, they eat us,bite all round.
But the storm again began to howl, and as Ripton
evidently did not understand the rationale of the argument,
the watchman lost his poetic sympathy for the Jonah of
the gutters. Even had he heard the fishes calling for
Ripton
Rumseys fried, Ripton Rumseys stewed, or
Ripton Rumseys on a chafing dish, he would have felt
indifferent about the matter, and if asked how he would
take him, would undoubtedly have said, Ripton Rumsey
on a wheelbarrow.
You must go to the watch-house.
What fur must I! Fetch along the Humane
Society's
apparatus for the recovery of drownded indiwidooals
them's what I wantI'm water logged. Bring us one
of the largest kind of smallersa tumbler full of brandy
and water, without no water in it. I've no notion of
being diddled out of the sweets of my interesting
sitivation
I
want the goodieswrap me in a hot blanket and
lay me by the fireput hot bricks to my feet, fill me up
with hot toddy, and then go away. That's the scientific
touch, and it's the only way I'm to be brung to, because
when I'm drownded I'm a hard case.
The Charley promised all, if Ripton would accompany
him. The soft delusion was believed, and the hard
case was lodged in the receptacle for such as he, where,
before he discovered the deception, he fell into a
profound
slumber, which lasted till morning. The
examination
was as follows:
Where do you live?
I'm no ways petickelarjist where it's cheapest and
most convenient. The cheapest kind of living, according
to my notion, is when it's pretty good and don't cost
nothing. In winter, the Alms House is not slow, and
if you'll give us a call, you'll find me there when the
snow's on the ground. But when natur' smiles and the
grass is green, I'm out like a hoppergrass. The fact is,
my constitution isn't none of the strongest; hard work
hurts my system; so I go about doing little jobs for a fip
or a levy, so's to get my catnip tea and bitters regular
any thing for a decent living, if it doesn't tire a feller.
But hang the cityrural felicity and no Charleys is the
thing, after allpumpkins, cabbages, and apple whiskey
is always good for a weakly constitution and a man of an
elewated turn of mind.
Well, I'll send you to Moyamensing prisonquite
rural.
The sound of that awful word struck terror to the very
marrow of Ripton. Like the rest of his class, while
bearing his soul in his stomach, he carries his heart at
14*
the end of his nose, and to his heart rushed the blood
from every part of his frame, until the beacon blazed with
a lurid glare, and the bystanders apprehended nasal
apoplexy
.
The rudder of his countenance grew to such a
size that there was no mistaking the leading feature of
the case. To see before him, Ripton was compelled to
squint direfully, and as the beggar in Gil Blas did his
carbine
,
he found himself under the necessity of resting his
tremendous proboscis on the clerk's desk, while cocking
his eye at his honour.
Miamensin! stammered RiptonOuch, ouch!
now don't! that's a clever feller. Arch street was all
well enoughplenty of company and conversation to
improve a chap. But Miamensinscandaylus! Why
they clap you right into a bag as soon as you get inside
the door, jist as if they'd bought you by the bushel, and
then, by way of finishing your education, they lug you
along and empty you into a room where you never see
nothing nor nobody. It's jist wasting a manI'm be
bagged if I go to Miamensin!I'd rather be in the
Menagerry
,
and be stirred up with a long pole twenty times
a day, so as to cause me for to growl to amuse the
company
.
I ain't potatoes to be put into a bagblow the
bag!
There's no help for it, Ripton; you are a vagrant,
and must be taken care of.
That's what I like; but bagging a man is no sort of
a way of taking care of him, unless he's a dead robin or
a shot tom-tit. As for being a vagrom, it's all owing to
my weakly constitution, and because I can't have my
bitters and catnip tea regular. But if it's the law, here's
at you. Being a judge, or a mayor, or any thing of that
sort's easy done without catnip tea; it don't hurt your
hands, or strain your back; but jist try a spell at smashing
stones, or piling logs, and you'd learn what's what
without
being put in a bag.
Never mind, said Ripton, as he was conducted
from the office, every thing goes round in this world.
Perhaps I'll be stuck up some day on a bench to ladle
out law to the loafers. Who knows? Then let me
have a holt of some of the chaps that made Miamensin.
I'd ladle out the law to 'em so hot, they'd not send their
plates for more soup in a hurry. I'd have a whole
bucketful
of catnip tea alongside, and the way they'd ketch
thirty days, and thirty days a top of that, would make
'em grin like chessy cats. First I'd bag all the
Charleys
,
and then I'd bag all the mayors, and sew 'em up.
A WHOLE-SOULED FELLOW;
OR,
THE DECLINE AND FALL OF TIPPLETON TIPPS.
As
the reader may have observed in his journey
through life, the shades and varieties of human character
are infinite. Although the temperaments, like the
cardinal
numbers, are not multitudinous, yet in the course
of events they have been so combined with each other,
and are so modified by circumstance, that ingenuity
itself cannot institute subdivisions to classify mankind
with correctness. Whatever it may have been when our
ancestors existed in the nomadic state and herded in
tribes, it is difficult now to find the temperaments in their
pristine purity; and in consequence, it is but vague
description
to speak of others as sanguineous, nervous, or
saturnine. Something more definite is required to
convey
to the mind a general impression of the individual,
and to give an idea of his mode of thought, his habitual
conduct, and his principles of action. Luckily, however,
for the cause of science and for the graphic force of
language
,
there is a universal aptitude to paint with words,
and to condense a catalogue of qualities in a phrase,
which has been carried to such perfection, that in
acquiring
through the medium of another a knowledge of
the distinctive moral features of our fellow mortals, it is
by no means necessary to devote hours to query and
response. An intelligent witness can convey to us the
essence of a character in a breath; a flourish of the
tongue will sketch a portrait, and place it, varnished and
framed, in our mental picture gallery. The colours will,
it is true, be coarsely dashed in, but the strength of the
resemblance abundantly compensates for deficiency of
finish. If, for instance, we are briefly told that Mr.
Plinlimmon
is a cake, the word may be derided as a cant
appellation; the ultra-fastidious may turn up their noses
at it as a slang phrase; but volumes could not render our
knowledge of the man more perfect. We have him as
it were, upon a salver, weak, unwholesome, and insipid
suited to the fancy, perhaps, of the very youthful, but
by no means qualified for association with the bold, the
mature, and the enterprising. When we hear that a
personage is classed by competent judges among the
spoons, we do not of course expect to find him
shining in the buffet; but we are satisfied that in action
he must figure merely as an instrument. There are
likewise, in this method of painting to the ear, the nicest
shades of difference, often represented and made
intelligible
solely by the change of a letter,soft being
the positive announcement of a good easy soul, and
saft intimating that his disposition takes rank in the
superlative degree of mollification. When danger's to
be confronted, who would rashly rely upon a skulk?
or, under any circumstances, ask worldly advice of those
verdant worthies known among their cotemporaries as
decidedly green?
Such words are the mystic cabala; they are the key
to individuality, throwing open a panoramic view of the
man, and foreshadowing his conduct in any supposed
emergency.
Therefore, when we speak of Tippleton Tipps as a
whole-souled fellow, the acute reader will find an
inkling of biography in the termhe will understand
that Tippleton is likely to be portrayed as no one's
enemy but his ownand from that will have a
glimpse of disastrous chances, of hairbreadth 'scapes,
and of immediate or prospective wreck. According to
the popular acceptation of the phrase, a whole-soul is
a boiler without a safety valve, doomed sooner or later to
explode with fury, if wisdom with her gimblet fail in
making an aperture: the puncture, however, being
effected
,
the soul is a whole-soul no longer. It must
therefore be confessed that Tippleton Tipps has not
thus been bored by wisdom. He has a prompt alacrity
at a blow-out and has been skyed in a blow-up,
two varieties of the blow which frequently follow each
other so closely as to be taken for cause and effect.
Tippleton Tipps, as his
soubriquet
imports, is one of
those who rarely become old, and are so long engaged in
sowing their wild oats as to run to seed themselves, never
fructifying in the way of experience, unless it be, like
Bardolph, in the region of the nose. Before the
condensing
process was applied to language, he would
probably
have been called a dissipated, unsteady rogue, who
walked in the broad path which furnishes sea-room for
eccentricities of conduct; but in these labour-saving
times, he rejoices in the milder, but quite as descriptive
title of a whole-souled fellow, the highest degree
attainable
in the college of
insouciance
and jollity. It is,
however
,
no honorary distinction, to be gained without toil
or danger. The road is steep and thorny, and though
in striving to reach the topmost height, there is no
necessity
for burning the midnight oil in the retired study,
yet the midnight lamp, and many of the lamps which
beam between the noon of night and morning, are often
incidentally smashed in the process. Aspirants for other
academic glories become pale with application and
protracted
vigils, but the whole-souled fellow will outwatch
the lynx, and, if his cheek be blanched, the colour is
made up in another portion of his visage. He is apt to
be as deeply red as any one, though the locality of
his acquirements may be different.
The strict derivation of the title acquired by
Tippleton
the
W. S. F. by which he is distinguishedis not
easily to be traced. There is, however, a vulgar belief
that the philosopher who devotes himself to profound
investigations, whether theoretical, like those of the
schools, or experimental, like those of the Tippses, is not
altogether free from flaw in the region of the occiput,
and hence, as the schoolman has the sutures of his
cranium
caulked with latinized degrees, and as one should
always have something whole about him, fancy and
charity combined give the fast-livers credit for a
whole-soul
.
Now, Tippleton Tipps always lived uncommonly fast.
He is in fact remarkable for free action and swift travel,
existing regularly at the rate of sixteen miles an hour
under a trot, and can go twenty in a gallop. He sleeps
fast, talks fast, eats fast, drinks fast, and, that he may get
on the faster, seldom thinks at all. It is an axiom of his
that thinking, if not an idle waste of thought, is a
very leaden businessone must stop to think, which
wastes time and checks enterprise. He reprobates it as
much as he does poring over books, an employment
which he regards as only calculated to give a man a
crick in the neck, and to spoil the originality of his
ideas. A whole-souled fellow knows every thing
intuitively
what
is reason with others, is instinct in him.
When Tippleton was quite a little boy, his moral
idiosyncrasy
manifested itself in a very decisive way. His
generosity was remarkable; he was never known to pause
in giving away the playthings belonging to his brothers
and sisters; and his disinterestedness was such that he
never hesitated an instant in breaking or losing his own,
if sure of repairing the deficit by foraging upon others.
No sordid impulse prevented a lavish expenditure of his
pennies, and as soon as they were gone he financiered
with the same liberality by borrowing from his little
friends, never offending their delicacy by an offer to
return the loan,a blunder into which meaner spirits
sometimes fall. When that statesmanlike expedient
would no longer answer, he tried the great commercial
system upon a small scale, by hypothecating with the
apple and pie woman the pennies he was to receive, thus
stealing a march upon time by living in advance. There
being many apple women and likewise many pie
women
,
he extended his business in this whole-souled sort
of a way, and skilfully avoiding the sinking of more
pennies than actually necessary to sustain his credit, he
prospered for some time in the eating line. But as every
thing good is sure to have an end, the apple and pie
system
being at last blown out tolerably large, Tippleton
exploded with no assets. By way of a moral lesson, his
father boxed his ears and refused to settle with his
creditors
,whereupon
Tippleton concluded that the sin lay
altogether
in being found out,while his mother kissed
him, gave him a half dollar, and protested that he had the
spirit of a prince and ought not to be snubbed. As the
spirit of a prince is a fine thing, it was cherished
accordingly
,
and Tippleton spent his cash and laughed at the
pie women.
The home department of his training being thus
carefully attended to, Tippleton went to a variety of
lyceums, academies, and institutes, and
mosaicked
his education by remaining long enough to learn the
branches of mischief indigenous to each, when, either
because he had outstripped his teacher, or because his
whole-soul had become too large, he was invariably
requested to resign, receiving on all of these interesting
occasions the cuff paternal and the kiss maternal, the
latter being accompanied, as usual, with a reinforcement
to his purse and a plaudit to his spirit. Tippleton then
took a turn at college, where he received the last polish
before the premature notice to quit was served upon him;
and at seventeen he was truly whole-souled, playing
billiards as well as any pony in the land, and boxing
as scientifically as the deaf 'un. He could owe
everybody
with a grace peculiar to himself; kick up the
noisiest of all possible rows at the theatre, invariably
timed with such judgment as to make a tumultuous rush
at the most interesting part of the play; he could
extemporize
a
fracas
at a ball, and could put Cayenne pepper
in a church stove. The most accomplished young man
about town was Tippleton Tipps, and every year
increased
his acquirements.
Time rolled on; the elder Tippses left the world
for their offspring to bustle in, and Tippleton, reaching
his majority, called by a stretch of courtesy the age of
discretion, received a few thousands as his outfit in
manhood. He, therefore, resolved to set up for himself,
determined to be a whole-souled fellow all the time,
instead of, as before, acting in that capacity after business
hours.
Now, said Tipps, exultingly, I'll see what fun
is made ofnow I'll enjoy lifenow I'll be a man!
15
And, acting on that common impression, which,
however
,
is not often borne out by the result, that when the
present means are exhausted something miraculous will
happen to recruit the finances, Tippleton commenced
operations,stylish lodgings, a high trotting horse,
buggy, and all other confederate circumstance. It was
soon known that he was under weigh, and plenty of
friends forth with clustered around him, volunteering their
advice, and lending their aid to enable him to support the
character of a whole-souled fellow in the best and latest
manner. Wherever his knowledge happened to be
deficient
,
Diggs put him up to this, Twiggs put him up
to that, and Sniggs put him up to t'other, and Diggs,
Twiggs, and Sniggs gave him the preference whenever
they wanted a collateral security or a direct loan. Thus,
Tippleton not only had the pleasure of their company at
frolics given by himself, but had likewise the advantage
of being invited by them to entertainments for which his
own money paid.
Clever is hardly a name for you, Tippleton, said
Diggs, using the word in its cis-atlantic sense.
No back-out in him, mumbled Sniggs, with
unwonted
animation.
The whole-souled'st fellow I ever saw, chimed
Twiggs.
Tippleton had just furnished his satellites with the
cash to accompany him to the races; for then he was yet
rather flush.
Give me Tippleton anyhow, said Diggs,he's
all sperrit.
And
no
mistake, chimed Sniggs.
He wanted it himself, I know he did, ejaculated
Twiggs, but, whole-souled fellow and Twiggs
buttoned
his pocket on the needful, and squinted through
the shutters at the tailor's boy and the bootmaker's boy,
who walked suspiciously away from the door, as if they
didn't believe that
Tippleton Tipps, Esq.
Dr.
To sundries as per account rendered
,
was not in. Tailors' boys, and shoemakers' boys,
and indeed, bill-bearing boys in general, are
matter-of-factish
incredulous creatures at best, and have no respect
for the poetic licenses; they are not aware that
whole-souled
people, like the mysterious ball of those ingenious
artists the thimble riggers, who figure upon the sward
on parade days, race days, hanging days, and other
popular jubilees, are either in or out as the emergencies
of the case require.
But what would not Tippleton do to maintain his
reputation? While he had the means, let borrowers be as
plenty as blackberries, they had only to pronounce the
open sesame to have their wishes gratified, even if
Tippleton himself were obliged to borrow to effect so
desirable an object. The black looks of landlords and
landladies, the pertinacities of mere business creditors,
what are they, when the name of a whole-souled fellow
is at stake? Would they have such a one sink into the
meanness of giving the preference to engagements which
bring no credit except upon books? Is selfishness so
predominant in their natures? If so, they need not look
to be honoured by the Tippleton Tippses with the light
of their countenance, or the sunshine of their patronage.
There is not a Tipps in the country who would lavish
interviews upon men or the representatives of men, who
have so little sympathy with the owners of whole-souls.
To such, the answer will invariably be not in.
Tippleton Tipps, I've an idea, said Diggs.
Surprising, said Tippleton moodily.
A splendid ideaa fortune-making idea for you,
continued Diggs.
Now, it so happened that Tippleton was just in that
situation in which the prospect of a fortune is a splendid
idea, even to a whole-souled fellow. His funds were
exhaustedhis credit pumped dry; the horse and buggy
had been sequestered, and something miraculous in the
shape of relief had not happened. In fact, affairs were in
that desperate condition which offers no resource but the
dreadful one of suicide, or that still more dreadful
alternative
,
going to work,running away without the means
being a matter of impossibility.
As how? interrogated Tippleton dubiously, he
having but little faith in the money-making schemes
broached by Diggs, that individual's talent lying quite in
another direction.
As how? chorussed Sniggs and Twiggs, who, as
hard run as their compatriots, snuffed free quarters in the
word, and a well-filled purse ready at their call.
You must marry, added Diggs. Get thee a wife,
Tippleton.
Ah! that would improve the matter amazingly, and
be quite a profitable speculation, replied Tippleton
ironically.
To be surewhy not? What's to prevent a good
looking, whole-souled fellow like you from making a
spec?Grimson's daughter, for instancenot pretty,
but plaguey richonly childwhat's to hindereh?
Yeswhat's to hinder? said Twiggs and Sniggs,
looking at each other, and then at Tippleton
whole-souled
good
lookingand all thatjust what the girls
like.
Perhaps they do, but papas do not, said
Tippleton
,
with a meditating look; as for old Grimson, he
hates 'em.
Very like; but you don't want to marry Grimson
get the daughter, and the father followsthat's the plan.
If it must be so, why make an impression upon Miss
Jemima firstthen shave off your whiskers, uncurl your
hair, put your hat straight on your head, and swear to a
reformquit fun, go to bed earlyvery hard certainly,
but when matters are once properly secured, then you
knowha! ha! and Twiggs sportively knocked
Tippleton
in the ribs.
Ha! ha! laughed Twiggs and Sniggs, poking each
other in the same anatomical region.
Although Tippleton had but little fancy for matrimony
in general, or for Miss Jemima Grimson in particular,
yet under the circumstances, he felt disposed to venture
on the experiment and to try what could be done. He
therefore continued the conversation, which happened
late one night in a leading thoroughfare, and which was
interrupted in a strange, startling manner.
An intelligent hem! given in that peculiar tone
which intimates that the utterer has made a satisfactory
discovery, seemed to issue from a neighbouring tree-box,
and as Messrs, Tipps, Diggs, Sniggs, and Twiggs directed
their astonished regards toward the suspected point, a
head decorated with a straw hata very unseasonable
article at the time, and more unseasonable from its
lidlike
top, which opened and shut at each passing breeze
protruded from the shelter.
Ahem! repeated the head, seeming to speak with
most miraculous organ, the wintry blast lifting up
the hat-crown and letting it fall again, as if it were the
mouth of some nondescriptAhem! I like the
speckilation
15*
myself, and I must either be tuck in as a pardener
or I'll peach. I knows old Grimsingshe lent me a kick
and a levy t'other day, and if I don't see good reason to
the contrayry, I mean to stick up fur him. It's a prime
speckilation fur me every-vich-vay.
The conspirators were astonished, as well they might
be, at the sudden and unexpected apparition among them
of another whole-souled fellow with a dilapidated hat.
The stranger was Richard Dout, the undegenerated scion
of a noble house, the members of which have been
conspicuous
in all agesit was Richard, known to his
familiars by the less respectful, but certainly more
affectionate
appellation of Dicky Dout. He is a man of
fine feelings and very susceptible susceptibilities, being
of that peculiar temperament which is generally
understood
to constitute genius, and possessing that delicate
organization which is apt to run the head of its owner
against stone walls, and prompts him on all occasions to
put his fingers in the fire. He has, therefore, like his
illustrious progenitors, a strong affinity for looped and
windowed raggedness, and rather a tendency toward a
physical method of spiritualizing the grosser particles of
the frame. But for once, Dout was sharpened for
speckilation.
I'm to go sheers, added Dout, as if it were a settled
thing.
Sheer off, you impudent rascal! ejaculated the
party.
Oh, I don't mind sass, replied he, seating himself
coolly on the fire-plug, and deliberately tucking up the
only tail which remained to his coatCuss as much as
you pleaseit won't skeer wot I know out o' me. Don't
hurt yourself, said Carlo to the kitten. I'll see
Grimsings
in the morning, if I ain't agreeable hereI'm to
have fust every and a shot this time, as the boys says ven
they're playin' of marvels. Let them knuckle down
close as can't help it, concluded Dout, as he whistled
and rubbed his shin, and remarked that when sot upon
a thing he was raal lignum witey.
Tippleton! said Diggs.
Well? replied Tippleton.
A fix!
Ra-a-ther.
Nullum go-um
, added Sniggs, who prided himself
upon his classical knowledge.
E pluribum uniber
, if you come to that, interjected
Dout.
We're caught, added Twiggs, who dealt largely in
French; we're caught,
tootin in the assembly
.
Does he know us? inquired Tippleton.
To be sure, replied Doutwe whole-souled
fellers knows everybody in the same line of
business
.
This was decidedly a checkthe speculators were
outgeneralled by the genius of the Douts; so making
a virtue of necessity, they mollified him by a slight
douceur scraped up at the time, and large promises for
the future. Dicky was forthwith installed as boot-cleaner
and coat-brusher to the party, as well as recipient of
old clothes, under condition of keeping tolerably sober
and very discreet.
Peace being thus concluded, Tippleton Tipps
commenced
the campaign against the heart of Miss Jemima
Grimson, who liked whole-souled fellows, and began the
work of ingratiating himself with his father's old friend
Mr. Grimson, who cordially disliked whole-souled fellows.
In the first place, therefore, he ceased to associate
publicly
with Diggs, Sniggs, and Twiggs, and contented
himself
with chuckling with them in private. He silenced
his creditors by demonstrating to them that he was a
young man of great expectations, and even contrived to
obtain advances upon the prospect, wherewith to keep
himself in trim and to nourish Dicky Dout. Miss
Jemima
was delighted, for Tippleton had such a way with
him; while Mr. Grimson's unfavourable impressions
gradually vanished before his professions of reform and
improved conduct. The old gentleman employed him
as a clerk, and had a strong inclination either to set him
up or to take him in. Such a correct, sensible
young man has he become, quoth Grimson.
Things were thus beautifully
en train
, when Mr.
Grimson rashly sent his
proteg
with a sum of money
to be used in a specified way in a neighbouring city, and
the
proteg
, who longed to indulge himself in that which
he classically termed a knock-around, took his allies
Diggs, Sniggs, and Twiggs with him. The cash proper
being expendedthe wine being in and the wit being
outTippleton being a whole-souled fellow, and his
companions knowing it, the cash improper was diverted
from its legitimate channel, and after a few days of
roaring
mirth, they returned rather dejected and disheartened.
Come, what's the use of sighing? roared
Tippleton
,
as they sat dolorously in a snug corner at the
headquarters
of the whole-souled fellows. The money's
not quite outChampagne!
Bravo, Tippleton! responded his companions, and
the corks flew merrilyThat's the only way to see
one's road out of trouble.
Another bottle, Dout!that for Grimson! shouted
Tipps, snapping his fingersI'll run off with his
daughterwhat do you say to that, Dicky Dout?
Dicky dodged the cork which was flirted at him, and
regarding the company with a lugubrious air, observed:
Accordin' to me, gettin' corned's no waythere's
only two business sitiations in which it's allowable
one's when you're so skeered you can't tell what to do,
and the other's when your eyes is sot and it's no use
doin' nothin'when you're goin', and when you're
goneit makes you go by a sort of a slant, instead of a
bumping tumble. It eases a feller down like a tayckle,
when on temperance principles he'd break his neck.
For my part, I think this bustin' of yourn looks bad
Dicky filled a glass and drained its contents
'specially
when you're goin' it on crab-apple cider.
Get out, Dicky Dout!Fetch some cigars, Dicky
Dout!
The party sang songs, the party made speeches, and
the party rapidly drank up the remainder of Mr.
Grimson's
cash, a catastrophe which in their present state of
mind did not trouble them at all, except when they
remembered
that no more money, no more wine. Boniface
was used to dealing with whole-souled fellows.
Order, gentlemen! said Tipps, rising to deliver an
addressI don't get upon my feet to impugn the
eyesight
,
gentlemen, or the ear-sight, gentlemen, of any
member present; but merely to state that there are facts
primary facts, like a kite, and contingent facts, like
bob-tailsone set of facts that hang on to another set of
factsand Tippleton grasped the table to support
himself
.
The first of these facts is, that in looking out at
the window I see snowI likewise hear sleigh-bells, from
which we have the bob-tailed contingent that we ought
to go a sleighing to encourage domestic manufactures.
Hurra! said Diggs and Sniggslet's go a
sleighing!
Hurray! muttered Twiggs, who sat drowsing over
an extinguished cigar and an empty glasslet's go a
Maying!
I have stated, gentlemen, continued Tipps,
swaying
to and fro, and endeavouring to squeeze a drop from
a dry bottleseveral facts, but there is anothera
further contingentthe sleighing may be good, and we
ought to gobut, gentlemen, we've got no money!
That's what I call an appalling fact, in great staring
capitals
the
money's gone, the Champagne's gone, but
though we made 'em go, we can't go ourselves!
Tippleton Tipps sank into his chair, and added, as he
sucked at his cigar with closed eyes:
Capitalists desiring to contract will please send in
their terms, sealed and endorsed `Proposals to loan.'
Cloaks, watches, and breast-pinsspout 'em, hinted
Dout from a corner. We whole-souled people always
plant sich articles in sleighing-time, and let's 'em crop
out in the spring.
The hint was taken. As the moon rose, a sleigh
whizzed
rapidly along the street, and as it passed, Tippleton
Tipps was seen bestriding it like a Colossus, whirling
his arms as if they were the fans of a windmill, and
screaming 'Tis my delight of a shiny night! in which
his associates, including Dout, who was seated by the
driver, joined with all their vocal power.
'Twas merry in the parlor, 'twas merry in the hall,
when Tippleton,
cum suis
, alighted at a village inn.
Fiddles were playing and people were dancing all over
the house, and the new arrivals did not lose time in
adding to the jovial throng. Tippleton, seizing the
barmaid's
cap, placed it on his own head, and using the
shovel and tongs for the apparatus of a fiddler, danced
and played on top of the table, while Dout beat the door
by way of a drum, and Diggs, Sniggs, and Twiggs
disturbed
the straight fours of the company in the general
assembly-room by a specimen of the Winnebago
war-dance
,
the whole being accompanied by whoopings after
the manner of the aborigines.
The clamor drew the select parties into the passages
to see the latest arrivals from Pandemonium.
Who cares for Grimson? said Tipps, as he fiddled
and sung the following choice morceau from Quizembob's
Reliques of Lyric Poetry
Oh! my father-in-law to me was cross;
Oh 'twas neither for the better, nor yet for the worse;
He neither would give me a cow nor a horse
,
when Mr. Grimson and Miss Jemima Grimson from the
select parties stood before him.
So, Mr. Tippleton Tipps, this is your reform!
be pleased to follow me, and give an account of the
business intrusted to your charge, said Mr. Grimson
sternly.
Ha! ha! laughed Tippleton, fiddling up to him
businesspooh! Dance, my old buck, dance like a
whole-souled fellowlike medance, Jemimy, it may
make you pretty
He neither would give me a cow nor a horse
.
Mr. Grimson turned indignantly on his heel, and Miss
Jemima Grimson, frowning volumes of disdain at seeing
her lover thus attired and thus disporting himself, and
at hearing him thus contumelious to her personal charms,
gave him what is poetically termed a look, and sailed
majestically out of the room leaning on her father's arm.
Ha! ha! said Tippleton, continuing to fiddle.
The speckilation's got the grippe, added Dout.
It was nearly morning when a pair of horses, with
the fragments of a sleigh knocking about their heels,
dashed wildly into Millet's stable yard. They were the
ponies which had drawn Tippleton Tipps and his cohort;
but where were those worthy individuals? At the
corner of a street, where the snow and water had formed
a delusive compound as unstable as the Goodwin sands,
lay Tippleton half smothered in creamice cream,
while his lovely companions were strewed along the
wayside at various intervals, according to the tenacity of
their grasp.
The tea party's spilt, said Dicky Dout, as he went
feeling among the snow with a fragment of the wreck,
and at length forked up Tippleton, as if he were a
dumpling
in a bowl of soup.
The tableau was striking. The tender-hearted Dout
sat upon the curbstone with Tippleton's head upon his
knee, trying to rub a little life into him. It was a second
edition of Marmion and Clara de Clare at Flodden field,
the Lord of Fontenaye and Tippleton Tipps both being
at the climax of their respective catastrophes.
Ah! said Dout, heaving a deep sigh as he rubbed
away at his patient's forehead, as if it were a boot to
clean, this night has been the ruination of us all
we're smashed up small and sifted through. Here lies
Mr. Tipps in a predicaryand me and the whole on 'em
is little better nor a flock of gone goslings. It's man's
natur', I believe, and we can't help it no how. As fur me,
I wish I was a pigthere's some sense in being a pig
wot's fat; pigs don't have to speckilate and bustpigs
never go a sleighing, quarrel with their daddies-in-law
wot was to be, get into sprees, and make tarnal fools of
themselves. Pigs is decent behaved people and good
citizens, though they ain't got no wote. And then they
haven't got no clothes to put on of cold mornings when
they get up; they don't have to be darnin' and patchin'
their old pants; they don't wear no old hats on their
heads, nor have to ask people for 'emcold wittles is
plenty for pigs. My eyes! if I was a jolly fat pig
belonging to respectable people, it would be tantamount
to nothin' with me who was president. Who ever see'd
one pig a settin' on a cold curbstone a rubbin' another
pig's head wot got chucked out of a sleigh? Pigs
has too much sense to go a ridin' if so be as they can
help it. I wish I was one, and out of this scrape.
It's true, continued Dout thoughtfully, and pulling
Tippleton's nose till it cracked at the bridge-joint,it's
true that pigs has their troubles like humansconstables
ketches 'em, dogs bites 'em, and pigs is sometimes almost
as done-over suckers as men; but pigs never runs their
own noses into scrapes, coaxin' themselves to believe it's
fun, as we do. I never see a pig go the whole hog in
my life, 'sept upon rum cherries. I'm thinkin' Mr.
Tipps is defunct; he sleeps as sound as if it was time to
get up to breakfast.
But Tipps slowly revived; he rolled his glassy eye
wildly, the other being, as it were, put up for
exportation
,
or bunged as they have it in the vernacular.
Mister Tipps, said Dout, do you know what's
the matter?
Fun's the matter, isn't it? gasped Tipps; I've
been a sleighing, and we always do it soit's fun this
waybut what's become of my other eye?Where's
stopI remember. The horses and sleigh were in a
hurry, and couldn't staycompliments to the folks, but
can't sit down.
Your t'other eye, replied Dout, as fur as I can
see, is kivered up to keep; the wire-edge is took
considerable
16
off your noseyour coat is split as if somebody
wanted to make a pen of it, and your trousers is fractured.
Well, I thought the curbstone was uncommonly cold.
What with being pitched out of the sleigh, and the grand
combat at the hotel, we've had the whole-souled'st time
knocked almost into a cocked hat. But if you don't
get thrashed, you haven't been a sleighing. What can
science do in a room against chairs, pokers, shovels, and
tongs? Swing it into 'em as pretty as you please, it's
ten to one if you're not quaited down stairs like clothes
to wash. Fun alive!
Here Tippleton Tipps yelled defiance, and attempted
to show how fields were wonor lost, as in his case;
but nature is a strict banker, and will not honour your
drafts when no funds are standing to your credit.
Ah! panted he, as he fell back into the arms of
Mr. Dout; my frolic's over for oncebroke off with
Grimson, spent his moneysleigh all in flinders, and I'll
have to get a doctor to hunt for my eye and put my nose
in splints. Ha! ha! there
is
no mistake in mealways
come home from enjoying myself, sprawling on a
shutter
,
as a gentleman shouldgive me something to talk
aboutwho's afraid?
Even Dout was surprised to hear such valiant words
from the drenched and pummelled mass before him; and
as he stared, Tippleton mutteringly asked to be taken
home.
I'm a whole-souled fellow, whispered he faintly
whole-souledandnomistakeaboutthe
matter
atall.
Assistance and a shutter being procured, Tippleton
Tipps was conveyed to his lodgings, where with a black
patch across his nose, a green shade over one eye, the
other being coloured purple, blue, and yellow halfway to
the jaw, his upper lip in the condition of that of the man
wot won the fight, his left arm in a sling, and his
right ankle sprained, sat Tippleton for at least a month,
the very impersonation, essence, and aroma of a
whole-souled
fellow. As soon, however, as he was in marching
order, he suddenly disappeared, or perhaps was exhaled,
like Romulus and other great men, boldly walking right
through his difficulties, and leaving them behind him in
a state of orphanage.
The last heard of Dout was his closing speech after
taking Tipps home on the night of the catastrophe.
My speckilation has busted its biler. To my notion
this 'ere is a hard case. If I tries to mosey along through
the world without saying nothin' to nobody, it won't do
livin' won't come of itself, like the man you owe
money toyou are obligated to step and fetch it. If I
come fur to go fur to paddle my tub quietly down the
gutter of life without bumping agin the curbstone on one
side, I'm sure to get aground on the other, or to be upsot
somehow. If I tries little speckilations sich as boning
things, I'm sartin to be cotch; and if I goes pardeners,
as I did with Mr. Tipps, it won't do. Fips and levies
ain't as plenty as snowballs in this 'ere yearthly spear.
But talking of snowballs, I wish I was a nigger. Nobody
will buy a white man, but a stout nigger is worth the
slack of two or three hundred dollars. I hardly believe
myself there is so much money; but they say so, and
if I could get a pot of blackin' and some brushes, I'd
give myself a coat, and go and hang myself up for sale
in the Jarsey Market, like a froze possum.
Dout walked gloomily away, and the story goes that
when this whole-souled fellow in humble life was finally
arrested as a vagrant, his last aspiration as he entered the
prison, was: Oh! I wish I was a pig, 'cause they
ain't got to go to jail!
GAMALIEL GAMBRIL;
OR, DOMESTIC UNEASINESS.
It
may be a truism, yet we cannot help recording it as
our deliberate opinion, that life is begirt with troubles.
The longer we live, the more we are convinced of the
factsolidly, sincerely convinced; especially in cold
weather, when all evils are doubled, and great
annoyances
are reinforced by legions of petty vexations. The
happiest conditions of existenceamong which it is
usual to class matrimonyare not without their alloy.
There is a principle of equity always at work, and,
therefore
,
where roses strew the path, thorns are sharpest
and most abundant. Were it otherwise, frail humanity
might at times forget its mortal natureas it is apt to do
when not roughly reminded of the factand grow
altogether
too extensive for its nether integuments.
A stronger proof that there's naught but care on
every hand, and that it is often nearest when least
expected
,
could not be found, than in the case of Gamaliel
Gambril the cobbler, an influential and well known
resident
of Ringbone Alley, a section of the city wherein he
has a voice potential, double as the Duke's.
Gamaliel's
Christmas gambols  innocent as he deemed
them  terminated in the revolt of his household,
a species of civil war which was the more
distressing
to him as it came like a cloud after sunshine,
darker and more gloomy from the preceding light. It is
often thus with frail humanity. The keenest vision
cannot
penetrate the contracted circle of the present, and give
certain information of the future. Who, that sets forth
to run a rig, can tell in what that rig may end? The
laughing child, unconscious of mishap, pursues the
sportive
butterfly and falls into a ditch; and man, proud of
his whiskers, his experience, and his foresight, will yet
follow that phantom felicity until he gets into a scrape.
The highways and the byways of existence are filled
with man-traps and spring-guns, and happy he whose
activity is so great that he can dance among them with
uninjured ankles, and escape scot-free. That faculty,
which to a man of a sportive turn of mind is more
precious
than rubies, is denied to Gamaliel Gambril. When
convivially inclined, he is a Napoleon, whose every
battle-field
is a Waterlooa Santa Anna, whose San
Jacintos
are innumerable.
It was past the noon of night, and the greater part of
those who had beds to go to, had retired to rest. Light
after light had ceased to flash from the windows, and
every house was in darkness, save where a faintly burning
candle in the attic told that Sambo or Dinah had just
finished labour, and was about enjoying the sweets of
repose, or where a fitful flashing through the fan light of
an entry door hinted at the fact that young Hopeful was
still abroad at his revels. It seemed that the whole city
and liberties were in bed, and the active imagination of
the solitary stroller through the streets could not avoid
painting the scene. He figured to himself the two
hundred
thousand human creatures who dwell within those
precincts, lying prone upon their couchescouches varied
as their fortunes, and in attitudes more varied than either
16*
some, who are careless of making a figure in the world,
with their knees drawn up to their chins; the haughty
and ostentatious stretched out to their full extent; the
ambitious
,
the sleeping would-be Csars, spread abroad like
the eagle on a sign, or a chicken split for the gridiron,
each hand and each foot reaching toward a different point
of the compass; the timid rolled up into little balls, with
their noses just peeping from under the clothes; and the
valiant with clenched fists and bosoms barefor
character
manifests itself by outward signs, both in our sleeping
and in our waking moments; and if the imagination of the
speculative watcher has ears as well as eyes, the varied
music which proceeds from these two hundred thousand
somnolent bodies will vibrate upon his tympanumthe
dulcet flute-like snoring which melodiously exhales from
the Phidian nose of the sleeping beauty; the querulous
whining of the nervous papa; the warlike startling snort
of mature manhood, ringing like a trumpet call, and
rattling
the window glass with vigorous fury; the whistling,
squeaking, and grunting of the eccentric; and, in fine, all
the diversified sounds with which our race choose to
accompany
their sacrifices to Morpheus.
But though so many were in bed, there were some
who should have been in bed who were not there. On
this very identical occasion, when calmness seemed to
rule the hour, the usually quiet precincts of Ringbone
Alley were suddenly disturbed by a tremendous clatter.
But loud as it was, the noise for a time continued
unheeded
.
The inhabitants of that localitywho are
excellent
and prudent citizens, and always, while they give
their arms and legs a holiday, impose additional labour
upon their digestive organsworn out by the festivities
of the season, and somewhat oppressed with a feverish
head-ache, the consequence thereof, were generally
asleep; and, with no disposition to flatter, or to assume
more for them than they are entitled to, it must be
conceded
that the Ringboners, when they tie up their heads
and take off their coats to it, are capital sleepersnone
better. They own no relationship to those lazy,
aristocratic
dozers, who seem to despise the wholesome
employment
of slumbering, and, instead of devoting their
energies to the task, amuse themselves with counting the
clock, and with idly listening to every cry of firewho
are afraid to trust themselves unreservedly to the night,
and are so suspicious of its dusky face, and so doubtful
of the fidelity of the sentinel stars, as to watch both
night and stars. Unlike this nervous race, the
Ringboners
have in general nothing to tell when they
assemble
round the breakfast table. They eat heartily, and
grumble not about the badness of their rest; for their
rest has no bad to it. They neither hear the shutters slam
in the night, nor are they disturbed by mysterious
knockings
about three in the morning. They do not, to make
others ashamed of their honest torpidity, ask, Where
was the fire? and look astonished that no one heard
the alarm. On the contrary, when they couch
themselves
,
they are only wide enough awake to see the
candle out of the corner of one eye, and nothing is
audible
to them between the puff which extinguishes the
light and the call to labour at the dawn. When their
heads touch the pillow, their optics are closed and their
mouths are opened. Each proboscis sounds the charge
into the land of Nod, and like Eastern monarchs, they
slumber to slow music, Ringbone Alley being vocal with
one tremendous snore.
No wonder that such a praiseworthy people, so
circumstanced
,
should not be easily awakened by the noise
before alluded to. But the disturbance grew louder; the
little dogs frisked and barked; the big dogs yawned and
bayed; the monopolizing cats, who like nobody's noise
but their own, whisked their tails and flew through the
cellar windows in dismay. The alley, which, like
Othello, can stand most things unmoved, was at last
waking up, and not a few night-capped heads projected
like whitewashed artillery through the embrasures of
the upper casements, dolefully and yawnfully vanting
to know vot vos the row?
The opening of Gamaliel Gambril's front door
answered
the question. He and his good lady were
earnestly
discussing some problem of domestic economy
some knotty point as to the reserved rights of parties to
the matrimonial compact. It soon, however, became
evident that the husband's reasoning, if not perfectly
convincing
,
was too formidable and weighty to be resisted.
Swift as the flash, Madam Gambril dashed out of the
door, while Gamaliel, like panting time, toiled after her
in vain, flourishing a strap in one hand and a broom in
the other. Though the night was foggy, it was clear
that something unusual was the matter with Gamaliel.
His intellectual superstructure had, by certain unknown
means, become too heavy for his physical framework.
Mind was triumphing over matter, and, as was to be
expected
,
matter proving weak, the immortal mind had
many tumbles; but still, rolling, tumbling, and
stumbling
,
Gamaliel, like Alpheus, pursued his Arethusa; not
until the flying fair was metamorphosed into a magic
stream, but until he pitched into an urban water-course
of a less poetic nature, which checked his race, while its
waves soothed and measurably tranquillized his nervous
system. At the catastrophe, Mrs. Gambril ceased her
flight, but after the manner of the Cossacks of the Don,
or the Mahratta cavalry, kept circling round the enemy
out of striking distance, yet within hail.
Gammy Gambril, said she, appealing to the
argumentum
ad hominem
, in reply to that
ad baculum
from
which she fledGammy, you're a mere warmunta
pitiful warmunt; leave me no moneynot at home these
two days and nights, and still no money!now you are
come, what do you fetch?a tipsy cobbler! Hot corn is
good for something, and so is corned beef; but I'd like
to know what's the use of a corned cobbler?
Corneycopey for ever! It's merry Christmas and
happy New Year, old woman! said Gambril, raising
himself with great difficulty to a sitting posture; and
I'll larrup you like ten thousand, if you'll only come a
little nearer. Ask for money on a Christmas!it's too
aggrawatin'!it's past endurin'! I'm bin jolly myself
I'm jolly now, and if you ain't jolly, come a little nearer
and [
flourishing the strap
] I'll make you jolly.
Much conversation of a similar tenor passed between
the parties; but as the argument continued the same, no
new ideas were elicited, until Montezuma Dawkins, a
near neighbour, and a man of a rather nervous
temperament
the
consequence perhaps of being a bachelor
stepped out to put an end to the noise, which interfered
materially with his repose.
Go home, Mrs. Gambril, said Montezuma
Dawkins
soothingly; and as she obeyed, he turned to Mr.
Gambril, and remarked in a severe tone, This 'ere's
too bad, Gammyright isn't often done in the world;
but if you had your rights, you'd be between the finger
and thumb of justicejust like a pinch of snuffyou'd
be took.
Montezuma Dawkins prided himself on his legal
knowledge, for he had made the fires in a magistrate's
office during a whole winter, and consequently was well
qualified to lecture his neighbours upon their errors in
practice.
Nonsense, replied Gammyme took when it's
Christmas!well I never!did any body ever?I'm
be switch'd
No swearing. This 'ere is a connubibal case
connubibalities
in the street; and the law is as straight as a
loon's leg on that pint. You don't understand the law,
I s'pose? Well, after you're growed up, and your real
poppyor your pa, as the people in Chestnut street
would call himcan't keep you straight, because you
can lick him, which is what they mean by being of age,
then the law becomes your poppy, because it isn't so
easy to lick the law. The law, then, allows you a wife;
but the law allows it in moderation, like any thing else.
Walloping her is one of the little fondlings of the
connubibal
state; but if it isn't done within doors, and
without
a noise, like taking a drop too much, why then it
ain't moderation, and the law steps in to stop
intemperate
amusements. Why don't you buy a digestion of
the laws, so as to know what's right and what's wrong?
It's all sot down.
The law's a fool, and this isn't the first time I've
thought so by a long shot. If it wasn't for the law,
and for being married, a man might get along well
enough. But now, first your wife aggrawates you, and
then the law aggrawates you. I'm in a state of
aggrawation
.
That all comes from your not knowing lawthem
that don't know it get aggrawated by it, but them that does
know it only aggrawates other people. But you
ignorantramusses
are always in trouble, 'specially if you're
married. What made you get married if you don't
like it?
Why, I was deluded into itfairly deluded. I had
nothing to do of evenings, so I went a courting. Now,
courting's fun enoughI haven't got a word to say agin
courting. It's about as good a way of killing an evening
as I know of. Wash your face, put on a clean dicky,
and go and talk as sweet as nugey or molasses candy
for an hour or twoto say nothing of a few kisses
behind
the door, as your sweetheart goes to the step with
you. The fact is, I've quite a taste and a genus for
courting
it's
all sunshine, and no clouds.
Well, if you like it so, why didn't you stick to it; it's
easy enough; court all the time, like two pretty people
in a pickter.
Not so easy as you think for; they won't let a body
court all the timethat's exactly where the mischief lies.
If you say A, they'll make you say B. The young 'uns
may stand it because they're bashful sometimes, but the
old ladies always interfere, and make you walk right
straight up to the chalk, whether or no. Marry or cut stick
you mustn't stand in other people's moonshine. That's
the way they talked to me, and druv' me right into my
own moonshine. They said marrying was fun!pooty
fun to be sure!
Well, Gammy, I see clear enough you're in a
scrape; but it's a scrape accordin' to law, and so you
can't help your sad sitivation. You must make the best
of it. Better go home and pacify the old ladylarrupings
don't do any good as I seethey're not wholesome food
for anybody except hosses and young childrenand
Montezuma yawned drearily as if anxious to terminate
the colloquy.
The fact is, Monteyto tell you a secretI've a
great mind to walk off. I hate domestic uneasiness, and
there's more of that at my house than there is of eatables
and drinkables by a good deal. I should like to leave it
behind me. A man doesn't want much when he gets
experience and comes to look at things properlyhe
learns that the vally of wives and other extras is
tantamount
to nothingit's only essentials he cares about.
Now I'm as hungry as a poor box, and as thirsty as a cart
load of sandnot for water, though; that's said to be
good for navigation and internal improvements, but it
always hurts my wholesome, and I'm principled against
using the raw materialit's bad for trade. I can't go
home, even if there was any use in it; and so I believe
I'll emigrateI'll be a sort of pinioneer, and fly away.
It can't be allowed, Gammy Gambril. If you try it
and don't get off clear, the law will have you as sure as
a gunfor this 'ere is one of them 'are pints of law what
grabs hold of you straitthem husbands as cut stick
must be made examples on. If they wasn't, all the
hebiddies
in town would be cutting stick. To allow such
cuttings up and such goings on is taking the mortar out
of society and letting the bricks tumble down.
Individuals
must sometimes keep in an uneasy posture, for the
good of the rest of the people. The world's like a flock
of sheep, and if one runs crooked all the rest will be sure
to do the same.
Gamaliel elevated his eyebrows and shrugged his
shoulders in contempt at the application of the abstract
principle to his individual case, and then reverted to his
original train of thought. After rising to his feet, he
turned his eyes upward and struck a classical attitude.
Marrying fun! ejaculated heyes, pooty fun!
very pooty!
Keep a goin' ahead, said Montezuma Dawkins,
poking him with a stick,talk as you go, and let's hear
the rights of it.
When I was a single man, the world wagged along
well enough. It was jist like an omnibus: I was a
passenger
,
paid my levy, and hadn't nothing more to do with it
but sit down and not care a button for any thing. S'posing
the omnibus got upsotwell, I walks off, and leaves the
man to pick up the pieces. But then I must take a wife
and be hanged to me. It's all very well for a while;
but afterwards, it's plaguy like owning an upsot
omnibus
.
'Nan? queried MontezumaWhat's all that about
omnibusses?
What did I get by it? continued Gamaliel,
regardless
of the interruption. How much fun?why a
jawing
old woman and three squallers. Mighty different
from courting that is. What's the fun of buying things
to eat and things to wear for them, and wasting good
spreeing money on such nonsense for other people? And
then, as for doing what you like, there's no such thing.
You can't clear out when people's owing you so much
money you can't stay convenient. Nothe nabbers must
have you. You can't go on a spree; for when you come
home, missus kicks up the devil's delight. You can't
teach her better mannersfor constables are as thick as
blackberries. In short, you can't do nothing. Instead of
`Yes, my duck,' and `No, my dear,'`As you please,
honey,' and `When you like, lovey,' like it was in
courting
times, it's a riglar row at all hours. Sour looks and
cold potatoes; children and table-cloths bad off for soap
always darning and mending, and nothing ever darned
and mended. If it wasn't that I'm partickelarly sober,
I'd be inclined to drinkit's excuse enough. It's
heartbreaking
,
and it's all owing to that I've such a pain in
17
my gizzard of mornings. I'm so miserable I must stop
and sit on the steps.
What's the matter now?
I'm getting aggrawated. My wife's a savin' critter
a sword of sharpnessshe cuts the throat of my felicity,
stabs my happiness, chops up my comforts, and snips up
all my Sunday-go-to-meetings to make jackets for the
boysshe gives all the wittels to the children, to make
me spry and jump about like a lamp-lighterI can't
stand itmy troubles is overpowering when I come to
add 'em up.
Oh, nonsense! behave nicedon't make a noise
in the streetbe a man.
How can I be a man, when I belong to somebody
else? My hours ain't my ownmy money ain't my
ownI belong to four people besides myselfthe old
woman and them three children. I'm a partnership
concern
,
and so many has got their fingers in the till that I
must bust up. I'll break, and sign over the stock in
trade to you.
Montezuma, however, declined being the assignee in
the case of the house of Gambril, and finally succeeded
in prevailing upon him to abandon, at least for the
present
,
his design of becoming a pinioneer, and to return
to his home. But before Gambril closed the door, he
popped out his head, and cried aloud to his retiring friend,
I say, Montezuma Dawkins!before you goif
you know anybody that wants a family complete to
their hands, warranted to scold as loud and as long as
any, I'll sell cheap. I won't run away just yet, but I
want cash, for I'll have another jollification a New Year's
Eve, if I had as many families as I've got fingers and
toes!
THE CROOKED DISCIPLE;
OR, THE PRIDE OF MUSCLE.
Nature
too frequently forgets to infuse the sympathies
into the composition of the human race, and hence the
world is afflicted with a flood of evils. Imperfect as
mankind may be in a physical point of view, their moral
defects are immeasurably greater, and these chiefly flow
from the dearth of sympathy. Social offences, as well
as crimes, are in general born from this cause, and the
sins of humanity are to be charged upon selfishness, the
weed that chokes all wholesome plants in the garden of
the heart, and exhausts the soil. It manifests itself in a
variety of ways. In one instance, being combined with
other essentials, it makes a mighty conqueror; in another,
a petty larcenist; one man beats his wife and sots at an
alehouse; another sets the world in a blaze, and dying,
becomes the idol of posterity; all from the same cause
a mind concentred on itself.
The forms which govern society were intended to
counteract the aforesaid neglect of dame nature, and to
keep selfishness in check; it having been early
discovered
that if every one put his fingers in the dish at
once, a strong chance existed that the contents thereof
would be spilt, and all would be compelled to go home
hungry. It was equally clear that if each individual
tucked up his coat tails, and endeavoured to monopolize
the fire, the whole company would be likely to catch
cold. The canon was therefore issued that after you
should be manners; and that, however anxious one
may be to get the biggest piece, he should not obey the
promptings of nature by making a direct grab; but rather
effect his object by indirect managementsuch as placing
the desired morsel nearest himself, and then handing the
platea species of
hocus pocus
, which puts the rest of
the company in the vocative, and enables the skill of
civilization quietly to effect that which in earlier times
could only be accomplished by superior force, and at the
hazard of upsetting the table. If sympathy were the
growth of every mind, politeness and deference would be
spontaneous; but as it is not, a substitutea sort of
wooden leg for the natural onewas invented, and hence
dancing and manners are a part of refined education.
Wine glasses are placed near the decanter, and tumblers
near the pitcher, that inclination may receive a broad hint,
and that the natural man may not rob the rest of the
company of their share of comfort, by catching up and
draining the vessels at a draught. Chairs stand near the
dinner table to intimate that, however hungry one may
be, it is not the thing to jump upon the board, and,
clutching the whole pig, to gnaw it as a school-boy does
an apple; while plates, with their attendant knives and
forks, show that each one must be content with a portion,
and use his pickers and stealers as little as possible. To
get along smoothly, it was also ordained that we must smile
when it would be more natural to tumble the intruder
out of the window; and that no matter how tired we may
be, we must not, when another is about taking our seat,
pull it from under him, and allow him to bump on the
floor.
Although education has done much to supply
deficiencies
,
and to make mock sympathy out of calves' heads
when the real article is not to be found, yet education,
potent as it is, cannot do all things. Crooked disciples
will exist from time to time, and to prove it, let the story
be told of
Jacob Grigsby
.
Of crooked disciples, Jacob Grigsby is the crookedest.
His disposition is twisted like a ram's horn, and none
can tell in what direction will be the next turn. He is
an independent abstractionone of that class, who do
not seem aware that any feelings are to be consulted but
their own, and who take the last bit, as if unconscious
that it is consecrated to that useful divinity manners;
lads, who always run in first when the bell rings, and
cannot get their boots off when any body tumbles
overboard
;
who, when compelled to share their bed with
another, lie in that engrossing posture called
cattycornered
,
and when obliged to rise early, whistle, sing
and dance, that none may enjoy the slumbers denied to
them;in short, he strongly resembles that engaging
species of the human kind, who think it creditable to
talk loud at theatres and concerts, and to encore songs
and concertos which nobody else wants to hear.
Grigsby
was born with the idea that the rest of the world,
animate or inanimate, was constructed simply for his
special amusement, and that if it did not answer the
purpose
,
it was his indefeasible right to declare war against
the offender. When a boy, he was known as a real
limbof what tree it is unnecessary to specify. He
was an adept in placing musk melon rinds on the
pavement
for the accommodation of those elderly gentlemen
whose skating days were over, and many a staid matron
received her most impressive lessons in ground and lofty
17*
tumbling, by the aid of cords which he had stretched
across the way. Every child in the neighbourhood
learnt to see London through his telescope, and he
was famous for teaching youngsters to write hog Latin
by jerking pens full of ink through their lips. At school
he was remarkable for his science in crooking pins, and
placing them on the seats of the unsuspicious, and ever
since he has continued to be a thorn in the side of those
who are unlucky enough to come in contact with him.
Grigsby has now grown to man's estatea small
property
in most instances, and in his it must be simply the
interest of his whiskers, which extend some inches
beyond
his nose and chinhe having nothing else clear
of embarrassment. He is said to be more of a limb than
ever, his unaccommodating spirit having increased with
his trunk. The good qualities which were to appear in
him are yet in the soil, no sprouts having manifested
themselves. He is savagely jocular in general, and
jocosely
quarrelsome in his cups in particular. He stands
like a bramble in life's highway, and scratches the cuticle
from all that passes.
This amiable individual is particularly fond of
cultivating
his physical energies, and one of his chief delights
is in the display of his well practised powers. He
sometimes
awakens a friend from a day dream, by a slap on
the shoulder which might be taken for the blow of a
cannon
ball. His salutation is accompanied by a grasp of
your hand, so vigorously given that you are painfully
reminded of his affectionate disposition and the strength
of his friendship for a week afterwards; and he smiles to
see his victims writhe under a clutch which bears no
little resemblance in its pressure to the tender embrace
of a smith's vice. To this Herculean quality Grigsby
always recurs with satisfaction, and indeed it must be
confessed that superiority, either real or imagined, is a
great source of pleasure in this mundane sphere. There
are few who do not derive satisfaction from believing
that, in some respect, they are more worthy than their
neighboursand self-love, if the truth were known,
performs
many curious operations to enable its possessor to
enjoy the delight of thinking that there are points in
which he is unsurpassed. Should his countenance be
of the most unprepossessing cast, he gazes in the mirror
until convinced that whatever is lost in beauty, is gained
in expression. Should he have a temper as rash and
unreasonable
as the whirlwind, it is to him but a proof of
superior susceptibility and of an energetic will; if thin,
he is satisfied that he possesses a free unencumbered
spirit; and if nature has provided him with a
superabundance
of flesh, he comforts himself with the idea of
an imposing aspect, and of being able, physically at least,
to make a figure in the world. The melancholy man,
instead of charging his nervous system with treachery,
or his stomach with disaffection, finds a stream of
sunshine
in his gloom, from the impression that it is left to
him alone to see reality divested of its deceptive hues
and smiles sourly on the merry soul who bears it as if
existence were a perpetual feast, and as if he were a
butterfly
upon an ever-blooming prairie.
The pride of art likewise comes in as a branch of this
scheme of universal comfort. The soldier and the
politician
rejoice in their superior skill in tactics and
strategie
and
even if foiled, charge the result upon
circumstances
beyond their control; while even the scavenger
plumes himself upon the superior skill and accuracy with
which he can execute the fancy work of sweeping round
a post: but none feel the pride of which we speak more
strongly than those who are addicted to the practice of
gymnastics. They have it in every muscle of their
frames; their very coats are buttoned tight across the
breast to express it; and it is exhibited on every possible
occasion. In their dwellings, wo upon the tables and
chairsand they cannot see a pair of parallels or cross
bars without experimenting upon them.
At a period when Grigsby was in the full flush of his
gymnastic powers, he returned from a supper late at
night, with several companions. After Grigsby had
created much polite amusement by torturing several dogs
and sundry pigs, they attempted a serenade, but they
were not in voice; and after trying a cotillion and a
galopade
in front of the State House, which were not quite
so well executed as might have been desired, they
separated
,
each to his homeif he could get there. Grigsby
strolled along humming a tune, until his eye
happened
to be greeted by the welcome sight of an awning-post.
He stopped, and regarded it for a long time with critical
gravity.
This will answer famously, said he. Tom brags
that he can beat me with his arms; but I don't believe
it. Any how, his legs are no great shakes. There's no
more muscle in them than there is in an unstarched shirt
collar; and I don't believe, if he was to practise for ten
years, he could hang by his toes, swing up and catch
hold. No, that he couldn't; I'm the boy, and I'll
exercise
at it.
It is however much easier to resolve than to execute.
Mr. Grigsby found it impossible to place himself in the
requisite antipodean posture.
Why, what the deuse is the matter? All the supper
must have settled down in my toes, for my boots feel
heavier than fifty-sixes. My feet are completely
obfuscated
,
while my head is as clear as a bell. But `never
despair' is the mottohere's at it once more, continued
he, making another desperate but ineffectual effort.
An individual with a white hat and with his hands
deeply immersed in the pockets of his shooting jacket,
now advanced from the tree against which he had been
leaning, while chuckling at the doings of Mr. Grigsby.
Hay, whiskers, what's the fun in doing that,
particularly
when you can't do it? said he.
Can you hang by your toes, stranger? Because if
you can, you'll beat Tom, in spite of his bragging.
I don't believe I can. The fact is, I always try to
keep this side up with care. I never could see the use of
shaking a man up like a bottle of physic. I can mix
myself
to my own taste without that.
You've no taste for the fine arts, whatever you may
have for yourself. Gymnastics stir up the sugar of a
man's constitution, and neutralize the acids. Without
'em, he's no better than a bottle of pepper vinegar
nothing but sour punch.
Very likely, but I'll have neither hand nor foot in
hanging to an awning-post. If it was like the brewer's
horse in Old Grimes, and you could drink up all the beer
by turning your head where your feet should be, perhaps
I might talk to you about it.
Grigsby, however, by dint of expatiating on the
beneficial
tendency of gymnastics, at last prevailed upon the
stranger to make the attempt.
Now, said he, let me bowse you up, and if you
can hang by your toes, I'll treat handsome.
Well, I don't care if I do, replied the stranger
with a grin, as he grasped the cross-barhoist my
heels and look sharp.
Jacob chuckled as he took the stranger by the boots,
intending to give him a fall if possible, and to thrash him
if he grumbled; but the victim's hold was insecure, and
he tumbled heavily upon his assistant, both rolling on the
bricks together.
Fire and tow! ejaculated Grigsby.
Now we're mixed nicely, grunted the stranger, as
he scrambled about. If any man gets more legs and
arms than belong to him, they're mine. Hand over the
odd ones, and let's have a complete set.
`This will never do, said Grigsby, after they had
regained their feet, and still intent on his design. It
will never do in the worldyou're so confoundely
awkward. Come, have at it again; once more and the
last.
Young people, interposed a passing official, if
you keep a cutting didoes, I must talk to you both like
a Dutch uncle. Each of you must disperse; I can't allow
no insurrection about the premises. If you ain't got no
dead-latch key, and the nigger won't set up, why I'll
take you to the corporation free-and-easy, and lock you
up till daylight, and we'll fetch a walk after breakfast
to converse with his honour on matters and things in
general.
Very well, answered Grigsbybut now you've
made your speech, do you think you could hang by your
toes to that post?
Pooh! pooh! don't be redikalis. When matters is
solemn, treat 'em solemn.
Why, I ain't redikaliswe're at work on science.
I'm pretty well scienced myself, and I want to get
more so.
Instead of talking, you'd better paddle up street like
a white-head. Go home to sleep like your cronysee
how he shins it.
I will, said Grigsby, who likes a joke occasionally,
and is very good humoured when it is not safe to be
otherwiseI will, if you'll tell me what's the use. In
the first place, home's a fool to thisand as for sleeping,
it's neither useful nor ornamental.
Do go, that's a good boyI don't want to chaw you
right up, but I must if you stay.
I snore when I'm asleepand when I do, Tom
puts his foot out of bed till it's cold, and then claps it to
my back. He calls it firing me off on the cold pressure
principle.
What a cruel Tom! But why don't you keep your
mouth shut? You should never wear it open when you're
asleep.
If I did, my dreams would get smothered. Besides,
I like to look down my throat, to see what I'm thinking
about.
Don't quiz me, young man. Some things is easy to
put up with, and some things isn't easy to put up with;
and quizzing a dignittery is one of the last. If there is
any thing I stands upon, it's dignitty.
Dignitty made of pipe-stems, isn't it?
My legs is pretty legs. They ain't so expressive as
some what's made coarser and cheaper; but they're slim
and genteel. But legs are neither here nor there. You
must go home, sonny, or go with me.
Well, as I'm rather select in my associations, and
never did admire sleeping thicker than six in a bed at the
outside, I'll go home, put a woollen stocking on Tom's
foot, and take a pint of sleep: I never try more, for my
constitution won't stand it. But to-morrow I'll swing by
my toes, I promise you.
Go, then. Less palaver and more tortle.
Tortelons nous
good night; I'm off to my
lit
.
The
censor morum
wrapping himself in his
consequence
,
paused, looked grave until Grigsby turned the
corner, and then, relaxing his
dignitty
, laughed
creakingly
,
like a rusty door.
Hee! hee! hee!that's a real fine feller. He's too
good for his own goodmakes something of a fuss every
nightalways funny or fighting, and never pays his debts.
Hee! hee! hee! a real gentlemangives me half a
dollar
a New Year'sa realpast two o'clock and a cloudy
morning!sort of a gentleman, and encourages our
business
like an emperor, only I haven't got the heart to take
advantage of it.
Jacob Grigsby moved homeward, his temper souring as
he proceeded and as the pleasant excitement of the
evening
began to wear off. Some people, by the way, are
always good humoured abroad, and reserve their savage
traits for home consumption. Of this class is Grigsby.
Where he boards, the rule is to stow thickthree in a
bed when the weather is warm, and, in the colder season,
by way of saving blankets, four in a bed is the rule.
Now, even three in a bed is by no means a pleasant
arrangement at the best, when the parties are docile in
their slumbers, and lie spoon fashion, all facing the
same way, and it is terrible if one of the triad be of an
uneasy disposition. Grigsby's pardeners, however,
are quiet lads, and there is an understanding among the
three that turn about shall be the law in regard to the
middle place, which therefore falls to his share every third
weekone week in, and two weeks outthe soft never
to be monopolized by any one individual, and nobody to
turn round more than once in the course of the night.
Grigsby is borne down by the majority; but when it is his
week in, he is worse than the armed rhinoceros or the
Hyrcan tiger, so ferocious are his ebullitions of wrath.
It happened to be his week in, the thought whereof
moved his ire, and he ascended the stairs with the
energetic tread of an ox, set fire to the cat's tail with the
candle, and poked a long nine down Carlo's throat.
Ha! said Jacob, as he kicked open the door,
surveyed
his sleeping bedfellows, and flashed the light in
their eyesmighty comfortable that, anyhow; but I'll
soon spoil it, or I'm not a true Grigsby.
He put out the light, and in full dressboots, hat,
great coat, body coat, and pantaloonsmuddy as he was,
scrambled over the bed two or three times, until he
established
himself in the central station between his
co-mates
.
He rolled and he tossed, he kicked and he groaned,
until the whole concern were as wide awake as himself.
Why, Jacob, you've got your boots on, said they.
The fact is, fellows, the cold in my head is getting
worse, and sleeping in boots draws down the
inflammation
.
It's a certain cure.
But you don't intend sleeping with your hat on your
head, do you?
Didn't I tell you I've got holes in my stockings? If
I don't keep my hat on, I'll be sure to have the rheuma
tism in my big toe.
Well, we won't stand it, no how it can be fixed.
Just as you likego somewhere elseI've no ob
jection. I'm amazing comfortable.
Why, thunder and fury! said one, jerking up his
leg, your boots are covered with mud.
That
are
a factyou've no idea how muddy the
streets areI'm all over mudI wish you'd blow up the
corporation. But hang it, give us a fip's worth of sheet
and a 'levy's worth of blanket. That's the way I like
'em mixedsome lean and a good deal of fat.
So saying, Jacob wound himself up in the bed-clothes
18
with a prodigious flounder, denuding his companions
entirely.
Grigsby's co-mates however, knowing that who
would be free, themselves must strike the blow, declared
war against the manifold outrages of their oppressor,
and, notwithstanding his gymnastic powers, succeeded in
obtaining the mastery. Much enraged, they resolved
upon carrying him down stairs and placing him under
the hydrant as a punishment for his violations of the
social compact, and were proceeding to put their
determination
in force, when Bobolink and the rest of the
boarders, alarmed at the noise, popped out of their
chambers
.
What's the fractionvulgar or decimal? said
Bobolink
.
Vengeance! panted Grigsbyrevenge! I'm
insulted
let
me go!
The cause of quarrel was explainedall cried shame
upon Mr. Jacob Grigsby, and Mr. Bobolink constituted
himself judge on the occasion.
They kicked me! roared the prisoner.
Yes, replied Bobolink, but as they hadn't their
boots on, it wasn't downright Mayor's court assault and
batteryonly an insult with intent to hurtassault and
battery in the second degreea species of accidental
homicide. Perhaps you were going down stairs, and they
walked too quick after youtoeing it swift, and 'most
walked into you. What was it for?
Look ye, said Grigsbyit's very lateyes, it's
nearly morning, and I didn't take time to fix myself for
a regular sleep, so I turned in like a trooper's horse, and
that's the whole matter.
Like a trooper's horsehow's that?
I'll explain, said one of the spectatorsto turn
in like a trooper's horse is to go to bed all standing,
ready for a sudden callparade orderwinter uniform
full dressa very good fashion when you've been out to
supperconvenient in case of fire, and saves a deal of
trouble in the morning when you're late for breakfast.
Well, I never heard tell of the likes on the part of a
white man. They served you right, and my judgment is,
as you won't be quiet, that you be shut in the back-cellar
till breakfast time. I'm not going to have any more row.
If you don't like it, you can appeal afterwards.
Never heerd the likes! said Jacob
contemptuously
;
ain't a bed a bedain't my share of it, my share
of it?and where's the law that lays down what sort of
clothes a man must sleep in? I'll wear a porcupine jacket,
and sleep in it too, if I likeyes, spurs, and a trumpet,
and a spanner.
Put him in the cellar, was the reply, and in spite
of his struggles the sentence was laughingly enforced.
Bobolink, let's out, or I'll burst the doorlet's out
I want vengeance!
Keep yourself easyyou can't have any vengeance
till morning. Perhaps they'll wrap some in a bit of paper,
and keep it for you.
But in the morning Grigsby disappeared, and returned
no more.
FYDGET FYXINGTON.
The
illustrious Pangloss, who taught the
metaphysico-theologo-cosmolo-nigology
at the Westphalian
chateau
of the puissant Baron Thundertentronckh, held it
as a cardinal maxim of his philosophy,
que tout est
au mieux;
that it's all for the best. Pangloss
was therefore what is called an optimist, and discontent
to use the favourite word of the slang-whangerswas
repudiated by him and his followers. This doctrine,
however, though cherished in the abstract, is but little
practised out of the domain of Thundertentronckh. The
world is much more addicted to its opposite. All's for
the worst is a very common motto, and under its
influence
there are thousands who growl when they go to bed,
and growl still louder when they get up; they growl at
their breakfast, they growl at their dinner, they growl at
their supper, and they growl between meals. Discontent
is written in every feature of their visage; and they go
on from the beginning of life until its close, always
growling
,
in the hope of making things better by scaring them
into it with ugly noises. These be your passive
grumbletonians
.
When the castle was on fire, Sir Abel Handy
stood wringing his hands, in expectation that the fire
would be civil enough to go out of itself. So is it with
the passive. He would utter divers maledictions upon
the heat, but would sit still to see if the flame could not
be scolded into going out of itself.
The active grumbletonians, however, though equally
opposed in practice to the
metaphysico-theologo-cosmolo-nigology
,
are a very different race of mortals from
the passives. The world is largely indebted to them for
every comfort and convenience with which it abounds;
and they laugh at the inquiry whether their exertions
have conduced to the general happiness, holding it that
happiness consists chiefly in exertionto which the
passives
demur, as they look back with no little regret to
the lazy days of pastoral life, when Chaldean shepherds
lounged upon the grass. The actives are very much
inclined to believe that whatever is, is wrong; but
then they have as an offset, the comfortable conviction
that they are able to set it rightan opinion which fire
cannot melt out of them. These restless fellows are in
a vast majority; and hence it is that the surface of this
earthly sphere is such a scene of activity; hence it is that
for so many thousand years, the greater part of each
generation has been unceasingly employed in labour and
bustle; rushing from place to place; hammering, sawing,
and driving; hewing down and piling up mountains; and
unappalled, meeting disease and death, both by sea and
land. To expedite the process of putting things to rights,
likewise, hence it is that whole hecatombs of men have
been slaughtered on the embattled field, and that the cord,
the fagot, and the steel have been in such frequent
demand
.
Sections of the active grumbletonians sometimes
differ about the means of making the world a more
comfortable
place, and time being short, the labour-saving
process is adopted. The weaker party is knocked on
the head. It saves an incalculable deal of argument, and
answers pretty nearly the same end.
But yet, though the world is many years old, and
the fixing process has been going on ever since it
18*
emerged from chaos, it seems that much remains undone,
with less time to do it in. The actives consequently
redouble their activity. They have called in the aid of
gunpowder and steam, and in this goodly nineteenth
century
are kicking up such a terrible dust, and are setting
things to rights at such a rate, that the passives have no
comfort of their lives. Where they herd in nations, as in
Mexico, the actives cluster on their borders and set things
to rights with the rifle; and when they are solitary amid
the crowd, as among us, they are fretted to fiddlestrings,
like plodding shaft horses with unruly leaders. They are
environed with perils. In one quarter, hundreds of
stately mansions are brought thundering to the ground,
because the last generation put things to rights in the
wrong way, and in another quarter, thousands are going
up on the true principle. Between them both, the
passive
is kept in a constant state of solicitude, and threads
his way through piles of rubbish, wearing his head askew
like a listening chicken, looking above with one eye, to
watch what may fall on him, and looking below with the
other, to see what he may fall upon. Should he travel, he is
placed in a patent exploding steamboat, warranted to boil
a gentleman cold in less than no time; or he is tied to the
tail of a big steam kettle, termed a locomotive, which
goes sixty miles an hour horizontally, or if it should meet
impediment, a mile in half a second perpendicularly.
Should he die, as many do, of fixo-phobia, and seek peace
under the sod, the spirit of the age soon grasps the spade
and has him out to make way for improvement.
The passive grumbletonian is useless to himself and
to others: the active grumbletonian is just the reverse.
In general, he combines individual advancement with
public prosperity; but there are exceptions even in that
classmen, who try to take so much care of the world
that they forget themselves, and, of course, fail in their
intent.
Such a man is Fydget Fyxington, an
amelioration-of-the-human-race-by-starting-from-first-principles-philo
sopher. Fydget's abstract principle, particularly in
matters of government and of morals, is doubtless a
sound rule; but he looks so much at the beginning
that he rarely arrives at the end, and when he advances
at all, he marches backward, his face being directed
toward
the starting place instead of the goal. By this
means he may perhaps plough a straight furrow, but
instead
of curving round obstructions, he is very apt to be
thrown down by them.
Like most philosophers who entertain a creed opposed
to that of the illustrious Pangloss, Fydget may be fitly
designated as the fleshless one. He never knew the joy
of being fat, and is one of those who may console
themselves
with the belief that the physical sharpness which
renders them a walking
chevaux de frise
, and as
dangerous
to embrace as a porcupine, is but an outward emblem
of the acuteness of the mind. Should he be thrust in a
crowd against a sulky fellow better in flesh than himself,
who complains of the pointedness of his attentions,
Fydget
may reflect that even so do his reasoning faculties
bore into a subject. When gazing in a mirror, should
his eye be offended by the view of lantern jaws, and
channelled cheeks, and bones prematurely labouring to
escape from their cuticular tabernacle, he may easily
figure to himself the restless energy of his spirit, which
like a keen blade, weareth away the scabbardhe may
look upon himself as an intellectual cut and thrusta
thinking chopper and stabber. But it may be doubted
whether Fydget ever reverts to considerations so purely
selfish, except when he finds that the fine points of
his figure are decidedly injurious to wearing apparel and
tear his clothes.
Winter ruled the hour when Fydget Fyxington was
last observed to be in circulationwinter, when men
wear their hands in their pockets and seldom straighten
their backsa season however, which, though sharp and
biting in its temper, has redeeming traits. There is
something
peculiarly exhilarating in the sight of new-fallen
snow. The storm which brings it is not without a charm.
The graceful eddying of the drifts sported with by the
wind, and the silent gliding of the feathery flakes, as one
by one they settle upon the earth like fairy creatures
dropping to repose, have a soothing influence not easily
described, though doubtless felt by all. But when the
clouds, having performed their office, roll away, and the
brightness of the morning sun beams upon an expanse
of sparkling, unsullied whiteness; when all that is
common-place
,
coarse, and unpleasant in aspect, is veiled for
the time, and made to wear a fresh and dazzling garb,
new animation is felt by the spirit. The young grow
riotous with joy, and their merry voices ring like bells
through the clear and bracing air; while the
remembrance
of earlier days gives a youthful impulse to the
aged heart.
But to all this there is a sad reverse. The resolution
of these enchantments into their original elements by
means of a thaw, is a necessary, but, it must be confessed,
a very doleful process, fruitful in gloom, rheum,
inflammations
,
and feversa process which gives additional
pangs to the melancholic, and causes valour's self to
droop like unstarched muslin. The voices of the boys
are hushed; the whizzing snow-ball astonishes the
unsuspicious
wayfarer no more; the window glass is
permitted
to live its brief day, safe from an untimely
fracture
,
and the dejected urchin sneaks moodily from school.
So changed is his nature, that he scarcely bestows a
derisive
grin upon the forlorn sleigh, which ploughs its
course through mud and water, although its driver and
his passengers invite the jeer by making themselves small
to avoid it, and tempt a joke by oblique glances to see
whether it is coming.
Such a time was it when Fydget was extanta sloppy
time in January. The city, it is true, was clothed in
snow; but it was melancholy snow, rusty and forlorn
in aspect, and weeping, as if in sorrow that its original
purity had become soiled, stained, and spotted by contact
with the world. Its whiteness had in a measure
disappeared
,
by the pressure of human footsteps; wheels and
runners had almost incorporated it with the common
earth; and, where these had failed in effectually doing
the work, remorseless distributers of ashes, coal dust,
and potato peelings, had lent their aid to give uniformity
to the dingy hue. But the snow, weeping its spirit
from its eyes, and its body too, was fast escaping from
these multiplied oppressions and contumelies. Large
and heavy drops splashed from the eaves; sluggish streams
rolled lazily from the alleys, and the gutters and
crossings
formed vast shallow lakes, variegated by glaciers
and ice islands. They who roamed abroad at this
unpropitious
time, could be heard approaching by the damp
sucking sound which emanated from their boots, as they
alternately pumped in and pumped out the water in their
progress, and it was thus that our hero travelled, having
no caoutchouc health-preservers to shield his pedals from
unwholesome contact.
The shades of evening were beginning to thicken, when
Fydget stopped shiveringly and looked through the glass
door of a fashionable hotelthe blazing fire and the
numerous lights, by the force of contrast, made an
outside
seat still more uncomfortable.
The gong pealed out that tea was ready, and the
lodgers rushed from the stoves to comfort themselves
with that exhilarating fluid.
There they go on first principles, said Fydget
Fyxington
with a sigh.
Cla' de kitchen da', said one of those
ultra-aristocratic
members of society, a negro waiter, as he bustled
past the contemplative philosopher and entered the hotel
you ought to be gwang home to suppa', ole soul, if
you got someyaughwaugh!
Suppa', you nigga'! contemptuously responded
Fydget, as the door closedI wish I was gwang home
to suppa', but suppers are a sort of thing I remember a
good deal oftener than I see. Every thing is wrong
such a wandering from first principles!there must be
enough in this world for us all, or we wouldn't be here;
but things is fixed so badly that I s'pose some greedy
rascal gets my share of suppa' and other such elegant
luxuries. It's just the way of the world; there's plenty
of shares of every thing, but somehow or other there are
folks that lay their fingers on two or three shares, and
sometimes more, according as they get a chance, and the
real owners, like me, may go whistle. They've fixed it
so that if you go back to first principles and try to bone
what belongs to you, they pack you right off to jail,
'cause you can't prove property. Empty stummicks and
old clothes ain't good evidence in court.
What the deuse is to become of me! Something
mustand I wish it would be quick and hurra about it.
My clothes are getting to be too much of the
summerhouse
order for the winter fashions. People will soon
see too much of menot that I care much about looks
myself, but boys is boys, and all boys is sassy. Since
the weather's been chilly, when I turn the corner to go
up town, I feel as if the house had too many windows
and doors, and I'm almost blow'd out of my coat and
pants. The fact is, I don't get enough to eat to serve for
ballast.
After a melancholy pause, Fydget, seeing the coast
tolerably clear, walked in to warm himself at the fire
in the bar-room, near which he stood with great
composure
,
at the same time emptying several glasses of
comfortable compounds which had been left partly filled
by the lodgers when they hurried to their tea. Lighting a
cigar which he found half smoked upon the ledge of
the stove, he seated himself and puffed away much at his
ease.
The inmates of the hotel began to return to the room,
glancing suspiciously at Fydget's tattered integuments,
and drawing their chairs away from him as they sat
down near the stove. Fydget looked unconscious,
emitting
volumes of smoke, and knocking off the ashes with
a nonchalant and scientific air.
Bad weather, said Brown
I've noticed that the weather is frequently bad in
winter, especially about the middle of it, and at both
ends, added Green. I keep a memorandum book on
the subject, and can't be mistaken.
It's raining now, said Griffinhoffwhat's the use
of that when it's so wet under foot already?
It very frequently rains at the close of a thaw,
and it's beneficial to the umbrella makers, responded
Green.
Nothin's fixed no how, said Fydget with great
energy, for he was tired of listening.
Brown, Green, Griffinhoff, and the rest started and
stared.
Nothin's fixed no how, continued Fydget rejoicing
in the fact of having hearersour grand-dads must a
been lazy rascals. Why didn't they roof over the side
walks, and not leave every thing for us to do? I ain't got
no numbrell, and besides that, when it comes down as if
raining was no name for it, as it always does when I'm
cotch'd out, numbrells is no great shakes if you've got
one with you, and no shakes at all if it's at home.
Who's the indevidjual? inquired Cameo Calliper,
Esq., looking at Fydget through a pair of lorgnettes.
Fydget returned the glance by making an opera glass
with each fist, and then continued his remarks: It's a
pity we ain't got feathers, so's to grow our own jacket
and trousers, and do up the tailorin' business, and make
our own feather beds. It would be a great savin'every
man his own clothes, and every man his own feather bed.
Now I've got a suggestion about thatfirst principles
bring us to the skinfortify that, and the matter's done.
How would it do to bile a big kittle full of tar, tallow,
beeswax and injen rubber, with considerable wool, and
dab the whole family once a week? The young 'uns
might be soused in it every Saturday night, and the
nigger
might fix the elderly folks with a whitewash brush.
Then there wouldn't be no bother a washing your clothes
or yourself, which last is an invention of the doctor to
make people sick, because it lets in the cold in winter and
the heat in summer, when natur' says shut up the
porouses
and keep 'em out. Besides, when the new
invention
was tore at the knees or wore at the elbows, just tell
the nigger to put on the kittle and give you a dab, and
you're patched slickand so that whole mobs of people
mightn't stick together like figs, a little sperrits of
turpentine
or litharage might be added to make 'em dry like a
house-a-fire.
If that fellow don't go away, I'll hurt him, said
Griffinhoff
sotto voce
.
Where's a waiter? inquired Cameo Calliper edging
off in alarm.
He's crazy, said GreenI was at the hospital
once, and there was a man in the place who
'Twould be nice for sojers, added Fyxington, as
he threw away his stump, and very deliberately reached
over and helped himself to a fresh cigar, from a number
which Mr. Green had just brought from the bar and held
in his handI'll trouble you for a little of your fire,
continued he, taking the cigar from the mouth of Mr.
Green, and after obtaining a light, again placing the
borrowed Habana within the lips of that worthy
individual
,
who sat stupified at the audacity of the supposed
maniac. Fydget gave the conventional grin of thanks
peculiar to such occasions, and with a graceful wave of his
hand, resumed the thread of his lecture,'Twould be
nice for sojers. Stand 'em all of a row, and whitewash
'em blue or red, according to pattern, as if they were a
fence. The gin'rals might look on to see if it was done
according to Gunter; the cap'ins might flourish the brush,
and the corpulars carry the bucket. Dandies could fix
themselves all sorts of streaked and all sorts of colours.
When the parterials is cheap and the making don't cost
nothing, that's what I call economy, and coming as
near as possible to first principles. It's a better way,
too, of keeping out the rain, than my t'other plan
of flogging people when they're young, to make their
hides hard and waterproof. A good licking is a sound
first principle for juveniles, but they've got a prejudice
agin it.
19
Waiter! cried Cameo Calliper.
Sa!
Remove the incumbentexpose him to the
atmosphere
!
If you hadn't said that, I'd wopped him, observed
Griffinhoff.
Accordin' to first principles, I've as good a right to
be here as any body, remarked Fydget indignantly.
Cut you' stick, 'cumbenttake you'sef off, trash!
said the waiter, keeping at a respectful distance.
Don't come near me, Sip, growled Fydget,
doubling
his fistdon't come near me, or I'll develope a
first principle and 'lucidate a simple idea for youI'll
give you a touch of natur' without no gloves onbut I'll
not stay, though I've a clear right to do it, unless you are
ableyes, sassy able!to put me out. If there is
any thing I scorns it's prejudice, and this room's so
full of it and smoke together that I won't stay. Your
cigar, sir, added Fydget, tossing the stump to Mr.
Green and retiring slowly.
That fellow's brazen enough to collect militia fines,
said Brown, and so thin and bony, that if pasted over
with white paper and rigged athwart ships, he'd make a
pretty good sign for an oyster cellar.
The rest of the company laughed nervously, as if not
perfectly sure that Fydget was out of hearing.
The world's full of itnothin' but prejudice. I'm
always served the same way, and though I've so much to
do planning the world's good, I can't attend to my own
business, it not only won't support me, but it treats me
with despise and unbecoming freedery. Now, I was used
sinful about my universal language, which every body
can understand, which makes no noise, and which don't
convolve no wear and tear of the tongue. It's the patent
anti-fatigue-anti-consumption omnibus linguister, to be
done by winking and blinking, and cocking your eye, the
way the cat-fishes make Fourth of July orations. I was
going to have it introduced in Congress, to save the
expense
of anchovies and more porter; but t'other day I
tried it on a feller in the street; I danced right up to him,
and began canuvering my daylights to ask him what
o'clock it was, and I'm blow'd if he didn't swear I was
crazy, up fist and stop debate, by putting it to me right
atween the eyes, so that I've been pretty well bung'd up
about the peepers ever since, by a feller too who couldn't
understand a simple idea. That was worse than the kick
a feller gave me in market, because 'cording to first
principles
I put a bullowney sassinger into my pocket, and
didn't pay for it. The 'riginal law, which you may see
in children, says when you ain't got no money, the next
best thing is to grab and run. I did grab and run,
but he grabb'd me, and I had to trot back agin, which
always hurts my feelin's and stops the march of mind.
He wouldn't hear me 'lucidate the simple idea, and the
way he hauled out the sassinger, and lent me the loan
of his foot, was werry sewere. It was unsatisfactory and
discombobberative, and made me wish I could find out
the hurtin' principle and have it 'radicated.
Carriages were driving up to the door of a house
brilliantly
illuminated, in one of the fashionable streets, and
the music which pealed from within intimated that the
merry dance was on foot.
I'm goin' in, said FydgetI'm not afeardif we
go on first principles we ain't afeard of nothin', and since
they've monopolized my sheer of fun, they can't do less
than give me a shinplaster to go away. My jacket's so
wet with the rain, if I don't get dry I'll be sewed up and
have
hic jacket
wrote atop of me, which means defuncted
of toggery not imprevious to water. In I go.'
In accordance with this design, he watched his
opportunity
and slipped quietly into the gay mansion. Helping
himself liberally to refreshments left in the hall, he looked
in upon the dancers.
Who-o-ip! shouted Fydget Fyxington, forgetting
himself in the excitement of the sceneWho-o-ip!
added he, as he danced forward with prodigious vigour
and activity, flourishing the eatables with which his hands
were crammed, as if they were a pair of cymbals
Whurro-o-o! plank it downthat's your sort!make
yourselves merry, gals and boysit's all accordin' to first
principleswhoo-o-o-yawhoop!it takes us!
Direful was the screaming at this formidable apparition
the fiddles ceasedthe waltzers dropped their panting
burdens, and the black band looked pale and aghast.
Who-o-o-p! go ahead!come it strong! continued
Fydget.
But he was again doomed to suffer an ejectment.
Hustle him out!
Give us a `shinplaster' thenthem's my terms.
It would not dohe was compelled to retire
shinplasterless
;
but it rained so heavily that, nothing daunted, he
marched up the alley-way, re-entered the house through
the garden, and gliding noiselessly into the cellar, turned
a large barrel over which he found there, and getting into
it, went fast asleep on first principles.
The company had departedthe servants were
assembled
in the kitchen preparatory to retiring for the
night, when an unearthly noise proceeding from the
barrel
aforesaid struck upon their astonished ears. It was
Fydget snoring, and his hearers, screaming, fled.
Rallying, however, at the top of the stairs, they
procured
the aid of Mr. Lynx, who watched over the
nocturnal
destinies of an unfinished building in the vicinity,
and who, having frequently boasted of his valour, felt it
to be a point of honour to act bravely on this occasion.
The sounds continued, and the investigating
committee
,
with Mr. Lynx as chairman, advanced slowly and
with many pauses.
Lynx at last hurriedly thrust his club into the barrel,
and started back to wait the result of the experiment.
Ouch! ejaculated a voice from the interior, the word
being one not to be found in the dictionaries, but which,
in common parlance, means that a sensation too acute to
be agreeable has been excited.
Hey!hello!come out of that, said Lynx, as
soon as his nerves had recovered tranquillity. You are
in a bad box whoeve you are.
Augh! was the response, no, I ain'tI'm in a
barrel.
No matter, added Lynx authoritatively; getting
into another man's barrel unbeknownst to him in the
night-time, is burglary.
That, said Fydget, putting out his head like a
terrapin
,
at which the women shrieked and retreated, and
Lynx made a demonstration with his clubthat's
because you ain't up to first principleskeep your stick
out of my ribsI've a plan so there won't be no
burglary
,
which is thisno man have no more than he can
use, and all other men mind their own business. Then,
this 'ere barrel would be mine while I'm in it, and you'd
be asleepthat's the idea.
It's a logo-fogie! exclaimed Lynx with horror
a right down logo-fogie!
Ah! screamed the servantsa logo-fogie!how
did it get out?will it bite?can't you get a gun?
19*
Don't be foolsa logo-fogie is a sort of a man that
don't think as I dowicked critters all such sort of
people
are, said Lynx. My lad, I'm pretty clear you're
a logo-fogieyou talk as if your respect for me and
other venerable institutions was tantamount to very little.
You're a leveller I see, and wouldn't mind knocking me
down flat as a pancake, if so be you could run away and
get out of this scrapeyou're a 'grarium, and would cut
across the lot like a streak of lightning if you had a
chance.
Mr. Lynx, said the lady of the house from the head
of the stairs,she had heard from one of the affrighted
maids that a logo-fogie had been captivated, and
that it could talk just like a humanMr. Lynx,
don't have any thing to say to him. Take him out, and
hand him over to the police. I'll see that you are
recompensed
for your trouble.
Come out, thenyou're a bad chapyou wouldn't
mind voting against our side at the next election.
We don't want elections, I tell you, said Fydget
coolly, as he walked up stairsI've a plan for doing
without elections, and police-officers, and lawsevery
man mind his own business, and support me while I
oversee
him. I can fix it.
Having now arrived at the street, Mr. Lynx held him
by the collar, and looked about for a representative of
justice
to relieve him of his prize.
Though I feel as if I was your pa, yet you must be
tried for snoozling in a barrel. Besides, you've no respect
for functionaries, and you sort of want to cut a piece out
of the common veal by your logo-fogieism in wishing to
'bolish laws, and policers, and watchmen, when my
brother's one, and helps to govern the nation when the
President, the Mayor, and the rest of the day-watch has
turned in, or are at a tea-party. You'll get into prison.
We don't want prisons.
Yes we do thoughwhat's to become of
functionaries
if there ain't any prisons?
This was rather a puzzling question. Fyxington
paused, and finally said:
Why, I've a plan.
What is it, thenis it logo-fogie?
Yes, it upsets existing institutions, roared
Fyxington
,
tripping up Mr. Lynx, and making his escapethe
only one of his plans that ever answered the purpose.
THE END.